Table of Contents
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☒ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF
1934
For the fiscal year ended December 28, 2019
OR
☐TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF
1934
For the transition period from            to            
Commission file number 1-1183
PepsiCo, Inc.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in Its Charter) 
North Carolina  13-1584302
(State or Other Jurisdiction of Incorporation or Organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
700 Anderson Hill Road, Purchase, New York 10577
(Address of Principal Executive Offices and Zip Code)
914-253-2000
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934: 
Title of each class Trading Symbols Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock, par value 1-2/3 cents per share PEP  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
2.500% Senior Notes Due 2022 PEP22a  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
1.750% Senior Notes Due 2021 PEP21a  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
2.625% Senior Notes Due 2026 PEP26  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
0.875% Senior Notes Due 2028 PEP28  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
0.750% Senior Notes Due 2027 PEP27  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
1.125% Senior Notes Due 2031 PEP31  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
0.875% Senior Notes Due 2039 PEP39  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes x  No ¨
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Act. Yes ¨  No x
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such
reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes x  No ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that
the registrant was required to submit such files). Yes x  No ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller
reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.  
Large accelerated filer x Accelerated filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
  Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨    
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes ☐  No x 
The aggregate market value of PepsiCo, Inc. Common Stock held by nonaffiliates of PepsiCo, Inc. (assuming for these purposes,
but without conceding, that all executive officers and directors of PepsiCo, Inc. are affiliates of PepsiCo, Inc.) as of June 14, 2019,
the last day of business of our most recently completed second fiscal quarter, was $185.4 billion (based on the closing sale price of
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Common Stock on that date as reported on the Nasdaq Global Select Market).
The number of shares of PepsiCo, Inc. Common Stock outstanding as of February 6, 2020 was 1,389,544,618.
Documents Incorporated by Reference
Portions of the Proxy Statement relating to PepsiCo, Inc.’s 2020 Annual Meeting of Shareholders are incorporated by reference into
Part III of this Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
PepsiCo, Inc.
Form 10-K Annual Report
For the Fiscal Year Ended December  28, 2019
Table of Contents
 
PART I   
Item 1. Business 2
Item 1A. Risk Factors 11
Item 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments 31
Item 2. Properties 32
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 32
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 32
   
PART II   
Item 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities 36
Item 6. Selected Financial Data 37
Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 41
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 129
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 129
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 129
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 129
Item 9B. Other Information 130
   
PART III   
Item 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 130
Item 1 1. Executive Compensation 130
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters 130
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 131
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 131
   
PART IV   
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 132
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 133
1
Table of Contents
Forward-Looking Statements
This Annu al Report on Form 10-K contains statements reflecting our views abou t our futur e performance that
constitute “forwar d-looking statements”  within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
of 1995 (Reform Act). Statements that constitute forwar d-looking statements within the meaning of the
Reform Act are gene rally identified through the inclusion of words such as “aim,” “anticipate,” “believe,”
“drive,” “estimate,” “expect,” “expr essed confidence,” “forecast,” “futur e,” “goal,” “guidance,”
“intend,” “may ,” “objective,” “outlook,” “plan,” “position,” “potential,” “project,” “seek,” “should,”
“strategy ,” “target,”  “will” or similar statements or variations of such words and other similar expressions.
All statements addressing our futur e operating performance, and statements addressing events and
developments that we expect or anticipa te will occur in the futur e, are forwar d-looking statements within the
meaning of the Reform Act. These forwar d-looking statements are based on currently available information,
operating plans and projections about futur e events and trends. They inher ently involve risks and
uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those predicted in any such forwar d-
looking statement. These risks and uncertainties include, but are not limited to, those described in “Item 1A.
Risk Factors” and “Item 7. Manageme nt’s Discussion and Analysis of Financ ial Condition and Results of
Operations – Our Business – Our Business Risks.” Investors are cautioned not to place undue reliance on
any such forwar d-looking statements, which speak only as of the date they are made. We undertake no
obligation to update any forwar d-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, futur e events or
otherwise. The discussion of risks in this report is by no means all-inclusive but is designed to highlight what
we believe ar e important factors to consider when evaluating our futur e performance.
PART I
Item 1. Business.
When used in this report, the terms “we,” “us,” “our,” “PepsiCo” and the “Company” mean PepsiCo, Inc. and
its consolidated subsidiaries, collectively . Certain terms used in this Annual Report on Form 10-K are defined
in the Glossary included in Item 7. of this report.
Company Overview
We were incorporat ed in Delaware in 1919 and reincorporated in North Carolina in 1986. We are a leading
global food and beverage company with a complementary portfolio of brands, including Frito-Lay , Gatorade,
Pepsi-Cola, Quaker and Tropicana. Through our operations, authorized bottlers, contract manufacturers and
other third parties, we make, market, distribute and sell a wide variety of convenient beverages, foods and
snacks, serving customers and consumers in more than 200 countries and territories.
Our Operations
Changes to Organizational Structure
During the fourth quarter of 2019, we realigned our Europe Sub-Saharan Africa (ESSA) and Asia, Middle
East and North Africa (AMENA) reportable segments to be consistent with a recent strategic realignment of
our organizational structure and how our Chief Executive Officer assesses the performance of, and allocates
resources to, our reportable segments. As a result, our beverage, food and snack businesses in North Africa,
the Middle East and South Asia that were part of our former AMENA  segmen t and our businesses in Sub-
Saharan Africa that were part of our former ESSA  segment are now reported together as our Africa, Middle
East and South Asia (AMESA) segment. The remaining beverage, food and snack businesses that were part
of our former AMENA  segment are now reported together as our Asia Pacific, Australia and New Zealand
and China region (APAC) segment and our beverage, food and snack businesses in Europe are now reported
as our Europe segment.
These changes did not impact our Frito-Lay North America (FLNA), Quaker Foods North America (QFNA),
2
Table of Contents
PepsiCo Beverages North America (PBNA), formerly named North America Beverages, or Latin America
(LatAm) reportable segments or our consolidated financial results .
Our historical segment reporting presen ted in this report has been retrospectively revised to reflect the new
organizational structure.
We are or ganized into seven reportable segments (also referred to as divisions), as follows:
1)FLNA, which includes our branded food and snack businesses in the United States and Canada;
2)QFNA, which includes our cereal, rice, pasta and other branded food businesses in the United States
and Canada;
3)PBNA, which includes our beverage businesses in the United States and Canada;
4)LatAm, which includes all of our beverage, food and snack businesses in Latin America;
5)Europe, which includes all of our beverage, food and snack businesses in Europe;
6)AMESA, which includes all of our beverage, food and snack businesses in Africa, the Middle East
and South Asia; and
7)APAC, which includes all of our beverage, food and snack businesses in Asia Pacific, Australia and
New Zealand, and China region.
Frito-Lay North America
Either independently  or in conjunction with third parties, FLNA  makes, markets, distributes and sells branded
snack foods. These foods include branded dips, Cheetos cheese-flavored snacks , Doritos tortilla chips, Fritos
corn chips , Lay’s potato chips, Ruffles potato chips and Tostitos tortilla chips. FLNA ’s branded products are
sold to independent distributors and retailers. In addition, FLNA ’s joint ventur e with Strauss Group makes,
markets, distributes and sells Sabra refrigerated dips and spreads.
Quaker Foods North America
Either independently or in conjunction with third parties, QFNA  makes, markets, distributes and sells cereals,
rice, pasta  and other branded products . QFNA ’s products include Aunt Jemim a mixes and syrups, Cap’n
Crunch cereal, Life cereal, Pasta Roni, Quaker Chewy granola bars, Quaker grits, Quaker oatmeal, Quaker
rice cakes, Quaker simply granola and Rice-A-Roni side dishes. These branded products are sold to
independent distributors and retailers.
PepsiCo Beverages North America
Either independentl y or in conjunction with third parties, PBNA  makes, markets and sells beverage
concentrates, founta in syrups and finished goods under various beverage brands including Aquafina, Diet
Mountain Dew, Diet Pepsi, Gatorade, Mountain Dew, Pepsi, Propel, Sierra Mist and Tropicana. PBNA  also,
either independently or in conjunction with third parties, makes, markets, distributes and sells ready-to-drink
tea and coffee products through joint ventures with Unilever (under the Lipton brand name) and Starbucks,
respectively . Furthe r, PBNA  manufactures and distributes certain brands licen sed from Keurig Dr Pepper
Inc., inclu ding Crush, Dr Pepper and Schweppes, and certain juice brands licensed from Dole Food
Company , Inc. (Dole) and Ocean Spray Cranberries, Inc. (Ocean Spray). PBNA  operates its own bottling
plants and distribution facilities and sells branded finished goods directly to independent distributors and
retailers. PBNA  also sells concentrate and finished goods for our brands to authorized and independent
bottlers, who in turn sell our branded finished goods to independent distributors and retailers in certain
markets.
Latin America
Either independently or in conjunction with third parties, LatAm makes, markets, distributes and sells a
number of snack food brands including Cheetos, Doritos, Emperador , Lay’s, Marias Gamesa, Rosquinhas
Mabel, Ruf fles, Sabritas, Saladitas and Tostitos, as well as many Quaker -branded cereals and snacks. LatAm
3
Table of Contents
also, eithe r independently or in conjunc tion with third parties, makes, markets, distributes and sells beverage
concentrates, fountain syrups and finished goods under various beverage brands including 7UP, Gatorade,
H2oh!, Manzanita Sol, Mirinda, Pepsi, Pepsi Black, San Carlos and Toddy . These branded products are sold
to authorized bottlers, independent distributors and retailers. LatAm also, either independently or in
conjunction with third parties, makes, markets, distributes and sells ready-to-drink tea products through an
international joint venture with Unilever (under the Lipton brand name).
Europe
Either independently or in conjunction with third parties, Europe makes, markets, distributes and sells a
number of leading snack food brands including Cheetos, Chipita, Doritos, Lay’s, Ruffles and Walkers, as well
as many Quaker -branded cereals and snacks, through consolidated businesses, as well as through
noncontrolled affiliates. Europe also, either independently or in conjunctio n with third parties, makes,
markets, distributes  and sells beverag e concentrates, fountain syrups and finished goods under various
beverage brands including 7UP, Diet Pepsi, Mirinda, Pepsi, Pepsi Max and Tropicana. These branded
products are sold to authorized bottlers , independent distributors and retailers. In certain markets, however ,
Europe operates its own bottling plants and distribution facilities. Europe also, either independently or in
conjunction with third parties, makes, markets, distributes and sells ready-to-drink tea products through an
international joint venture with Unilever  (under the Lipton brand name). In addition, Europe makes, markets,
distributes and sells a number of leading dairy products including Agusha, Chudo and Domik v Derevne.
Further , as part of its beverage business, Europe manufactures and distributes sparkling water makers through
SodaStream International Ltd. (SodaStre am). See Note 14 to our consolidated financial statements for further
information about our acquisition of SodaStream.
Africa, Middle East and South Asia
Either independently or in conjunction with third parties, AMESA  makes, markets, distributes and sells a
number of leading snack food brands including Cheetos, Chipsy , Doritos, Kurkure and Lay’s, as well as many
Quaker branded cereals and snacks, through consolidated businesses, as well as through noncontrolled
affiliates. AMESA  also makes, markets, distributes and sells beverage concentrates, fountain syrups and
finished goods unde r various beverage brands including 7UP, Aquafina, Mirinda, Mountain Dew and Pepsi.
These branded products are sold to authorized bottlers, independent distributors and retailers. In certain
markets, however , AMESA  operates its own bottling plants and distribution facilities. AMESA  also, either
independently or in conjunction with third parties, makes, markets, distributes and sells ready-to-drink tea
products through an international joint venture with Unilever (under the Lipton brand name). In 2019, we
entered into an agreement to acquire Pioneer Food Group Ltd. (Pioneer Foods), a food and beverage
company in South Africa with exports to countries across the globe . The transaction is subject to certain
regulatory approvals  and other customary conditions and is expected to close in the first half of 2020. See
Note 14 to our consolidated financial statements for further information abou t our acquisition of Pioneer
Foods.
Asia Pacific, Australia and New Zealand and China Region
Either independently or in conjunction with third parties, APAC makes, markets, distributes and sells a
number of leading snack food brands including Cheetos, Doritos, Lay’s and Smith’ s, as well as many Quaker
branded cereals and snacks, through consolidated businesses, as well as through noncontrolled affiliates.
APAC also makes, markets, distributes and sells beverage concentrates, fountain syrups and finished goods
under various beverage brands including 7UP, Aquafina, Mirinda, Mountain Dew and Pepsi. These branded
products are sold to authorized bottlers, independent distributors and retailers. APAC also, either
independently or in conjunction with third parties, makes, markets, distributes and sells ready-to-drink tea
products through an international joint venture with Unilever (under the Lipton  brand name). Further , APAC
licenses the Tropicana brand for use in China on co-branded juice products in connection with a strategic
alliance with Tingyi (Cayman Islands) Holding Corp. (T ingyi).
4
Table of Contents
Our Distribution Network
Our products are primarily brought to market through direct-store-delivery (DSD), customer warehouse and
distributor networks and are also sold directly to consumers through e-commerc e platforms and retailers. The
distribution system used depends on customer needs, product characteristics and local trade practices.
Direct-Store-Delivery
We, our independent bottlers and our distributors operate DSD systems that deliver beverages, foods and
snacks directly to retail stores where the products are merchandised by our employees or our independent
bottlers. DSD enabl es us to merchandise with maximum visibility and appeal. DSD is especially well-suited
to products that are restocked often and respond to in-store promotion and merchandising.
Customer Warehouse
Some of our produc ts are delivered from  our manufacturing plants and warehouses to customer warehouses.
These less costly systems generally work best for products that are less fragile and perishable, and have lower
turnover .
Distributor Networks
We distribute many of our products through third-party distributors. Third-party distributors are particularly
effective when greater distribution reach can be achieved by including a wide range of products on the
delivery vehicles. For example, our foodservice and vending business distributes  beverages, foods and snacks
to restaurants, businesses, schools and stadiums through third-party foodservice and vending distributors and
operators.
E-commerce
Our products are also available and sold directly to consumers on a growing number of company-owned and
third-party e-commerce websites and mobile commerce applications.
Ingredients and Other  Supplies
The principal ingredients we use in our beverage, food and snack products are apple, orange and pineapple
juice and other juice concentrates, aspar tame, corn, corn sweeteners, flavorings, flour , grapefruit, oranges and
other fruits, oats, potatoes, raw milk, rice, seasonings, sucralose, sugar , vege table and essential oils, and
wheat. We also use water in the manufacturing of our products. Our key packaging materials include plastic
resins, including polyethylene terephtha late (PET) and polypropylene resins used for plastic beverage bottles
and film packaging used for snack foods, aluminum, glass, closures, cardboard and paperboard cartons. In
addition, we continue to integrate recyclability into our product development process and support the
increased use of recycled content, including recycled PET, in our packaging. Fuel, electricity and natural gas
are also important commodities for our businesses due to their use in our and our business partners’  facilities
and the vehicles delivering our products. We employ specialists to secure adequate supplies of many of these
items and have not experienced any significant continuous shortages that would  prevent us from meeting our
requirements. Many  of these ingredient s, raw materials and commodities are purchased in the open market.
The prices  we pay for such items are subject to fluctuation, and we manage this risk through the use of fixed-
price contracts and purchase orders, pricing agreements and derivative instruments, including swaps and
futures. In addition, risk to our supply of certain raw materials is mitigated through purchases from multiple
geographies and suppliers. When prices increase, we may or may not pass on such increases to our
customers. In addition, we continue to make investments to improve the sustai nability and resources of our
agricultural supply chain, including the development of our initiative to advance sustainable farming
practices by our suppliers and expanding it further globally . See Note 9 to our consolidated financial
statements for further information on how we manage our exposure to commodity prices.
5
Table of Contents
Our Brands and Intellectual Pr operty Rights
We own numerous valuable trademarks which are essential to our worldwide businesses, including 1893,
Agusha, Amp Energy, Aquafina, Aquafina Flavorsplash, Arto Lifewater , Aunt Jemima, Bare, Bolt24, bubly ,
Cap’n Crunch, Cheetos, Chester ’s, Chipita, Chipsy , Chokis, Chudo, Cracker Jack, Crunchy , Diet Mountain
Dew, Diet Mug, Diet Pepsi, Diet 7UP (outside the United States), Domik v Derevne, Doritos, Duyvis, Elma
Chips, Emperador , Evolve, Frito-Lay , Fritos, Fruktovy Sad, G2, Gamesa, Gatorade, Grandma’ s, H2oh!,
Health Warrior , Imunele, Izze, J-7 Tonus, Kas, KeVita, Kurkure, Lay’s, Life, Lifewtr , Lubimy , Manzanita Sol,
Marias Gamesa, Matutano, Mirinda, Miss Vickie’ s, Mother ’s, Mountain Dew, Mountain Dew Amp Game
Fuel, Mountain Dew Code Red, Mountain Dew Ice, Mountain Dew Kickstart, Mountain Dew Zero Sugar ,
Mug, Mun chies, Muscle Milk, Naked, Near East, Off the Eaten Path, O.N.E., Paso de los Toros, Pasta Roni,
Pepsi, Pepsi Black, Pepsi Max, Pepsi Zero Sugar , Propel, Quaker , Quaker Chewy, Rice-A-Roni, Rold Gold,
Rosquinhas Mabel, Ruffles, Sabritas, Sakata, Saladitas, San Carlos, Sandora, Santitas, 7UP (outside the
United States), 7UP Free (outside the United States), Sierra Mist, Sierra Mist Zero Sugar , Simba, Smartfood,
Smith’ s, Snack a Jacks, SoBe, SodaStream, Sonric’ s, Stacy’ s, Sting, Stubborn Soda, SunChips, Toddy ,
Toddynho, Tostitos,  Trop 50, Tropican a, Tropicana Pure Premium, Tropicana Twister , V Water, Vesely
Molochnik, Walkers and Ya. We also hold long-term licenses to use valuable trademarks in connection with
our produc ts in certain markets, includin g Dole and Ocean Spray . We also distribute Rockstar Energy drinks
and various Keurig Dr Pepper Inc. brands, including Dr Pepper in certain markets, Crush and Schweppes.
Joint ventu res in which we have an ownership interest either own or have the right to use certain trademarks,
such as Lipton, Sabra and Starbucks. Trademarks remain valid so long as they are used properly for
identification purpo ses, and we emphasize correct use of our trademarks. We have authorized, through
licensing arrangements, the use of many  of our trademarks in such contexts as snack food joint ventures and
beverage bottling appointments. In addition, we license the use of our trademarks on merchandise that is sold
at retail, which enhances brand awareness.
We either own or have licenses to use a number of patents which relate to certain of our products, their
packaging, the processes for their production and the design and operation of various equipment used in our
businesses. Some of these patents are licensed to others.
Seasonality
Our businesses are affected by seasonal  variations. Our beverage, food and snack sales are generally highest
in the third quarter due to seasonal and holiday-related patterns, and generally lowest in the first quarter .
However , taken as a whole, seasonality has not had a material impact on our consolidated financial results.
Our Customers
Our customers include wholesale and other distributors, foodservice customers, grocery stores, drug stores,
convenience stores,  discount/dollar stores, mass merchandisers, membership stores, hard discounters, e-
commerce retailers and authorized independent bottlers, among others. We normally grant our independent
bottlers exclusive contracts to sell and manufacture certain beverage products bearing our trademarks within
a specific geographic area. These arrang ements provide us with the right to charge our independent bottlers
for concentrate, finished goods and Aquafina royalties and specify the manufacturing process required for
product quality . We also grant distribution rights to our independent bottlers for certain beverage products
bearing our trademarks for specified geographic areas.
We rely on and provide financial incentives to our customers to assist in the distribution and promotion of our
products to the consumer . For our independent distributors and retailers, these incentives include volume-
based rebates, product placement fees, promotions and displays. For our independent bottlers, these
incentives are referred to as bottler funding and are negotiated annually with each bottler to support a variety
of trade and consumer programs, such as consumer incentives, advertising support, new product support, and
vending and cooler equipment placement. Consumer incentives include pricing discounts and promotions,
and other
6
Table of Contents
promotional offers. Advertising suppor t is directed at advertising programs and supporting independent
bottler media. New product support includes targeted consumer and retailer incentives and direct marketplace
support, such as point-of-purchase materials, product placement fees, media and advertising. Vending and
cooler equipment placement programs support the acquisition and placement of vending machines and cooler
equipment. The nature and type of programs vary annually .
Changes to the retail landscape, including increased consolidation of retail ownership, the rapid growth of
sales through e-commerce websites and mobile commerce applications, including through subscription
services and other direct-to-consumer businesses, the integration of physical and digital operations among
retailers, as well as the growth in hard discounters, and the current economic environment continue to
increase the importance of major customers. In 2019 , sales to Walmart Inc. (Walmart) and its affiliates,
including Sam’ s Club (Sam’ s), represented approximately 13% of our consolidated  net revenue, with sales
reported across all of our divisions. Our top five retail customers represented approximately 34% of our 2019
net revenu e in North America, with Walmart and its affiliates (including Sam’s) representi ng approximately
19%. These percentages include concentrate sales to our independent bottlers, which were used in finished
goods sold by them to these retailers.
See “Off-Balance-Sheet Arrangements” in “Our Financial Results – Our Liquidity and Capital Resources” in
Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations for more
information on our independent bottlers.
Our Competition
Our bever age, food and snack products are in highly competitive categories and markets and compete against
products of international beverage, food and snack companies that, like us, operate in multiple geographies,
as well as regional, local and private label manufacturers and economy brands and other competitors,
including smaller companies developing and selling micro brands directly to consumers through e-commerce
platforms or through retailers focused on locally-sourced products. In many countries in which our products
are sold, including the United States, The Coca-Cola Company is our primary beverage competitor . Other
beverage, food and snack competitors include, but are not limited to, Campbell Soup Company , Conagra
Brands, Inc., Kellogg Company , Keurig Dr Pepper Inc., The Kraft Heinz Company , Link Snacks, Inc.,
Mondelēz International, Inc., Monster Beverage Corporation, Nestlé S.A. and Red Bull GmbH.
Many of our food and snack products hold significant leadership positions in the food and snack industry in
the United States and worldwide. In 2019 , we and The Coca-Cola Company represented approximately 22%
and 20%, respectively , of the U.S. liquid refreshment beverage category by estimated retail sales in measured
channels, according to Information Resources, Inc. However , The Coca-Cola Company has significant
carbonated soft drink (CSD) share advantage in many markets outside the United States.
Our beverage, food and snack products compete primarily on the basis of brand recognition and loyalty , taste,
price, value, quality , product variety , innovation, distribution, advertising, marketing and promotional activity
(including digital), packaging, convenie nce, service and the ability to anticipate and effectively respond to
consumer preferenc es and trends, including increased consumer focus on health and wellness and the
continued acceleration of e-commerce and other methods of distributing and purchasing products. Success in
this competitive environment is depende nt on effective promotion of existing products, effective introduction
of new products and reformulations of existing products, increased efficien cy in production techniques,
effective incorporation of technology and digital tools across all areas of our business, the effectiveness of
our advertising campaigns, marketing programs, product packaging and pricing, new vending and dispensing
equipment and brand and trademark development and protection. We believe that the strength of our brands,
innovation and marketing, coupled with the quality of our products and flexibility of our distribution
network, allows us to compete ef fectively .
7
Table of Contents
Resear ch and Development
We engage  in a variety of research and development activities and invest in innovation globally with the goal
of meeting changing consumer demands  and preferences and accelerating sustai nable growth. These activities
principally involve: development of new ingredients, flavors and products; refor mulation and improvement in
the quality  and appeal of existing products; improvement and modernization  of manufacturing processes,
including cost reduction; improvements in product quality , safety and integrity; development of, and
improvements in, marketing and merc handising equipment, dispensing equip ment, packaging technology
(including investme nts in recycling-focused technologies), package design (including development of
sustainable, bio-base d packaging) and portion sizes; efforts focused on identifyi ng opportunities to transform,
grow and broaden our product portfolio, including by developing products with improved nutrition profiles
that reduce added sugars, sodium or saturated fat, including through the use of natural flavors, sweetener
alternatives and flavor modifiers and innovation in existing sweeteners and flavoring, further expanding our
beyond the bottle portfolio, including further growing our SodaStream business, and offering more products
with positi ve nutrition including whole grains, fruits and vegetables, dairy , protein and hydration; investments
in building our capabilities to support our global e-commerce business; investments in technology and
digitalization, including data analytics to enhance our consumer insights; and efforts focused on reducing our
impact on the environment, including improvements in energy efficiency , water use in our operations and our
agricultural practice s. Our research centers are located around the world, including Brazil, China, India,
Ireland, Mexico, Russia, the United Kingdom and the United States, and leverage nutrition science, food
science, engineering  and consumer insights to meet our strategy to continue to innovate in nutritious and
convenient beverages, foods and snacks.
In 2019 , we continued to make investments to further digitalize our business including: continuing to
strengthen our omnichannel capabilities, particularly in e-commerce; and leveraging technology and data
analytics to capture and analyze consumer level data to increasingly structure personalized communications
with consumers and satisfy demand at the store level. In addition, we continued to refine our beverage, food
and snack portfolio to meet changing consumer demands by reducing added sugars in many of our beverages
and sodiu m and saturated fat in many of our foods and snacks, and by developing a broader portfolio of
product choices, including: continuing to expand our beverage options that contain no high-fructose corn
syrup and that are made with natural flavors; expanding our beyond the bottle offerings by offering bubly in
fountain dispensing; developing 100% recycled PET packaging for LIFEWTR and aluminum can packaging
for Aquafina; expanding our state of the art food and beverage healthy vending initiative to increase the
availability of nutritious and convenie nt beverages, foods and snacks; furth er expanding our portfolio,
through a combination of brand extensions, product reformulations, new product innovations and acquisitions
to offer products with more of the nutritious ingredients and hydration our consu mers are looking for, such as
Quaker (grains), Tropicana (juices, lemonades, fruit and vegetable drinks), Gatorade (sports nutrition for
athletes), Naked Juice (cold-pressed juices and smoothies), KeVita (probiotics, tonics and fermented teas),
Bare (baked apple chips and other baked fruits and vegetables), Health Warrior (nutrition bars), Evolve
(plant-based protein products) and Muscle Milk (protein shakes); further expand ing our whole grain products
globally; and further expanding our portfolio in growing categories, such as dairy , hummus and other
refrigerated dips, and baked grain snacks. In addition, we continued to make investments to reduce our
impact on the environment, including: efforts to conserve raw materials and energy, such as by working to
achieve reductions in greenhouse gas emissions across our global businesse s, by helping to protect and
conserve global water supply especially in high-water -risk locations (including replenishing watersheds that
source our operations in high-water -risk locations and promoting the efficient use of water in our agricultural
supply chain), and by incorporating improvements in the sustainability and resources of our agricultural
supply chain into our operations; efforts to reduce waste generated by our operations and disposed of in
landfills; efforts to increase energy efficiency , including the increased use of renewable energy and resources;
efforts to support sustainable agriculture by expanding best practices with our growers and suppliers,
including
8
Table of Contents
through the use of data and technology to optimize yields and efficiency and promote responsible use of
pesticides; and efforts to create a circular future for packaging, including the increased use of recycled
content and alternat ive packaging, support for increased packaging recovery and recycling rates globally ,
optimization of packaging technology and design to minimize the amount of plastic in our packaging and to
make our packaging increasingly recoverable or recyclable with lower environmental impact, and our
continued investments in developing compostable and biodegradable packaging.
Regulatory Matters
The condu ct of our businesses, including the production, storage, distributio n, sale, display , advertising,
marketing, labeling, content, quality , safety , transportation, packaging, disposal, recycling and use of our
products, as well as our employment and occupational health and safety practices and protection of personal
information, are subject to various laws and regulations administered by federal,  state and local governmental
agencies in the United States, as well as to laws and regulations administered by government entities and
agencies in the more than 200 other countries and territories in which our products are made, manufactured,
distributed or sold. It is our policy to abide by the laws and regulations around the world that apply to our
businesses.
The U.S. laws and regulations that we are subject to include: the Federal Food , Drug and Cosmetic Act and
various state laws governing food safet y; the Food Safety Modernization Act; the Occupational Safety and
Health Act; various federal, state and local environmental protection laws, as discussed below; the Federal
Motor Carrier Safety Act; the Federal Trade Commission Act; the Lanham Act; various federal and state laws
and regulations governing competition and trade practices; various federal and state laws and regulations
governing our employment practices, including those related to equal employment opportunity , such as the
Equal Employment Opportunity Act and the National Labor Relations Act and those related to overtime
compensation, such as the Fair Labor Standards Act; data privacy and personal data protection laws and
regulations, including the California Privacy Act of 2018; customs and foreign trade laws and regulations,
including laws regarding the import or export of our products or ingredients used in our products and tariffs;
laws regul ating the sale of certain of our products in schools; laws regulating our supply chain, including the
2010 California Transparency in Supply  Chains Act and laws relating to the payment of taxes. We are also
required to comply with the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and the Trade Sanctions Reform and Export
Enhancement Act. We are also subject to various state and local statutes and regulations, including state
consumer protection  laws such as Proposition 65 in California, which requires that a specific warning appear
on any product that contains a substan ce listed by the State of California as having been found to cause
cancer or birth defects, unless the amount of such substance in the product is below a safe harbor level.
We are subject to numerous similar and other laws and regulations outside the United States, including but
not limited to laws and regulations governing food safety , international trade and tariffs, supply chain,
including the U.K. Modern Slavery Act, occupational health and safety , compet ition, anti-corruption and data
privacy , including the European Union General Data Protection Regulation. In many jurisdictions,
compliance with competition laws is of special importance to us due to our competitive position in those
jurisdictions, as is compliance with anti-corruption laws, including the U.K. Bribery Act. We rely on legal
and operational compliance programs, as well as in-house and outside counsel and other experts, to guide our
businesses in complying with the laws and regulations around the world that apply to our businesses.
In addition, certain jurisdictions have either imposed, or are considering imposi ng, new or increased taxes on
the manufacture, distribution or sale of our products, ingredients or substances contained in, or attributes of,
our products or commodities used in the production of our products. These taxes vary in scope and form:
some apply to all beverages, including non-caloric beverages, while others apply only to beverages with a
caloric sweetener (e.g., sugar). Similarly , some measures apply a single tax rate per ounce/liter on beverages
containing over a certain level of added  sugar (or other sweetener) while others apply a graduated tax rate
depending upon the amount of added sugar (or other sweetener) in the beverage and some apply a flat tax
9
Table of Contents
rate on beverages containing a particular substance or ingredient, regardless of the level of such substance or
ingredient.
In addition, certain jurisdictions have either imposed, or are considering imposing, product labeling or
warning requirements or other limitations on the marketing or sale of certain of our products as a result of
ingredients or substances contained in such products or the audience to whom products are marketed. These
types of provisions have required that we provide a label that highlights perceived concerns about a product
or warns consumers to avoid consumption of certain ingredients or substances present in our products. It is
possible that similar or more restrictive requirements may be proposed or enacted in the future.
In additio n, certain jurisdictions have either imposed or are considering impo sing regulations designed to
increase recycling rates or encourage waste reduction. These regulations vary in scope and form from deposit
return systems designed to incentivize the return of beverage containers, to extended producer responsibility
policies and even bans on the use of some plastic beverage bottles and other single-use plastics. It is possible
that similar or more restrictive requirements may be proposed or enacted in the future.
We are also subject to national and local environmental laws in the United States and in foreign countries in
which we do busine ss, including laws related to water consumption and treatment, wastewater dischar ge and
air emissio ns. In the United States, our facilities must comply with the Clean Air Act, the Clean Water Act,
the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, the Resource Conservation
and Recovery Act and other federal and state laws regarding handling, storage, release and disposal of wastes
generated onsite and sent to third-part y owned and operated offsite licensed  facilities and our facilities
outside the United States must comply with similar laws and regulations. In addition, continuing concern
over clima te change may result in new or increased legal and regulatory requi rements (in or outside of the
United States) to reduce or mitigate the potential effects of greenhouse gases, or to limit or impose additional
costs on commercia l water use due to local water scarcity concerns. Our policy  is to abide by all applicable
environmental laws and regulations, and we have internal programs in place with respect to our global
environmental compliance. We have made, and plan to continue making, necessary expenditures for
compliance with applicable environmen tal laws and regulations. While these expenditures have not had a
material impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations to date, changes in environmental
compliance requirem ents, and any expen ditures necessary to comply with such requirements, could adversely
affect our financial performance. In addition, we and our subsidiaries are subject to environmental
remediation obligat ions arising in the normal course of business, as well as remediation and related
indemnification obligations in connection with certain historical activities and contractual obligations,
including those of businesses acquired by us or our subsidiaries. While these environmental remediation and
indemnification obligations cannot be predicted with certainty , such obligations have not had, and are not
expected to have, a material impact on our capital expenditures, earnings or competitive position.
In addition to the discussion in this section, see also “Item 1A. Risk Factors.”
Employees
As of December 28, 2019 , we and our conso lidated subsidiaries employed approximately 267,000 peop le
worldwide, includin g approximately 116,000 people within the United States. In certain countries, our
employment levels are subject to season al variations. We or our subsidiaries are party to numerous collective
bargaining agreemen ts. We expect that we will be able to renegotiate these collective bargaining agreements
on satisfactory terms when they expire.  We believe that relations with our employees are generally good.
Available Information
We are required to file annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy statements and other information with the
U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The SEC maintains an Internet site that contains reports,
proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers that file electronically with the
SEC at http://www .sec.gov .
10
Table of Contents
Our Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K, proxy
statements and amendments to those documents filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (Exchange Act), are also available free of charge on our
Internet site at http://www .pepsico.com  as soon as reasonab ly practicable after such reports are electronically
filed with or furnished to the SEC.
Investors should note that we currently  announce material information to our investors and others using
filings with the SEC, press release s, public conference calls, webcasts or our corporate website
(www .pepsico.com ), includin g news and announcements regarding our financial performance, key personnel,
our brands and our business strategy . Information that we post on our corporate website could be deemed
material to investors. We encourage investors, the media, our customers, consumers, business partners and
others interested in us to review the information we post on these channels. We may from time to time update
the list of channels we will use to communicate information that could be deemed material and will post
information about any such change on www .pepsico.com . The information on our website is not, and shall
not be deemed to be, a part hereof or incorporated into this or any of our other filings with the SEC.
Item 1A. Risk Factors.
You should carefully consider the risks described below in addition to the other information set forth in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K, including the Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
and Results of Operations section and the consolidated financial statements and related notes. These risks,
some of which have  occurred and any of which may occur in the future, can have a material adverse effect on
our business, financial condition, results of operations or the price of our publicly traded securities. The risks
described below are not the only risks we face. Additional risks and uncertainti es not currently known to us,
or that we currently deem to be immate rial, may occur or become material in the future and adversely affect
our business, reputation, financial condition, results of operations or the price of our publicly traded
securities. Therefore, historical operating results, financial and business performance, events and trends are
often not a reliable indicator of future operating results, financial and business performance, events or trends.
Future demand for our products may be adversely affected by changes in consumer preferences or any
inability on our part to innovate, market or distribute our products effectively , and any significant
reduction in demand could adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
We are a global food and beverage company operating in highly competitive categories and markets. To
generate revenues and profits, we rely on continued demand for our products and therefore must understand
our custom ers and consumers and sell products that appeal to them in the sales  channel in which they prefer
to shop or browse for such products. In general, changes in consumption in our product categories or
consumer demographics can result in reduced demand for our products. Demand for our products depends in
part on our ability to anticipate and effectively respond to shifts in consu mer trends and preferences,
including increased demand for produc ts that meet the needs of consumers who are concerned with: health
and wellness (including products that have less added sugars, sodium and saturated fat); convenience
(including respondin g to changes in in-home and on-the-go consumption patterns and methods of distribution
of our products to customers and consumers, including through e-commerce and hard discounters); or the
location of origin or source of ingredients and products (including the environmental impact related to
production and packaging of our products).
Consumer preferences continuously evolve, due to a variety of factors, including: changes in consumer
demographics, including the aging of the general population and the emer gence of the millennial and younger
generations who have differing spending, consumption and purchasing habits; consumer concerns or
perceptions regardin g the nutrition profile of products, including the presence of added sugar , sodium and
saturated fat in certain of our produ cts; growing demand for organic, locally or sustainably sourced
ingredients, or consumer concerns or perceptions (whether or not valid) regarding the health effects of
ingredients or
11
Table of Contents
substances present in certain of our products, such as 4-MeI, acrylamide, artificial flavors and colors,
artificial sweeteners, aspartame, caffeine, furfuryl alcohol, high-fructose corn syrup, partially hydrolyzed oils,
saturated fat, sodium, sugar , trans fats or other product ingredients, substances or attributes, including
genetically engineer ed ingredients; taxes or other restrictions, including labeli ng requirements, imposed on
our products; consumer concerns or perceptions regarding packaging materi als, including single-use and
other plastic packaging, and their environmental impact; changes in package or portion size; changes in social
trends that impact travel, vacation or leisure activity patterns; changes in weather patterns or seasonal
consumption cycles; the continued acceleration of e-commerce and other methods of purchasing products;
negative publicity (whether or not valid) resulting from regulatory actions, litigation against us or other
companies in our industry or negative or inaccurate posts or comments in the media, including social media,
about us, our employees, our products or advertising campaigns and marketing  programs; perception of our
employees, agents, customers, suppliers , bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners
or other third parties or our respect ive social media posts, business practices or other information
disseminated by or regarding them or us; product boycotts; or a downturn in economic conditions. These
factors have in the past and could in the future reduce consumers’  willingne ss to purchase certain of our
products and any inability on our part to anticipate or react to such changes can lead to reduced demand for
our products or erode our competitive and financial position, resulting in adverse effects on our business,
reputation, financial condition or results of operations.
Demand for our products is also dependent in part on product quality , product and marketing innovation and
production and distribution, including our ability to: maintain a robust pipeline of new products; improve the
quality of existing products; extend our portfolio of products in growing markets and categories (through
acquisitions and innovation, such as increasing non-carbonated beverage offerings and other alternatives to,
or reformulations of, carbonated beverage offerings); respond to cultural differences and regional consumer
preferences (whethe r through developing or acquiring new products that are responsive to such preferences);
monitor and adjust our use of ingred ients and packaging materials (including to respond to applicable
regulations); develop  sweetener alternatives and innovation; increase the recycla bility or recoverability of our
packaging; create more relevant and personalized experiences for consumers whether in a digital
environment or through digital devices  in an otherwise physical environment; improve the production and
distribution of our products; enhance our data analytics capabilities to develop new commercial insights;
respond to competiti ve product and pricing pressures and changes in distribution channels, including in the e-
commerce channel; maintain our labelin g certifications (e.g., non-GMO) from independent organizations and
regulatory authoriti es for certain of our products; and implement effective  advertising campaigns and
marketing programs , including successfully adapting to a rapidly changing media environment through the
use of social media and online advertising campaigns and marketing programs.
Although we devote significant resources to the items mentioned above, there can be no assurance as to our
continued ability to develop, launch, maintain or distribute successful new products or variants of existing
products in a timely manner (including correctly anticipating or effectively reacting to changes in consumer
preferences) or to develop and effectively execute advertising and marketing campaigns that appeal to
customers and consumers, including through the use of digital technology . Our failure to make the right
strategic investments to drive innovation or successfully launch new products or variants of existing products
or effectively market or distribute our products can reduce demand for our products, result in inventory write-
offs and erode our competitive and financial position and can adversely affect our business, financial
condition or results of operations.
Changes in laws and regulations relating to the use or disposal of plastics or other product packaging can
increase our costs, reduce demand for our products or otherwise have an adverse impact on our business,
reputation, financial condition or results of operations.
12
Table of Contents
Certain of our food and beverage produ cts are sold in plastic or other packaging designed to be recoverable
for recycling but not all packaging is recovered, whether due to lack of infrastructure or otherwise. In
addition, certain of our packaging is not currently recyclable, compostable or biodegradable. There is a
growing concern with the accumulation of plastic, including microplastics, and other packaging waste in the
environment, particu larly in the world’ s oceans and waterways. As a result, pack aging waste that displays one
or more of our brands has in the past and could continue to result in negative publicity (whether or not valid)
or reduce consumer  demand and overa ll consumption of our products, resulting in adverse effects on our
business, financial condition or results of operations.
In response to these concerns, the United States and many other jurisdictions have imposed or are considering
imposing regulation s or policies desig ned to increase the sustainability of packaging, encourage waste
reduction and increase recycling rates or facilitate the waste management process or restrict the sale of
products in certain packaging. These regulations vary in scope and form from taxes or fees designed to
incentivize behavior to restrictions or bans on certain products and materials. For example, 24 countries in the
European Union (EU) have established extended producer responsibility (EPR) policies, which make
manufacturers such as us responsible for the costs of recycling beverage and food packaging after consumers
have used them. EPR policies are also being contemplated in other jurisdiction s around the world, including
certain states in the United States. In addition, 10 states in the United States as well as a growing number of
European countries have a bottle deposit return system in effect, which requires a deposit charged to
consumers to incentivize the return of the beverage container . Further , certain jurisdictions have imposed or
are consid ering imposing other types of regulations or policies, including pack aging taxes, requirements for
bottle caps to be tethered to the plastic bottle, minimum recycled content mandates, which would require
packaging to include a certain percenta ge of post-consumer recycled material in a new package, and even
bans on the use of some plastic beverage bottles and other single-use plastics. These laws and regulations,
whatever their scope or form, have in the past and could continue to increase the cost of our products, reduce
consumer demand and overall consumption of our products or result in negative publicity (whether or not
valid), resulting in adverse ef fects on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
While we continue to devote significa nt resources to increase the recyclabil ity and sustainability of our
packaging, the increased focus on reducing plastic waste has required and could continue to require us to
increase capital expenditures, including  requiring additional investments to minimize the amount of plastic
across our packaging, including to increase the use of alternative packaging materials (e.g., glass and
aluminum) in certain markets; increase the amount of recycled content in our packaging; and develop
sustainable, bio-base d packaging as a replacement for fossil fuel-based plastic packaging, including flexible
film alternatives for our snacks packaging. Our failure to minimize our plastics use, increase the amount of
recycled content in our packaging or develop sustainable packaging or consu mers’  failure to accept such
sustainable packagi ng has in the past and could continue to reduce consumer demand and overall
consumption of our products and erode our competitive and financial position. Further , our reputation can be
damaged for failure to achieve our susta inability goals with respect to our plastics use, including our goal to
reduce 35% of virgin plastic content across our beverage portfolio by 2025, or if we or others in our industry
do not act, or are perceived not to act, responsibly with respect to packaging or disposal of our products.
Changes in, or failure to comply with, laws and regulations applicable to our products or our business
operations can adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
The conduct of our business is subject to various laws and regulations administe red by federal, state and local
governmental agencies in the United States, as well as government entities and agencies outside the United
States, including laws and regulation s relating to the production, storage , distribution, sale, display ,
advertising, marketing, labeling, conten t, quality , safety , transportation, packaging, disposal, recycling and
use of our products, as well as our employment and occupational health and safety practices and protection of
personal information. In addition, in many jurisdictions, compliance with competition laws is of special
13
Table of Contents
importance to us due to our competitive position in those jurisdictions, as is compliance with anti-corruption
laws. Many of these laws and regulations have differing or conflicting legal standards across the various
markets where our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold and, in certain markets, such as
developing and emer ging markets, may be less developed or certain. For example, products containing
genetically engineer ed ingredients are subject to differing regulations and restrictions in the jurisdictions in
which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold, as is the packaging, disposal and
recyclability of our products. For example, the EU has mandated tethered caps for all beverage bottles by
2024 and minimum recycled content of 25% for PET bottles by 2025 and 30% for all plastic bottles by 2030
and laws mandating various minimum recycled content thresholds for PET bottles are also in place in Turkey ,
Bolivia, Ecuador and Peru, while the use of recycled content in food and beverage packaging is prohibited in
a range of countries, for example, in Asia. In addition, these laws and regulations and related interpretations
have changed and could continue to change, sometimes dramatically and unexpectedly , as a result of a variety
of factors, including political, economic or social events. Such changes have included and could continue to
include changes in: food and drug laws; laws related to product labeling, adverti sing and marketing practices,
including restrictions on the audience to whom products are marketed; laws and treaties related to
international trade, including laws regarding the import or export of our products or ingredients used in our
products and tariffs; laws and programs aimed at reducing, restricting or elimina ting ingredients or substances
in, or attributes of, certain of our products; laws related to pesticide used by farmers in our supply chain or
residual amounts of pesticide that may be found in certain of our ingredients  or products; laws related to
traceability requirements for our supply chain; laws and programs aimed at discouraging the consumption or
altering the package or portion size of certain of our products, including laws imposing restrictions on the use
of government funds or programs to purchase certain of our products; increase d regulatory scrutiny of, and
increased litigation involving product claims and concerns (whether or not valid) regarding the effects on
health of ingredient s or substances in, or attributes of, certain of our products,  including without limitation
those found in energy drinks; state consumer protection laws; laws regulatin g the protection of personal
information; cyber -security regulation s; regulatory initiatives, including the imposition or proposed
imposition of new or increased taxes or other measures impacting the manufacture, distribution or sale of our
products; accounting rules and interpretations; employment laws; privacy laws; laws regulating the price we
may charge for our products; laws regulating water rights and access to and use of water or utilities;
environmental laws, including laws relating to the regulation of water treatment and dischar ge of wastewater
and air emissions and laws relating to the disposal, recovery or recycling of our products and their packaging.
Changes in regulatory requirements or changing interpretations thereof, and differing or competing
regulations and standards across the markets where our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold,
have in the past and could continue to result in higher compliance costs, capital expenditures and higher
production costs, resulting in adverse effects on our business, reputation, financial condition or results of
operations.
The imposition of new laws, regulations or governmental policy and their related interpretations, or changes
in any of the foregoing, including taxes, labeling, product, production, recovery or recycling requirements, or
other limitations on, or pertaining to, the sale or advertisement of certain of our products, ingredients or
substances contained in, or attributes of, our products, commodities used in the production of our products or
use, disposal, recovery or recyclability of our products and their packaging, may further alter the way in
which we do busine ss and, therefore, may continue to increase our costs or liabilities or reduce demand for
our products, resulting in adverse effects on our business, financial condition or results of operations. If one
jurisdiction imposes  or proposes to impose new requirements or restrictions, other jurisdictions often follow .
For example, if one jurisdiction imposes a tax on sugar -sweetened beverages or foods, or imposes a specific
labeling or warning requirement, other jurisdictions may impose similar or other measures that impact the
manufacture, distribution or sale of our products. The foregoing has in the past and could continue to result
14
Table of Contents
in decreased demand for certain of our products, adverse publicity or increased concerns about the health
implications of consumption of ingredients or substances in our products (whether or not valid).
In addition, studies (whether or not scientifically valid) have been and continue to be underway by third
parties purporting to assess the health implications of consumption of certain ingredients or substances
present in certain of our products or packaging materials, such as 4-MeI, acrylamide, caffeine, pesticides
(e.g., glyphosate), furfuryl alcohol, added sugars, sodium, saturated fat and plastic. Third parties have also
published documents or studies claiming (whether or not valid) that taxes can address consumer consumption
of sugar -sweetened beverages and foods high in sugar , sodium or saturated fat. The results of these studies
and documents have contributed to or resulted in and could continue to contrib ute to or result in an increase
in consumer concerns (whether or not valid) about the health implications of consumption of certain of our
products, an increase in the number of jurisdictions that impose taxes on our products, or an increase in new
labeling, product or production requirem ents or other restrictions on the manufacturing, sale or display of our
products, resulting in reduced demand  for our products, our Company being subject to lawsuits or new
regulations that can adversely affect sales of our products, and other adverse effects on our business, financial
condition or results of operations.
Although we have policies and procedures in place that are designed to promote legal and regulatory
compliance, our employees, suppliers, or other third parties with whom we do business can take actions,
intentional or not, that violate these policies and procedures or applicable laws or regulations or can fail to
maintain required documentation sufficient to evidence our compliance with applicable laws or regulations.
Failure to comply with such laws or regulations can subject us to criminal or civil enforcement actions,
including fines, injunctions, product recalls, penalties, disgor gement of profits or activity restrictions, any of
which can adversely affect our business, reputation, financial condition or results of operations. In addition,
certain regulatory authorities under whose laws we operate have enforcement powers that can subject us to
actions such as product recall, seizure of products or assets or other sanctions, resulting in an adverse effect
on the sales of products in our portfolio or damage to our reputation.
In addition, we and our subsidiaries are party to a variety of legal and environmental remediation obligations
arising in the normal course of busines s, as well as environmental remediation, product liability , toxic tort
and relate d indemnification proceedin gs in connection with certain historical activities and contractual
obligations, including those of businesses acquired by us or our subsidiaries. Due to regulatory complexities,
uncertainties inherent in litigation and the risk of unidentified contaminants on current and former properties
of ours and our subsidiaries, the potential exists for remediation, liability and indemnification costs to differ
materially from the costs we have estimated. We cannot guarantee that our costs in relation to these matters
will not exceed our estimates or otherwise have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition or
results of operations.
The impo sition or proposed imposition  of new or increased taxes aimed at our products can adversely
affect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Certain jurisdictions in which our produ cts are made, manufactured, distributed or sold have either imposed,
or are considering imposing, new or increased taxes on the manufacture, distribution or sale of our products,
ingredients or substances contained in, or attributes of, our products or commodities used in the production of
our produ cts. These  taxes vary in scope and form: some apply to all beverages, including non-caloric
beverages, while others apply only to beverages with a caloric sweetener (e.g., sugar). Similarly , some
measures apply a single tax rate per ounce/liter on beverages containing over a certain level of added sugar
(or other sweetener) while others apply  a graduated tax rate depending upon the amount of added sugar (or
other swee tener) in the beverage and some apply a flat tax rate on beverages containing a particular substance
or ingredi ent, regar dless of the particular substance or ingredient levels. For example, Peru revised an
existing threshold tax to become a graduated tax, effective June 2019, in which the per-ounce tax rate is tied
to the amount of added sugar present in the beverage: the higher the amount of added sugar , the higher the
per-
15
Table of Contents
ounce tax rate, while Saudi Arabia expa nded an existing flat tax rate of 50% on the retail price of carbonated
soft drinks to includ e all sweetened beverages, including non-caloric beverage s, effective December 2019.
These tax measures, whatever their scope or form, have in the past and could continue to increase the cost of
certain of our products, reduce consume r demand and overall consumption of our products, lead to negative
publicity (whether based on scientific fact or not) or leave consumers with the perception (whether or not
valid) that our products do not meet their health and wellness needs, resulti ng in adverse effects on our
business, financial condition or results of operations.
Significant addition al labeling or warning requirements or limitations on the marketing or sale of our
products could reduce demand for such products and can adversely affect our business, financial
condition or results of operations.
Certain jurisdictions in which our produ cts are made, manufactured, distributed or sold have either imposed,
or are considering imposing, product labeling or warning requirements or limitations on the marketing or sale
of certain of our products as a result of ingredients or substances contained in such products. These types of
provisions have required that we provide a label that highlights perceived concerns about a product or warns
consumers to avoid consumption of certain ingredients or substances present in our products. For example, in
California in the United States, Proposition 65 requires a specific warning on or relating to any product that
contains a substance listed by the State of California as having been found to cause cancer or birth defects or
other reproductive harm, unless the level of such substance in the product is below a safe harbor level
established by the State of California.
In addition , a number of jurisdictions, both in and outside the United States, have imposed or are considering
imposing labeling requirements, including color -coded labeling of certain food and beverage products where
colors such as red, yellow and green are used to indicate various levels of a particular ingredient, such as
sugar , sodium or saturated fat. The imposition or proposed imposition of additional product labeling or
warning requirements has in the past and could continue to reduce overall consumption of our products, lead
to negativ e publicit y (whether based on scientific fact or not) or leave consumers with the perception
(whether or not valid) that our products do not meet their health and wellnes s needs, resulting in adverse
effects on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Our business, financial condition or results of operations can suffer if we are unable to compete
effectively .
Our bever age, food and snack products are in highly competitive categories and markets and compete against
products of international beverage, food and snack companies that, like us, operate in multiple geographies,
as well as regional, local and private label manufacturers and economy brands and other competitors,
including smaller companies developing and selling micro brands directly to consumers through e-commerce
platforms or through retailers focused on locally-sourced products. In many countries in which our products
are sold, including the United States, The Coca-Cola Company is our primary beverage competitor . Other
beverage, food and snack competitors include, but are not limited to, Campbell Soup Company , Conagra
Brands, Inc., Kellogg Company , Keurig Dr Pepper Inc., The Kraft Heinz Company , Link Snacks, Inc.,
Mondelēz International, Inc., Monster Beverage Corporation, Nestlé S.A. and Red Bull GmbH.
Our beverage, food and snack products compete primarily on the basis of brand recognition and loyalty , taste,
price, value, quality , product variety , innovation, distribution, advertising, marketing and promotional
activity , packaging, convenience, servic e and the ability to anticipate and effectively respond to consumer
preferences and trends, including increased consumer focus on health and wellness and the continued
acceleration of e-commerce and other methods of distributing and purchasing products. If we are unable to
effectively promote our existing products or introduce new products, if our advertising or marketing
campaigns are not effective, if we fail to invest in and incorporate technology and digital tools across all areas
of our business (including the use of data analytics to enhance our ability to effectively market to consumers),
if our competitors spend more aggressively than we do or if we are otherwise unable to effectively respond to
pricing pressure or
16
Table of Contents
compete effectively (including in distrib uting our products effectively and cost efficiently through all existing
and emerging channels of trade, includi ng through e-commerce and hard disco unters), we may be unable to
grow or maintain sales or category share  or we may need to increase capital, marketing or other expenditures,
which could adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Failure to realize anticipated benefits from our productivity or reinvestment initiatives or operating model
can have an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Our future success and earnings growth depend, in part, on our ability to continue to reduce costs and
improve efficiencie s, including implementing shared business service organizational models while
reinvesting back into the business. Our productivity initiatives help support our growth initiatives and
contribute to our results of operations. We continue to implement productivity initiatives that we believe will
position our business for long-term sustainable growth by allowing us to achieve a lower cost structure,
improve decision-making and operate more efficiently in the highly competitive beverage, food and snack
categories and markets. Some of these measures have yielded and could continue to yield unintended
consequences, such as business disruptions, distraction of management and employees, reduced employee
morale and productivity , and unexpecte d additional employee attrition, including the inability to attract or
retain key personne l. It is critical that we have the appropriate personnel in place to lead and execute our
plans, including to effectively manage personnel adjustments and transitions resulting from these initiatives
and increased competition for employee s with the skills necessary to implement our plans. If we are unable to
successfully implement our productivity initiatives as planned, fail to implement these initiatives as timely as
we anticip ate, do not achieve expected savings as a result of these initiatives or incur higher than expected or
unanticipated costs in implementing these initiatives, fail to identify and implement additional productivity
opportunities in the future, or fail to successfully manage business disruptio ns or unexpected employee
consequences on our workforce, morale or productivity , we may not realize all or any of the anticipated
benefits, resulting in adverse effects on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Further , in
order to continue to capitalize on our cost reduction efforts and operating model , it will be necessary to make
certain investments in our business, which may be limited due to capital constraints. From time to time, we
have in the past and could continue to implement these investment initiatives to enable us to compete more
effectively , includin g investments to increase manufacturing capacity , improv e innovation, transform our
manufacturing, commercial and corporate operations through digital technolog ies and artificial intelligence,
and enhance brand management through  our use of data analytics to develop new commercial and consumer
insights. If we fail to realize all or any of the anticipated benefits of these reinvestment initiatives, our
business, financial condition or results of operations can be adversely af fected.
Our business, financial condition or results of operations can be adversely affected as a result of political
conditions in the markets in which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold.
Political conditions in the markets in which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold have
been and could continue to be difficult to predict, resulting in adverse effects on our business, financial
condition and results of operations. The results of elections, referendums or other political conditions
(including government shutdowns) in these markets have in the past and could continue to impact how
existing laws, regulations and governm ent programs or policies are implemented or create uncertainty as to
how such laws, regulations and govern ment programs or policies may chang e, including with respect to
tariffs, sanctions, climate change regulation, taxes, benefit programs, the movement of goods, services and
people between countries, relationships  between countries, customer or consum er perception of a particular
country or its government and other matters, and has resulted in and could conti nue to result in exchange rate
fluctuation, volatility in global stock markets and global economic uncertainty or adversely affect demand for
our products. For example, the United Kingdom’ s withdrawal from the European Union (commonly referred
to as Brex it) is likely to lead to differing laws and regulations in the United Kingdom and European Union
and further global economic, trade and regulatory uncertainty . Any changes in, or the imposition of,
17
Table of Contents
new laws, regulations or governmental policy and their related interpretations due to elections, referendums
or other political conditions can have an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of
operations.
Our business, financial condition or results of operations can be adversely affected if we are unable to
grow our business in developing and emerging markets.
Our success depends in part on our ability to grow our business in developing and emer ging markets,
including Mexico, Russia, the Middle East, Brazil, China and India. However , there can be no assurance that
our existing products, variants of our existing products or new products that we make, manufacture, distribute
or sell will be accepted or be successful in any particular developing or emer ging market, due to local or
global competition, product price, cultural differences, consumer preferences as to distribution or otherwise.
The following factors can reduce demand for our products or otherwise impede the growth of our business in
developing and emer ging markets: unstable economic, political or social conditions; acts of war, terrorist
acts, and civil unrest; increased competition; volatility in the economic growth of certain of these markets and
the related impact on developed countries who export to these markets; volatile oil prices and the impact on
the local economy in certain of these markets; our inability to acquire busine sses, form strategic business
alliances or to make necessary infrastructure investments; our inability to complete divestitures or
refranchisings; imposition of new or increased labeling, product or produc tion requirements, or other
restrictions; our inability to hire or retain a highly skilled workforce; imposition of new or increased tariffs
and other imposition s on imported goods or sanctions against, or other regula tions restricting contact with,
certain countries in these markets, or imposition of new or increased sanctions against U.S. multinational
corporations or tariffs on the products  of such corporations operating in these markets; actions, such as
removing our products from shelves, taken by retailers in response to U.S. trade sanctions, tariffs or other
governmental action or policy; foreign ownership restrictions; nationalization of our assets or the assets of
our suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other third parties;
imposition of taxes on our products or the ingredients or substances used in our products; government-
mandated closure, or threatened closure,  of our operations or the operations of our suppliers, bottlers, contract
manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners, customers or other third parties; restrictions on the import
or export of our products or ingredients or substances used in our products; regulations relating to the
repatriation of funds currently held in foreign jurisdictions to the United States; highly inflationary economies
and potential highly inflationary economies, devaluation or fluctuation, such as the devaluation of the
Russian ruble, Turkish lira, Brazilian real, Argentine peso and the Mexican peso, or demonetization of
currency; regulation s on the transfer of funds to and from foreign countries , currency controls or other
currency exchange restrictions, which result in significant cash balances in foreign countries, from time to
time, or can significantly affect our ability to effectively manage our operations in certain of these markets
and can result in the deconsolidation of such businesses, such as occurred with respect to our Venezuelan
businesses which were deconsolidated at the end of the third quarter of 2015; the lack of well-established or
reliable legal systems; increased costs of doing business due to compliance with complex foreign and U.S.
laws and regulations  that apply to our international operations, including the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act,
the U.K. Bribery Act and the Trade Sanctions Reform and Export Enhancement Act; and adverse
consequences, such as the assessment of fines or penalties, for any failure to comply with these laws and
regulations. If we are unable to expan d our businesses in developing and emer ging markets, effectively
operate, or manage the risks associated with operating, in these markets, or achieve the return on capital we
expect from our investments in these markets, our business, reputation, financial condition or results of
operations can be adversely af fected.
Uncertain or unfavorable economic conditions may have an adverse impac t on our business, financial
condition or results of operations.
18
Table of Contents
Many of the countri es in which our products are made, manufactured, distributed and sold have experienced
and could continue to experience uncertain or unfavorable economic conditions, such as recessions or
economic slowdowns. Our business or financial results have in the past and could continue to be adversely
impacted by uncertain or unfavorable economic conditions in the United States and globally , including:
adverse changes in interest rates, tax laws or tax rates; volatile commodity markets, including speculative
influences; highly inflationary econom ies, devaluation, fluctuation or demonetization; contraction in the
availability of credit in the marketplace due to legislation or economic conditions; the effects of government
initiatives, including demonetization, austerity or stimulus measures to manage economic conditions and any
changes to or cessation of such initiatives; the effects of any default by or deterioration in the
creditworthiness of the countries in which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold or of
countries that may then impact countrie s in which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold;
reduced demand for our products resulting from volatility in general global economic conditions or a shift in
consumer preferences for economic reasons or otherwise to regional, local or private label products or other
lower -cost products, or to less profitable sales channels; or a decrease in the fair value of pension or post-
retirement assets that could increase future employee benefit costs and/or funding requirements of our
pension or post-retir ement plans. In addition, we cannot predict how current or future economic conditions
will affect our customers, consumers, suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture
partners or other third parties and any negative impact on any of the foregoin g may also have an adverse
impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
In addition, some of the major financial institutions with which we execute transactions, including U.S. and
non-U.S. commercial banks, insurance companies, investment banks and other financial institutions, may be
exposed to a ratings downgrade, bankruptcy , liquidity events, default or similar risks as a result of
unfavorable econom ic conditions, changing regulatory requirements or other factors beyond our control. A
ratings downgrade, bankruptcy , receiver ship, default or similar event involving  a major financial institution,
or changes in the regulatory environment, can limit the ability or willingness of financial institutions to enter
into financial transactions with us, including to provide banking or related cash management services, or to
extend credit on terms commercially acceptable to us or at all; can leave us with reduced borrowing capacity
or exposed to certain  currencies or price  risk associated with forecasted purchas es of raw materials, including
through our use of fixed-price contracts  and purchase orders, pricing agreements and derivative instruments,
including swaps and futures; or can result in a decline in the market value  of our investments in debt
securities, resulting in an adverse impac t on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Similar
risks exist  with respect to our customers, suppliers, bottlers, contract manufa cturers, distributors and joint
venture partners and can result in their inability to obtain credit to purchase our products or to finance the
manufacture and distribution of our products resulting in canceled orders and/or product delays, which can
also have an adverse impact on our business, reputation, financial condition or results of operations.
Our business and reputation can suffer if we are unable to protect our information systems against, or
effectively respond to, cyberattacks or other cyber incidents or if our information systems, or those of our
customers, supplier s, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other third
parties, are otherwise disrupted.
We depend on infor mation systems and technology , some of which are provided by third parties, including
public websites and cloud-based services, for many activities important to our business, including: to
interface with our customers and consumers; to engage in marketing activities; to enable and improve the
effectiveness of our operations; to order and manage materials from supplie rs; to manage inventory; to
manage and operate our facilities; to conduct research and development, including through the use of data
analytics; to maintain accurate financial records; to achieve operational efficiencies; to comply with
regulatory , financial  reporting, legal and tax requirements; to collect and store sensitive data and confidential
information; to communicate electronic ally among our global operations and with our employees and the
employees of our customers,
19
Table of Contents
suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacture rs, distributors, joint venture partners and other third parties; and to
communicate with our investors.
Cyberattacks and other cyber incidents are occurring more frequently , are constantly evolving in nature, are
becoming more sophisticated and are being carried out by groups and individuals (including criminal
hackers, hacktivists, state-sponsored actors, criminal and terrorist organizations, individuals or groups
participating in organized crime and insiders) with a wide range of expertise and motives (including
monetization of corporate, payment or other internal or personal data, theft of computing resources, notoriety ,
financial fraud, operational disruption, theft of trade secrets and intellectual property for competitive
advantage and leverage for political, social, economic and environmental reasons). Such cyberattacks and
cyber incidents can take many forms including cyber extortion, denial of service, social engineering, such as
impersonation and identity takeover attempts to fraudulently induce empl oyees or others to disclose
information or unwittingly provide access to systems or data, introduction of viruses or malware, such as
ransomware, exploi ting vulnerabilities in hardware, software or other infrastructure, hacking, website
defacement or theft of passwords and other credentials, unauthorized use of computing resources for digital
currency mining and business email compromises. As with other global companies, we are regularly subject
to cyberat tacks, including many of the types of attacks described above. Althou gh we incur significant costs
in protecting against or remediating cyberattacks or other cyber incidents, no cyberattack or other cyber
incident has, to our knowledge, had a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of
operations to date.
If we do not allocate and effectively manage the resources necessary to build and maintain our information
technology infrastru cture, including monitoring networks and systems, upgrading our security policies and
the skills and training of our employees, and requiring our third-party service providers, customers, suppliers,
bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other third parties to do the same, if we
or they fail to timely identify or appropriately respond to cyberattacks or other cyber incidents, or if our or
their infor mation systems are damaged, compromised, destroyed or shut down (whether as a result of natural
disasters, fires, power outages, acts of terrorism or other catastrophic events, network outages, software,
equipment or telecommunications failures, technology development defects, user errors, lapses in our
controls or the malicious or negligent actions of employees (including misuse of information they are entitled
to access) , or from deliberate cyberatt acks such as malicious or disruptive software, phishing, denial of
service attacks, malicious social engineering, hackers or otherwise), our business can be disrupted and,
among other things, be subject to: transaction errors or financial loss; processing inefficiencies; the loss of, or
failure to attract, new customers and consumers; lost revenues or other costs resulting from the disruption or
shutdown of computer systems or other  information technology systems at our offices, plants, warehouses,
distribution centers or other facilities, or the loss of a competitive advantage due to the unauthorized use,
acquisition or disclosure of, or access to, confidential information; the incurrence of costs to restore data and
to safeguard against future extortion attempts; the loss of, or damage to, intellectual property or trade secrets,
including the loss or unauthorized disclosure of sensitive data or other assets; alteration, corruption or loss of
accounting, financial or other data on which we rely for financial reporting and other purposes, which can
cause errors or delays in our financial reporting; damage to our reputation or brands; damage to employee,
customer and consumer relations; litigation; regulatory enforcement actions or fines; unauthorized disclosure
of confide ntial personal information of our employees, customers or consum ers; the loss of information
and/or business operations disruption resulting from the failure of security patches to be developed and
installed on a timely basis; violation of data privacy , security or other laws and regulations; and remediation
costs.
Further , our information systems and those of our third-party providers, and the information stored therein
can be compromised, including through cyberattacks or other external or internal methods, resulting in
unauthorized parties  accessing or extracting sensitive data or confidential inform ation. In the ordinary course
of business, we receive, process, transmit and store information relating to identifiable individuals, primarily
employees and former employees. Privacy and data protection laws may be interpreted and applied
differently from country to country or, within the United States, from state to state, and can create
inconsistent or
20
Table of Contents
conflicting requirements. Our efforts to comply with privacy and data protection laws, including with respect
to data from residents of the European Union who are covered by the General Data Protection Regulation,
which went into effect in May 2018, and residents of the State of Californ ia covered by the California
Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, which went into effect on January 1, 2020, impose significant costs or
challenges that are likely to increase over time. Failure to comply with existing or future data privacy laws
and regulations can result in litigation, claims, legal or regulatory proceedings, inquiries or investigations.
We contin ue to devote significant resour ces to network security , backup and disaster recovery , enhancing our
internal controls, and other security measures, including training, to protect our systems and data. In addition,
our risk management program also includes periodic review and discussion by our Board of Directors of
analyses of emer ging cybersecurity threats and our plans and strategies to address them. However , these
security measures and processes cannot provide absolute security or guarantee that we will be successful in
preventing or responding to every such breach or disruption. In addition, due to the constantly evolving
nature of these security threats, the form and impact of any future incident cannot be predicted.
Similar risks exist with respect to the cloud-based service providers and other third-party vendors that we rely
upon for aspects of our information technology support services and administrative functions, including
payroll processing, health and benefit plan administration and certain finance and accounting functions, and
systems managed, hosted, provided and/or used by third parties and their vendors. The need to coordinate
with vario us third-party vendors may complicate our efforts to resolve any issues that arise. As a result, we
are subject to the risk that the activities associated with our third-party vendors may adversely affect our
business even if the attack or breach does not directly impact our systems or information. Moreover , our
increased use of mobile and cloud technologies has heightened these and other operational risks, as certain
aspects of the security of such technologies are complex, unpredictable or beyond our control.
While we currently  maintain insurance coverage that, subject to its terms and conditions, is intended to
address costs associated with certain aspects of cyber incidents, network failures and data privacy-related
concerns, this insurance coverage may not, depending on the specific facts and circumstances surrounding an
incident, cover all losses or all types of claims that arise from an incident, or the damage to our reputation or
brands that may result from an incident.
Our business, financial condition or results of operations may be adversely  affected by increased costs,
disruption of supply or shortages of raw materials, energy and other supplies.
We and our business partners use various raw materials, energy and other supplies in our business. The
principal ingredients we use in our beverage, food and snack products are apple, orange and pineapple juice
and other juice conc entrates, aspartame, corn, corn sweeteners, flavorings, flour , grapefruit, oats, oranges and
other fruits, potatoes, raw milk, rice, seasonings, sucralose, sugar , vegetable and essential oils, and wheat.
Our key packaging materials include plastic resins, including PET and polypro pylene resins used for plastic
beverage bottles and film packaging used for snack foods, aluminum used for cans, glass bottles, closures,
cardboard and paperboard cartons. In addition, we continue to integrate recyclability into our product
development proces s and support the increased use of recycled content, including recycled PET, in our
packaging. Fuel, electricity and natural gas are also important commodities for our businesses due to their use
in our and our business partners’  facilities and the vehicles delivering our products.
Some of these raw materials and supplies are sourced from countries experiencing civil unrest, political
instability or unfavorable economic conditions, and some are available from a limited number of suppliers or
a sole supplier or are in short supply when seasonal demand is at its peak. We cannot assure that we will be
able to maintain favorable arrangements and relationships with these suppliers or that our contingency plans,
including development of ingredients, materials or supplies to replace ingredients, materials or supplies
sourced from such suppliers, will be effective in preventing disruptions that may arise from shortages or
discontinuation of any ingredient that is sourced from such suppliers. In addition, increasing focus on climate
21
Table of Contents
change, deforestation, the use of plastics and energy, animal welfare and human rights concerns and other
risks associated with the global food system is leading to increased activism focusing on consumer goods
companies, governmental intervention and consumer response, and can adversely affect our or our suppliers’
reputation and business and our ability  to procure the materials we need to operate our business. The raw
materials and energy, including fuel, that we use for the manufacturing, produ ction and distribution of our
products are largely commodities that are subject to price volatility and fluctuations in availability caused by
many factors, including changes in global supply and demand, weather conditions (including any potential
effects of climate change), fire, natural disasters (such as a hurricane, tornado, earthquake, wildfire or
flooding), disease or pests (including the impact of greening disease on the citrus industry), agricultural
uncertainty , health epidemics or pandem ics or other contagious outbreaks, such as the recent coronavirus,
governmental incent ives and controls (including import/export restrictions, such as new or increased tariffs,
sanctions, quotas or trade barriers), limited or sole sources of supply , political uncertainties, acts of terrorism,
governmental instability or currency exchange rates. For example, concerns regarding trade relations between
the United States and China escalated during fiscal 2019, with the United States imposing tariffs on the
importation of certain Chinese goods and retaliatory Chinese tariffs on U.S. goods. Higher duties on existing
tariffs or additional tariffs imposed by the United States on a broader range of imports, or further retaliatory
trade measures taken by China or other countries in response, could result in an increase in supply chain costs
that we are not able to offset or otherwise adversely impact our results of operations. Shortage of some of
these raw materials and other supplies, sustained interruption in their supply or an increase in their costs can
adversely affect our business, financia l condition or results of operations. Many of our ingredients, raw
materials and commodities are purchased in the open market. The prices we pay for such items are subject to
fluctuation, and we manage this risk through the use of fixed-price contracts and purchase orders, pricing
agreements and derivative instruments, including swaps and futures. If comm odity price changes result in
unexpected or significant increases in raw materials and energy costs, we may be unwilling or unable to
increase our product prices or unable to effectively hedge against commodity price increases to offset these
increased costs without suffering reduce d volume, revenue, margins and operating results. In addition, certain
of the derivatives used to hedge price risk do not qualify for hedge accounting  treatment and, therefore, can
result in increased volatility in our net earnings in any given period due to changes in the spot prices of the
underlying commodities.
Water scarcity can have an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
We and our suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers, joint venture partners and other third parties use water
in the manufacturing of our products. Water is a limited resource in many parts of the world. The lack of
available water of acceptable quality , increasing focus by governmental and non-governmental organizations,
investors, customers  and consumers on water scarcity and increasing pressure to conserve and replenish
water in areas of scarcity and stress may lead to: supply chain disruption; advers e effects on our operations or
the operations of our suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributor , joint venture partners or other
third parties; higher compliance costs; capital expenditures (including additional investments in the
development of technologies to enhance  water efficiency and reduce water consumption); higher production
costs, including less favorable pricing for water; the cessation of operations at, or relocation of, our facilities
or the facilities of our suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other
third parties; failure to achieve our sustainability goals relating to water use; perception (whether or not valid)
of our failure to act responsibly with respect to water use or to effectively respon d to new, or changes in, legal
or regulatory requirements concerning water scarcity; or damage to our reputation, any of which can
adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Business disruptions can have an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of
operations.
22
Table of Contents
Our ability , and that of our suppliers and other third parties, including our bottlers, contract manufacturers,
distributors, joint venture partners and customers, to make, manufacture, transport, distribute and sell
products in our portfolio is critical to our success. Damage or disruption to our or their operations has
occurred in the past and could continue to occur due to any of the following factors which can impair the
ability to make, manufacture, transport, distribute or sell products in our portfolio: adverse weather
conditions (including any potential effects of climate change) or natural disasters, such as a hurricane,
tornado, earthquake , wildfire or flooding; government action; economic or political uncertainties or
instability in countries in which such products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold, which may also
affect our ability to protect the security of our assets and employees; fire; terrorism; outbreak or escalation of
armed hostilities; food safety warnings or recalls, whether related to products in our portfolio or otherwise;
health epidemics or pandemics or other contagious outbreaks, such as the recent coronavirus; supply and
commodity shortages; unplanned delays or unexpected problems associated with repairs or enhancements of
facilities in which such products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold; loss or impairment of key
manufacturing sites; cyber incidents, including the disruption or shutdown of computer systems or other
information technol ogy systems at our offices, plants, warehouses, distribution centers or other facilities or
those of our suppliers and other third parties who make, manufacture, transport, distribute and sell products in
our portfolio; industrial accidents or other occupational health and safety issues; telecommunications failures;
power , fuel or water shortages; strikes, labor disputes or lack of availability of qualified personnel, such as
truck drivers; or other reasons beyond our control or the control of our suppliers and other third parties.
Failure to take adeq uate steps to mitigate the likelihood or potential impact of such events, or to effectively
manage such events if they occur , has in the past resulted and could continue to result in adverse effects on
our busine ss, financial condition or results of operations, as well as require additional resources to restore
operations.
Product contamination or tampering or issues or concerns with respect to product quality , safety and
integrity can adversely af fect our business, reputation, financial condition or results of operations.
Product contamination or tampering, the failure to maintain high standards for product quality , safety and
integrity , including with respect to raw materials and ingredients obtained from suppliers, or allegations
(whether or not valid) of product quality issues, mislabeling, misbranding, spoil age, allergens, adulteration or
contamination with respect to products in our portfolio may reduce demand for such products, and cause
production and delivery disruptions or increase costs, which can adversely affect our business, reputation,
financial condition or results of operations. If any of the products in our portfo lio are mislabeled or become
unfit for consumptio n or cause injury , illness or death, or if appropriate resourc es are not devoted to product
quality and safety (particularly as we expand our portfolio into new categories) or to comply with changing
food safety requirements, we can decide to, or be required to, recall products in our portfolio and/or we may
be subject to liability or government action, which can result in payment of damages or fines, cause certain
products in our portfolio to be unavailable for a period of time, result in destru ction of product inventory , or
result in adverse publicity (whether or not valid), which can reduce consum er demand and brand equity .
Moreover , even if allegations of product contamination or tampering or suggestions that our products were
not fit for consumption are meritless, the negative publicity surrounding assertions against us or products in
our portfolio or processes can adversely affect our reputation or brands. Our business can also be adversely
affected if consumers lose confidence in product quality , safety and integrity generally , even if such loss of
confidence is unrelated to products in our portfolio. Any of the foregoing can adversely affect our business,
reputation, financial condition or results of operations. In addition, if we do not have adequate insurance, if
we do not have enforceable indemnific ation from suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors,
joint venture partners or other third parties or if indemnification is not available, the liability relating to such
product claims or disruption as a result of recall efforts can materially adversely affect our business, financial
condition or results of operations.
Any dama ge to our reputation or brand image can adversely affect our business, financial condition or
results of operations.
23
Table of Contents
We are a leading global beverage, food and snack company with brands that are respected household names
throughout the world. Maintaining a good reputation globally is critical to selling our branded products. Our
reputation or brand image has in the past and could continue to be advers ely impacted by any of the
following, or by adverse publicity (whether or not valid) relating thereto: the failure to maintain high ethical,
social and environmental practices for all of our operations and activities, including with respect to human
rights, child labor laws and workplace conditions and safety , or failure to require our suppliers or other third
parties to do so; the failure to achieve our goals of reducing added sugars, sodiu m and saturated fat in certain
of our products and of growing our portf olio of product choices; the failure to achieve our other sustainability
goals, including with respect to plastic packaging, or to be perceived as appropriately addressing matters of
social responsibility; the failure to protect our intellectual property , including in the event our brands are used
without our authorization; health concerns (whether or not valid) about our products or particular ingredients
or substances in, or attributes of, our products, including concerns regarding whether certain of our products
contribute to obesity; the imposition or proposed imposition of new or increased taxes, labeling requirements
or other limitations on, or pertaining to, the sale, display or advertising of our products; any failure to comply ,
or perception of a failure to comply , with our policies and goals, including those regarding advertising to
children and reducing calorie consumption from sugar -sweetened beverages; our research and development
efforts; the recall (voluntary or otherw ise) of any products in our portfolio; our environmental impact,
including use of agricultural materials, plastics or other packaging, water , energy use and waste management;
any failure to achieve our goals with respect to reducing our impact on the environment, including the
recyclability or recoverability of our packaging, or perception of a failure to act responsibly with respect to
water use and the environment; any failure to achieve our goals with respect to human rights throughout our
value chain; the practices of our employees, agents, customers, suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers,
distributors, joint venture partners or other third parties (including others in our industry) with respect to any
of the foregoing, actual or perceived; consumer perception of our industry; consumer perception of our
advertising campaigns, sponsorship arrangements or marketing programs; consumer perception of our use of
social media; consumer perception of statements made by us, our employees and executives, agents,
customers, suppliers , bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture  partners or other third parties
(including others in our industry); or our responses or the responses of others in our industry to any of the
foregoing.
In addition, we operate globally , which  requires us to comply with numerous local regulations, including,
without limitation, anti-corruption laws,  competition laws and tax laws and regulations of the jurisdictions in
which our products are made, manufac tured, distributed or sold. In the event that we or our employees or
agents engage in or are believed to have engaged in improper activities, we have in the past and could
continue to be subject to regulatory proceedings, including enforcement action s, litigation, loss of sales or
other consequences, resulting in damage to our reputation in the United States or abroad. Failure to comply
with local laws and regulations, to main tain an effective system of internal control or to provide accurate and
timely financial information can also hurt our reputation.
Further , the popularity of social media and other consumer -oriented technologies has increased the speed and
accessibility of information disseminati on. As a result, negative or inaccurate posts or comments about us,
our products, policies, practices, advertising campaigns and marketing programs or sponsorship
arrangements; our use of social media or of posts or other information dissemin ated by us or our employees,
agents, customers, suppliers, bottlers, contract manufacturers, distributors, joint venture partners or other
third parties; consumer perception of any of the foregoing, or failure by us to respond effectively to any of the
foregoing, has in the past and could continue to also generate adverse publicity (whether or not valid) that can
damage our reputation.
Damage to our reputation or brand image or loss of consumer confidence in our products or employees for
any of these or other reasons has in the past and could continue to result in decreased demand for our
products,
24
Table of Contents
resulting in adverse effects on our business, financial condition or results of operations, as well as requiring
additional resources to rebuild our reputation.
Failure to successfully complete or integrate acquisitions and joint ventures into our existing operations,
or to complete or effectively manage divestitures or refranchisings, can adversely affect our business,
financial condition or results of operations.
We regularly review our portfolio of businesses and evaluate potential acquisitions, joint ventures,
divestitures, refranch isings and other strategic transactions. Issues associated with these activities have in the
past and could continue to include, among other things: our ability to realize the full extent of the expected
returns, benefits, cost savings or syner gies as a result of a transaction, within the anticipated time frame, or at
all; receipt  of necessary consents, cleara nces and approvals in connection with a transaction; and diversion of
management’ s attention from day-to-day operations.
With respe ct to acquisitions, the following factors also have in the past and could continue to pose additional
risk risks: our abilit y to successfully combine our businesses with the business of the acquired company ,
including integratin g the acquired company’ s manufacturing, distribution, sales, accounting, financial
reporting and administrative support activities and information technology systems with our company; our
ability to successful ly operate in new categories or territories; motivating, recruiting and retaining executives
and key employees (both of the acqu ired company and our company); conforming standards, controls
(including internal control over financi al reporting and disclosure controls and procedures, environmental
compliance, health and safety complian ce and compliance with other laws and regulations), procedures and
policies, business cultures and compensation structures between us and the acquired company; consolidating
and streamlining corporate and admini strative infrastructures and avoiding increased operating expenses;
consolidating sales and marketing operations; retaining existing customers and attracting new customers;
retaining existing distributors; identifyi ng and eliminating redundant and underperforming operations and
assets; coordinating geographically dispersed organizations; managing tax costs or inefficiencies associated
with integ rating our operations following completion of an acquisition; and other unanticipated problems or
liabilities, such as contingent liabilities and litigation.
With respect to joint ventures, we share ownership and management responsibility with one or more parties
who may or may not have the same goals, strategies, priorities, resources or values as we do. Joint ventures
are intend ed to be operated for the benefit of all co-owners, rather than for our exclusive benefit. Business
decisions or other actions or omissions of our joint venture partners have in the past and could continue to
adversely affect the value of our investment, result in litigation or regulatory action against us or otherwise
damage our reputation and brands and adversely affect our business, finan cial condition or results of
operations.
In addition, acquisitions and joint ventures outside of the United States increase our exposure to risks
associated with operations outside of the United States, including fluctuations in exchange rates and
compliance with the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and other anti-corruption and anti-bribery laws and laws
and regulations outside the United States.
With respect to divestitures and refran chisings, we have in the past and could continue to be unable to
complete or effectively manage such transactions on terms commercially favorable to us or at all, resulting in
failure to achieve the anticipated benef its or cost savings from the divestiture or refranchising. Further , as
divestitures and refranchisings reduce our direct control over certain aspects of our business, any failure to
maintain good relations with divested or refranchised businesses in our supply or sales chain can adversely
impact our sales or business performance.
Acquisitions or joint ventures that are not successfully completed, integrated into our existing operations or
managed ef fectively , or divestitures or refranchisings that are not successfully completed or managed
25
Table of Contents
effectively or do not result in the benefits or cost savings we expect, have in the past and could continue to
result in adverse ef fects on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
A change  in our estimates and underlying assumptions regarding the future performance of our
businesses can result in an impairment charge that materially af fects our results of operations.
We conduct impairment tests on our goodwill, indefinite-lived intangible assets, as well as other investments
and other long-lived  assets annually , during our third quarter , or more frequen tly if circumstances indicate
that the carrying value may not be recoverable and have recorded impairments in the past. Any changes in
our estimates or underlying assumptio ns regarding the future performance of our reporting units or in
determining the fair value of any such reporting unit, including goodwill, indefinite-lived intangible assets, as
well as other investments and other long-lived assets, can adversely affect our results of operations. Factors
considered to determine if an impairmen t exist include, but are not limited to: significant negative economic
or industry trends or competitive operating conditions; significant macroeconomic conditions that can result
in a future increase in the weighted-average cost of capital used to estimate fair value; and significant
changes in the nature and timing of decisions regarding assets or markets that do not perform consistent with
our expectations, including factors we use to estimate future levels of sales, operating profit or cash flows.
While no material impairment charges have been recorded in the periods presented in this Form 10-K, we
may in the future record impairment charges that have a material adverse effect on our results of operations in
the periods recognized. See Note 4 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
Increases in income tax rates, changes in income tax laws or disagreements with tax authorities can
adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.  
We are subject to income taxes in the United States and in certain foreign jurisdictions in which we operate.
Increases in income tax rates or other changes in income tax laws in any particular jurisdiction can reduce our
after-tax income from such jurisdiction  and adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of
operations. Our operations outside the United States generate a significant portion of our income. In addition,
existing tax laws in the United States and many of the other countries in which our products are made,
manufactured, distributed or sold, including countries in which we have significant operations, have been and
could in the future be subject to significant change. For example, in December 2017, the Tax Cuts and Jobs
Act (TCJ Act) was signed into law in the United States. While our accounting for the recorded impact of the
TCJ Act is deemed to be complete, these amounts are based on prevailing regulations and currently available
information, and additional guidance issued by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) may continue to impact
our recorded amounts in future periods. In addition, on May 19, 2019, a public referendum held in
Switzerland passed the Federal Act on Tax Reform and AHV  Financing (TRAF), effective January 1,
2020. Certain provisions of the TRAF were enacted in fiscal year 2019, resulting in adjustments to our
deferred taxes. The future impact of the TRAF cannot currently be estimated and we continue to monitor and
assess the impact of TRAF on our business and financial results. For further information regarding the impact
and potential impact of the TCJ Act and the TRAF , see “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources” and “Our
Critical Accounting Policies” in Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations and Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements.
Additional changes in the U.S. tax regime or in how U.S. multinational corporations are taxed on foreign
earnings, including changes in how existing tax laws are interpreted or enforced, can adversely affect our
business, financial condition or results of operations. For example, the Organization for Economic
Cooperation and Development (OECD) has recommended changes to numerous long-standing international
tax principles through its base erosion and profit shifting (BEPS) project. These changes have been or are
being adopted by many of the countries in which we do business. In connection with the OECD’ s BEPS
project, the OECD has undertaken a new project focused on “Addressing the Tax Challenges of the
Digitalization of the Economy .” This project may impact all multinational businesses by reallocating where
some profits are taxed and implementing a global model for minimum taxation. The increasingly complex
26
Table of Contents
global tax environment  has in the past and could continue to increase tax uncertainty , resulting in higher
compliance costs and adverse effects on our provision for income taxes, results of operations and/or cash
flow.
We are also subject to regular reviews, examinations and audits by the IRS and other taxing authorities with
respect to income and non-income based taxes both within and outside the United States. In connection with
the OECD’ s BEPS project, companies  are required to disclose more information to tax authorities on
operations around the world, which may lead to greater audit scrutiny of profits earned in various countries.
Economic and political pressures to increase tax revenues in jurisdictions in which we operate, or the
adoption of new or reformed tax legislation or regulation, may make resolving tax disputes more difficult and
the final resolution of tax audits and any related litigation can differ from our historical provisions and
accruals, resulting in an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
If we are unable to recruit, hire or retain key employees or a highly skilled and diverse workforce, it can
have a negative impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Our continued growth requires us to recruit, hire, retain and develop our leadership bench and a highly skilled
and divers e workforce. We compete to recruit and hire new employees and then must train them and develop
their skills and competencies. Our employees are highly sought after by our competitors and other companies
and our continued ability to compete effectively depends on our ability to retain, develop and motivate highly
skilled personnel for all areas of our organization. Any unplanned turnover or unsuccessful implementation of
our succession plans to backfill current leadership positions, including the Chie f Executive Officer, or failure
to hire and retain a highly skilled and diverse workforce, including with key capabilities such as e-commerce
and digital marketing and data analytic skills, can deplete our institutional knowledge base, erode our
competitive advantage or result in increased costs due to increased competition for employees, higher
employee turnover or increased emplo yee benefit costs. Any of the foregoing can adversely affect our
business, reputation, financial condition or results of operations.
The loss of, or a significant reduction in sales to, any key customer can adversely affect our business,
financial condition or results of operations.
Our customers include wholesale and other distributors, foodservice customers, grocery stores, drug stores,
convenience stores,  discount/dollar stores, mass merchandisers, membership stores, hard discounters, e-
commerce retailers and authorized indep endent bottlers, among others. We must  maintain mutually beneficial
relationships with our key customers, including Wal-Mart, to compete effectively . Any inability to resolve a
significant dispute with any of our key customers, a change in the business condition (financial or otherwise)
of any of our key customers, even if unrelated to us, a significant reduction in sales to any key customer , or
the loss of any of our key customers can adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of
operations.
Disruption in the retail landscape, including rapid growth in the e-commerce channel and hard
discounters, can adversely af fect our business, financial condition or results of operations.
Our industry has been affected by changes to the retail landscape, including the rapid growth in sales through
e-commerce website s, mobile commerce applications and subscription services  as well as the integration of
physical and digital operations among retailers. We continue to make significant investments in attracting
talent to and build ing our global e-commerce and digital capabilities. Although we are engaged in e-
commerce with respect to many of our products, if we are unable to maintain and develop successful
relationships with existing and new e-commerce retailers or otherwise adapt  to the growing e-commerce
landscape, while simultaneously maintaining relationships with our key customers operating in traditional
retail channels, we may be disadvantag ed in certain channels and with certain customers and consumers,
which can adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of opera tions. In addition, the growth
in e-comm erce and hard discounters may result in consumer price deflation, which may affect our
relationships with key retail
27
Table of Contents
customers. Further , the ability of consu mers to compare prices on a real-time basis using digital technology
puts additional pressure on us to main tain competitive prices. If these e-commerce and hard discounter
retailers were to take significant additional market share away from traditional retailers and/or we fail to
adapt to the rapidly changing retail and e-commerce landscapes, including finding ways to create more
powerful digital tools and capabilities for our retail customers to enable them to grow their businesses, our
ability to maintain and grow our profitability , share of sales or volume and our business, financial condition
or results of operations could be adversely af fected.
Further , the retail landscape continues to be impacted by the increased consolidation of retail ownership and
purchasing power , particularly in North  America, Europe and Latin America, resulting in large retailers or
buying groups with increased purchasin g power , which may impact our ability to compete in these areas.
Such retailers or buying groups demand improved efficiency , lower pricing and increased promotional
programs. Further , should larger retailers increase utilization of their own distribution networks, other
distribution channels  such as e-commerc e, or private label brands, the competitive advantages we derive from
our go-to- market systems and brand equity may be eroded. In addition, such consolidation can continue to
adversely impact our smaller customers’  ability to compete effectively , resultin g in an inability on their part
to pay for our produ cts or reduced or canceled orders of our products. Further , the growth of hard discounters
that are focused on limiting the number of items they sell and selling predomina ntly private label brands may
continue to reduce our ability to sell our products through such retailers. Failure to appropriately respond to
any of the foregoing, including failure to offer effective sales incentives and marketing programs to our
customers, can reduce our ability to secure adequate shelf space and product availability at our retailers,
adversely affect our ability to maintain or grow our share of sales or volume, and adversely affect our
business, financial condition or results of operations.
Our borrowing costs and access to capital and credit markets would be adversely affected by a downgrade
or potential downgrade of our credit ratings.
Rating agencies routinely evaluate us, and their ratings of our long-term and short-term debt are based on a
number of factors, including our cash generating capability , levels of indebted ness, policies with respect to
shareholder distribu tions and our financial strength generally , as well as factors beyond our control, such as
the then-current state of the economy and our industry generally . Any downgrade of our credit ratings by a
credit rating agency , especially any downgrade to below investment grade, whether as a result of our actions
or factors which are beyond our control , can increase our future borrowing costs, impair our ability to access
capital and credit markets on terms commercially acceptable to us or at all, and result in a reduction in our
liquidity . We expect to maintain Tier 1 commercial paper access, which we believe will facilitate appropriate
financial flexibility and ready access to global credit markets at favorable interest rates. However , any
downgrade of our current short-term credit ratings can impair our ability to access the commercial paper
market with the same flexibility that we have experienced historically , and therefore require us to rely more
heavily on more expensive types of debt financing. Our borrowing costs and access to the commercial paper
market can also be adversely affected if a credit rating agency announces that our ratings are under review for
a potential downgrade. An increase in our borrowing costs, limitations on our ability to access the global
capital and credit markets or a reduction in our liquidity can adversely affect our financial condition and
results of operations.
If we are not able to successfully imple ment shared services or utilize informa tion technology systems and
networks ef fectively , our ability to conduct our business may be negatively impacted.
We have entered into agreements with third-party service providers to utilize information technology support
services and adminis trative functions in certain areas of our business, including payroll processing, health and
benefit plan administration and certain finance and accounting functions. We may enter into new or additional
agreements for shared services in other functions in the future to achieve cost savings and efficiencies as we
continue to migrate to shared business service or ganizational models across our business
28
Table of Contents
operations. In addition, we increasingly  utilize cloud-based services and system s and networks managed by
third-party vendors to process, transmit and store information and to conduct certain of our business activities
and transa ctions with employees, customers, consumers and other third parties. Failure by these third-party
service providers or vendors to perform  effectively , or our failure to adequately monitor their performance
(including compliance with service level agreements or regulatory or legal requirements), has in the past and
could continue to result in our inability to achieve the expected cost savings, additional costs to correct errors
made by such servic e providers, damage to our reputation or our being subject to litigation, claims, legal or
regulatory proceedings, inquiries or investigations. Depending on the function involved, such errors can also
lead to business disruption, processing inefficiencies, the loss of or damage to intellectual property or
sensitive data through security breaches or otherwise, incorrect or adverse effects on financial reporting,
litigation or remediation costs, damage to our reputation or have a negative impact on employee morale. In
addition, the management of multiple third-party service providers increases operational complexity and
decreases our control.
We continue on our multi-year business  transformation initiative to migrate certain of our systems, including
our financ ial processing systems, to enterprise-wide systems solutions. These systems implementations are
part of our ongoing global business transformation initiative, and we plan to continue implementing such
systems throughout other parts of our businesses. If we do not allocate and effectively manage the resources
necessary to build and sustain the proper information technology infrastructure, or if we fail to achieve the
expected benefits from this initiative, it may impact our ability to process transactions accurately and
efficiently , and remain in step with the changing needs of our business, which can result in the loss of
customers or consumers and revenue. In addition, the failure to either deliver the applications on time, or
anticipate the necessary readiness and training needs, can lead to business disruption and loss of customers or
consumers and revenue. In connection with these implementations and resulti ng business process changes,
we contin ue to enhance the design and documentation of business processes and controls, including our
internal control over financial reporting processes, to maintain effective controls over our financial reporting.
To date, this transiti on has not material ly affected, and we do not expect it to materially affect, our internal
control over financial reporting.
Fluctuations in exchange rates impact our business, financial condition and results of operations.
We hold assets, incur liabilities, earn revenues and pay expenses in a variety of currencies other than the U.S.
dollar . Because our consolidated financi al statements are presented in U.S. dollars, the financial statements of
our subsidiaries outside the United States, where the functional currency is other than the U.S. dollar , are
translated into U.S. dollars. Our opera tions outside of the United States, particularly in Mexico, Russia,
Canada, the United Kingdom, China and Brazil , generate a significant portion of our net revenue. In addition,
we purchase many of the ingredients, raw materials and commodities used in our business in numerous
markets and in nume rous currencies. Fluctuations in exchange rates, including as a result of currency controls
or other currency exchange restrictions have had, and could continue to have, an adverse impact on our
business, financial condition and results of operations.
Climate change or legal, regulatory or market measures to address climate change may negatively affect
our business and operations or damage our reputation.
There is concern that carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases in the atmosphere have an adverse impact
on global temperatures, weather patter ns and the frequency and severity of extreme weather and natural
disasters. In the event that such climate change has a negative effect on agricul tural productivity , we may be
subject to decreased availability or less favorable pricing for certain commodities that are necessary for our
products, such as sugar cane, corn, wheat, rice, oats, oranges and other fruits and potatoes. Natural disasters
and extreme weather conditions, such as a hurricane, tornado, earthquake, wildfire or flooding, may disrupt
the productivity of our facilities or the operation of our supply chain and unfavorably impact the demand for,
or our consumers’  ability to purchase, our products.
29
Table of Contents
Concern over climate change may result in new or increased regional, federal and/or global legal and
regulatory requirements to reduce or mitigate the effects of greenhouse gases. In the event that such
regulation is more stringent than current regulatory obligations or the measures that we are currently
undertaking to monitor and improve our energy efficiency , we may experience  disruptions in, or significant
increases in our costs of, operation and delivery and be required to make additional investments in facilities
and equipment or relocate our facilities. In particular , increasing regulation of fuel emissions can substantially
increase the cost of energy, including fuel, required to operate our facilities or transport and distribute our
products, thereby substantially increasing the distribution and supply chain costs associated with our
products. As a result, the ef fects of climate change can negatively af fect our business and operations
In addition, any failure to achieve our goals with respect to reducing our impact on the environment or
perception (whether  or not valid) of our failure to act responsibly with respect to the environment or to
effectively respond to new, or changes in, legal or regulatory requirements concerning climate change can
lead to adverse publicity , resulting in an adverse effect on our business, reputation, financial condition or
results of operations.
There is also increa sed focus, including by governmental and non-governme ntal organizations, investors,
customers and consumers on these and other environmental sustainability matters, including deforestation,
land use, climate impact and recyclabil ity or recoverability of packaging, including plastic. Our reputation
can be damaged if we or others in our industry do not act, or are perceived not to act, responsibly with respect
to our impact on the environment.
A portion of our workforce is represented by unions. Failure to successfully negotiate collective
bargaining agreements, or strikes or work stoppages, can cause our business to suf fer.
Many of our employ ees are covered by collective bargaining agreements, and other employees may seek to
be covered by collec tive bargaining agreements. Strikes or work stoppages or other business interruptions can
occur if we are unable to renew these agreements on satisfactory terms or enter into new agreements on
satisfactory terms or if we are unable to otherwise manage changes in, or that affect, our workforce, which
can impair manufacturing and distributi on of our products or lead to a loss of sales, resulting in an adverse
impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations. The terms and conditions of existing,
renegotiated or new collective bargaining agreements can also increase our costs or otherwise affect our
ability to fully implement future operational changes to enhance our efficiency or to adapt to changing
business needs or strategy .
If we are not able to adequately protect our intellectual property rights or if we are found to infringe the
intellectual property rights of others, the value of our products or brands, or our competitive position, can
be reduced, resulting in an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
We possess intellectual property rights that are important to our business. These intellectual property rights
include ingredient formulas, trademarks , copyrights, patents, business processes and other trade secrets that
are important to our business and relate to a variety of our products, their packaging, the processes for their
production and the design and operat ion of various equipment used in our businesses. We protect our
intellectual property rights globally through a combination of trademark, copyright, patent and trade secret
laws, third-party assignment and nondisclosure agreements and monitoring of third-party misuses of our
intellectual property , although the laws of various jurisdictions have differing levels of protection of
intellectual property . If we fail to obtain or adequately protect our trademarks, copyrights, patents, business
processes and trade secrets, including our ingredient formulas, or if there is a change in law that limits or
removes the current legal protections of our intellectual property , the value of our products and brands, or our
competitive position, can be reduced, resulting in an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or
results of operations . In addition, if, in the course of developing new products or improving the quality of
existing products, we are found to have infringed the intellectual property rights of others, directly or
indirectly ,
30
Table of Contents
such findi ng can have an adverse impact on our business, reputation, financial condition or results of
operations and may limit our ability to introduce new products or improve the quality of existing products.
Potential liabilities and costs from litigation, claims, legal or regulatory proceedings, inquiries or
investigations can have an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
We and our subsidiaries are party to a variety of litigation, claims, legal or regulatory proceedings, inquiries
and invest igations, including but not limited to matters related to our advertisi ng, marketing or commercial
practices, product labels, claims and ingredients including sugar , sodium and saturated fat, our intellectual
property rights, alleged infringement or misappropriation by us of intellectu al property rights of others,
environmental, priva cy, employment, tax and insurance matters and matters relating to our compliance with
applicable laws and regulations. We evaluate such matters to assess the likelihood of unfavorable outcomes
and estimate, if possible, the amount of potential losses and establish reserves as appropriate. These matters
are inhere ntly uncer tain and there is no guarantee that we will be successful in defending ourselves in these
matters, or that our assessment of the materiality of these matters and the likely outcome or potential losses
and established reserves will be consistent with the ultimate outcome of such matters. In the event that
management’ s assessment of actual or potential claims and proceedings proves inaccurate or litigation,
claims, proceedings, inquiries or investigations that are material arise in the future, there may be a material
adverse effect on our business, financia l condition or results of operations. Responding to litigation, claims,
proceedings, inquiri es, and investigations, even those that are ultimately non-me ritorious, requires us to incur
significant expense and devote significant resources, and may generate adverse publicity that damages our
reputation or brand image, resulting in an adverse impact on our business, financial condition or results of
operations.
Many factors can adversely af fect the price of our publicly traded securities.
Many factors can adversely affect the price of our common stock and publicly traded debt. Such factors,
some of which are beyond our control, have in the past and could continue to include, but are not limited to:
unfavorable econom ic conditions; changes in financial or tax reporting and changes in accounting principles
or practices that materially affect our reported financial condition and results; investor perceptions of our
business, strategies and performance or those of our competitors; actions by shareholders or others seeking to
influence our business strategies; specul ation by the media or investment community regarding our business,
strategies and performance or those of our competitors; developments relating to pending litigation, claims,
inquiries or investigations; changes in laws and regulations applicable to our products or business operations;
trading activity in our securities or trading activity in derivative instruments with respect to our securities;
changes in our credit ratings; the impact of our share repurchase programs or dividend policy; and the
outcome of referenda and elections. In addition, corporate actions, such as those  we have or have not taken in
the past or may or may not take in the future as part of our continuous review of our corporate structure and
our strateg y, including as a result of business, legal, regulatory and tax considerations, have not and may not
in the future have the impact we intend, resulting in adversely effects on the price of our securities. The above
factors, as well as the other risks includ ed in this “Item 1A. Risk Factors,” can adversely affect the price of
our securities.
Item 1B. Unr esolved Staff Comments.
We have received no written comments regarding our periodic or current reports from the staff of the SEC
that were issued 180 days or more preceding the end of our 2019  year and that remain unresolved.
31
Table of Contents
Item 2. Pr operties.
Our princi pal executive office located in Purchase, New York and our facilities located in Plano, Texas, all of
which we own, are our most significant corporate properties.
In connection with making, marketin g, distributing and selling our products, each division utilizes
manufacturing, processing, bottling and production plants, warehouses, distribut ion centers, storage facilities,
offices, including division headquarters, research and development facilities and other facilities, all of which
are either owned or leased.
Significant properties by division are as follows:
•FLNA ’s research and development facility in Plano, Texas, which is owned.
•QFNA ’s food plant in Cedar Rapids, Iowa, which is owned.
•PBNA ’s research and development facility in Valhalla, New York, and a Tropicana plant in Bradenton,
Florida, both of which are owned.
•LatAm’ s three snack plants in Mexico (one in Celaya and two in Vallejo), all of which are owned.
•Europe’ s snack plant in Kashira, Russia , its dairy plant in Moscow , Russia, and its fruit juice plant in
Zeebrugge, Belgium, all of which are owned.
•AMESA ’s snack plant in Riyadh, Saudi Arabia, which is leased.
•APAC’s snack plant in Wuhan, China, which is owned.
•Our primary concentrate plants in Cork, Ireland and in Singapore, all of which are either owned or
leased. Our concentrate plants in Cork, Ireland are shared by our PBNA, Europe and AMESA
segments and our concentrate plant in Singapore is shared by our PBNA  and APAC segments.
•A shared service center in Winston-Sale m, North Carolina, which is primarily shared by our FLNA,
QFNA  and PBNA  segments, which is leased.
Most of our plants are owned or leased on a long-term basis. In addition to company-owned or leased
properties described  above, we also utilize a highly distributed network of plants, warehouses and distribution
centers that are owned or leased by our contract manufacturers, co-packers , strategic alliances or joint
ventures in which we have an equity interest. We believe that our properties generally are in good operating
condition and, taken as a whole, are suitable, adequate and of suf ficient capacity for our current operations.
Item 3. Legal Pr oceedings.
We and our subsidiaries are party to a variety of litigation, claims, legal or regulatory proceedings, inquiries
and invest igations. While the results of such litigation, claims, legal or regulato ry proceedings, inquiries and
investigations canno t be predicted with certainty , management believes that the final outcome of the
foregoing will not have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations or cash
flows. See also “Item 1. Business – Regulatory Matters” and “Item 1A. Risk Factors.”
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosur es.
Not applicable.  
__________________________________________________
32
Table of Contents
Information About Our  Executive Officers
The following is a list of names, ages and backgrounds of our current executive of ficers:
Name Age Title
Marie T. Gallagher 60 Senior Vice President and Controller , PepsiCo
Hugh F . Johnston 58 Vice Chairman, PepsiCo; Executive Vice President and Chief Financial
Officer, PepsiCo
Ramon L. Laguarta 56 Chairman of the Board of Directors and Chief Executive Of ficer, PepsiCo
Silviu Popovici 52 Chief Executive Of ficer, Europe
Paula Santilli 55 Chief Executive Of ficer, Latin America
Ronald Schellekens 55 Executive Vice President and Chief Human Resources Of ficer, PepsiCo
Kirk Tanner 51 Chief Executive Of ficer, PepsiCo Beverages North America
Eugene Willemsen 52 Chief Executive Of ficer, Africa, Middle East, South Asia
Steven Williams 54 Chief Executive Of ficer, PepsiCo Foods North America
David Yawman 51 Executive Vice President, Government Affairs, General Counsel and
Corporate Secretary , PepsiCo
Marie T. Gallagher  was appointed Peps iCo’s Senior Vice President and Controller in 2011. Ms. Gallagher
joined PepsiCo in 2005 as Vice Preside nt and Assistant Controller . Prior to joining PepsiCo, Ms. Gallagher
was Assistant Controller at Altria Corpo rate Services from 1992 to 2005 and, prior to that, a senior manager
at Coopers & L ybrand.
Hugh F. Johnston  was appointed Vice Chairman, PepsiCo  in 2015 and Executive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer, PepsiCo in 2010. In addition to providing strategic financia l leadership for PepsiCo, Mr.
Johnston’ s portfolio  has included a variety of responsibilities, including leadership of the Company’ s
information technology function since 2015, the Company’ s global e-commerce business from 2015 to 2019,
and the Quaker Foods North America division from 2014 to 2016. He has also held a number of leadership
roles throughout his PepsiCo career , serving as Executive Vice President, Global Operations from 2009 to
2010, President of Pepsi-Cola North America from 2007 to 2009, Executive Vice President, Operations from
2006 to 2007, and Senior Vice President, Transformation from 2005 to 2006 . Prior to that, he served as
Senior Vice Presiden t and Chief Financi al Officer of PepsiCo Beverages and Foods from 2002 through 2005,
and as PepsiCo’ s Senior Vice President of Mergers and Acquisitions in 2002. Mr. Johnston joined PepsiCo in
1987 as a Business Planner and held various finance positions until 1999 when  he left to join Merck & Co.,
Inc. as Vice Preside nt, Retail, a position which he held until he rejoined Peps iCo in 2002. Prior to joining
PepsiCo in 1987, Mr . Johnston was with General Electric Company in a variety of finance positions.
Ramon L. Laguarta  has served as PepsiCo’ s Chief Executive Officer and a director on the Board since
October 2018, and assumed the role of Chairman of the Board in February 2019. Mr. Laguarta previously
served as President of PepsiCo from 2017 to 2018. Prior to serving as Presiden t, Mr. Laguarta held a variety
of positions of increasing responsibility in Europe, including as Commercial Vice President of PepsiCo
Europe from 2006 to 2008, PepsiCo Eastern Europe Region from 2008 to 2012, President, Developing &
Emer ging Markets, PepsiCo Europe from 2012 to 2015, Chief Executive Officer, PepsiCo Europe in 2015,
and Chief Executive Officer, Europe Sub-Saharan Africa from 2015 until 2017. From 2002 to 2006, he was
General Manager for Iberia Snacks and Juices, and from 1999 to 2001 a Genera l Manager for Greece Snacks.
Prior to joining PepsiCo in 1996 as a marketing vice president for Spain Snac ks, Mr. Laguarta worked for
Chupa Chups, S.A., where he worked in several international assignments in Asia, Europe, the Middle East
and the United States. Mr . Laguarta has served as a director of Visa Inc. since November 2019.
Silviu Popovici  was appointed Chief Executive Of ficer, Europe, ef fective August 2019. Prior to this role, he
33
Table of Contents
served as Chief Executive Officer, Europe Sub-Saharan Africa from March 2019 to August 2019 and as
President, Europe Sub-Saharan Africa  from 2017 to March 2019. Mr. Popovici previously served as
President, Russia, Ukraine and CIS (The Commonwealth of Independent States) from 2015 to 2017, and as
President, PepsiCo Russia from 2013 to 2015. Mr. Popovici joined PepsiCo in 2011 following PepsiCo’ s
acquisition of Wimm-Bill-Dann Foods OJSC (WBD) and served as General Manager , WBD Foods Division
from 2011 until 2012. Prior to the acqui sition, Mr. Popovici held senior leaders hip roles at WBD, running its
dairy business from 2008 to 201 1 and its beverages business from 2006 to 2008.
Paula Santilli  was appointed Chief Executive Officer, Latin America, effective May 2019. Previously , she
served in various leadership positions at PepsiCo Mexico Foods, as President from 2017 to 2019, as Chief
Operating Officer from 2016 to 2017 and as Vice President and General Manager from 2011 to 2016. Prior to
joining PepsiCo Mexico Foods, she held a variety of roles, including leadership positions in Beverages in
Mexico, as well as in Foods and Snacks in the Latin America Southern Cone region comprising Argentina,
Uruguay and Paraguay . Ms. Santilli joined PepsiCo in 2001 following PepsiCo’ s acquisition of the Quaker
Oats Com pany . At Quaker , she held various roles of increasing responsibility from 1992 to 2001, including
running the regional Quaker Foods and Gatorade businesses in Argentina, Chile and Uruguay .
Ronald Schellekens  was appo inted Exec utive Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer, PepsiCo,
in 2018. Prior to that, Mr. Schellekens served as Group HR Director of Vodafone Group Services Limited
from 2009 to 2018, where he was responsible for the Vodafone Human Resou rce Management function, as
well as health and safety , and property and real estate functions. Prior to joining Vodafone, Mr. Schellekens
was executive vice president, human resources for the global downstream divis ion of Royal Dutch Shell Plc.
Prior to that, he worked for PepsiCo for nine years from 1994 to 2003 in variou s international, senior human
resources roles, including assignments in Switzerland, Spain, South Africa, the United Kingdom and Poland,
where he was most recently responsible for the Europe, Middle East & Africa region for PepsiCo Foods
International. Prior to that, he served for nine years at AT&T  Inc. in Human Resources.
Kirk Tanner was appo inted Chie f Executive Officer, PepsiCo Beverages North America, effective January
2019. Prior to that, Mr. Tanner served as President and Chief Operating Officer, North America Beverages
from 2016  to 2018, Chief Operating Officer, North America Beverages and President, Global Foodservice
from 2015 to 2016, and President, Global Foodservice from 2014 to 2015. Mr. Tanner joined PepsiCo in
1992, where he has worked in numerous domestic and international locations and in a variety of roles,
including Senior Vice President of Frito- Lay North America’ s West region from 2009 to 2013, Vice President,
Sales of PepsiCo U.K. and Ireland from 2008 to 2009, Region Vice President of Frito-Lay North America’ s
Mountain region from 2005 to 2008, Region Vice President of Frito-Lay North America’ s Mid-America
region from 2002 to 2005 and Region Vice President of Frito-Lay North Ame rica’s California region from
2000 to 2002.
Eugene Willemsen was appointed Chief Executive Officer, Africa, Middle East, South Asia, effective
October 2019. Previously he served as Chief Executive Officer, Sub-Saharan Africa in 2019 and as Executive
Vice President, Global Categories and Franchise Management from 2015 to 2019. Before that, he led the
global Pepsi-Lipton Joint Venture as President from 2014 to 2015. Prior to such role, Mr. Willemsen served
as PepsiCo’ s Senior Vice President and General Manager , South East Europe from 2011 to 2013, as Senior
Vice Presi dent and General Manager , Commercial, Europe from 2008 to 2011, as Senior Vice President and
General Manager , Northern Europe from 2006 to 2008, as Vice President, General Manager , Benelux from
2000 to 2005 and as Commercial Director , Benelux for the snacks business from 1998 to 2000. Mr.
Willemsen joined PepsiCo in 1995 as a business development manager .
Steven Williams was appointed Chief Executive Officer, PepsiCo Foods North America, effective April
2019. Prior to this role, Mr. Williams served in leadership positions for Frito-Lay’ s U.S. operations, as Senior
Vice President, Commercial Sales and Chief Commercial Of ficer from 2017 to 2019 and as General Manager
34
Table of Contents
and Senior Vice President, East Division  from 2016 to 2017. Prior to that, he served as General Manager and
Senior Vice President, Customer Management for PepsiCo’ s global Walmart business from 2013 to 2016, as
Sales Senior Vice President, North American Nutrition from 2011 to 2013 and as Vice President, Sales,
Central Division from 2009 to 2011. Mr. Williams joined PepsiCo in 2001 as a part of PepsiCo’ s acquisition
of the Quaker Oats Company , which he joined in 1997 and has held leadership positions of increasing
responsibility in sales and customer management.
David Yawman  was appointed Executive Vice President, Government Affairs, General Counsel and
Corporate Secretary , PepsiCo in 2017. Prior to that, Mr. Yawman served as Senior V ice President and Deputy
General Counsel for PepsiCo and Gener al Counsel for North America and Corporate in 2017. He previously
served as Senior Vice President, PepsiCo Deputy General Counsel, General Counsel, North America
Beverages and Quaker Foods North America from 2015 to 2017, as Senior Vice President, PepsiCo Deputy
General Counsel, General Counsel, PepsiCo America Beverages from 2014 to 2015, as Senior Vice President,
PepsiCo Chief Compliance and Ethics Officer from 2012 to 2014, and as Senior Vice President, General
Counsel, Pepsi Beverages Company from 2010 to 2012. Prior to that, he served five years in the law
department of The Pepsi Bottling Group , Inc. (PBG) and, prior to that, was a member of PepsiCo’ s corporate
law department from the time he joined PepsiCo in 1998 until 2003.
Executive officers are elected by our Board of Directors, and their terms of office continue until the next
annual meeting of the Board or until their successors are elected and have qualified. There are no family
relationships among our executive of ficers.
35
Table of Contents
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder  Matters and Issuer  Purchases of
Equity Securities.
Stock Trading Symbol – PEP
Stock Exchange Listings – The Nasdaq Global Select Market is the principal market for our common stock,
which is also listed on the SIX Swiss Exchange.
Shareholders – As of February 6, 2020 , there were approx imately 109,312  shareholders of record of our
common stock.
Dividends – We have paid consecutive quarterly cash dividends since 1965. The declaration and payment of
future dividends are at the discretion of the Board of Directors. Dividends are usually declared in February ,
May, July and November and paid at the end of March, June and September and the beginning of January . On
February 10, 2020 , the Board of Directors declared a quarterly dividend of $0.955 payable March 31, 2020 ,
to shareholders of record on March 6, 2020 . For the remainder of 2020 , the recor d dates for these dividend
payments are expected to be June 5, September 4 and December 4, 2020 , subject to approval  of the Board of
Directors. On February 13, 2020 , we annou nced a 7% increase in our annualized dividend to $4.09 per share
from $3.82  per share, effective with the dividend expected to be paid in June 2020 . We expect to return  a total
of approximately $7.5 billion to shareholders in 2020  through share repurchases of approximately $2 billion
and dividends of approximately $5.5 billion.
For inform ation on securities authorize d for issuance under our equity compensation plans, see “Item 12.
Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.”
A summary of our common stock repurchases (in millions, except average price per share) during the fourth
quarter of 2019  is set forth in the table below .
Issuer  Purchases of Common Stock
PeriodTotal
Number  of
Shar es
Repur chased(a)Average
Price Paid
Per Shar eTotal Number  of
Shar es
Purchased as
Part of Publicly
Announced Plans
or ProgramsMaximum Number  (or
Appr oximate
Dollar  Value) of
Shar es that May Yet Be
Purchased Under  the
Plans or  Programs
9/7/2019   $ 11,783
   
9/8/2019 - 10/5/2019 1.5 $ 135.74 1.5 (204)
   11,579
10/6/2019 - 1 1/2/2019 1.3 $ 136.76 1.3 (170)
   11,409
11/3/2019 - 1 1/30/2019 1.5 $ 133.90 1.5 (202)
   11,207
12/1/2019 - 12/28/2019 0.9 $ 136.52 0.9 (123)
Total 5.2 $ 135.58 5.2 $ 11,084
(a)All shares were repurchased in open market transactions pursuant to the $15 billion repurchase program authorized by our
Board of Directors and publicly announced on February 13, 2018, which commenced on July 1, 2018 and will expire on June
30, 2021. Shares repurchased under this program may be repurchased in open market transactions, in privately negotiated
transactions, in accelerated stock repurchase transactions or otherwise.
36
Table of Contents
Item 6. Selected Financial Data.
Five-Y ear Summary
(unaudited, in millions except per share amounts)  
The following selected financial data should be read in conjunction with “Item 7. Management’ s Discussion
and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations,” our consolidated financial statements and
accompanying notes  thereto. Our fiscal year ends on the last Saturday of each December and our fiscal year
2016 comprised fifty-three reporting weeks while all other fiscal years presented in the tables below
comprised fifty-two reporting weeks.
 2019 2018 2017 2016 2015
Net revenue (a)$ 67,161$ 64,661 $ 63,525$ 62,799 $ 63,056
Operating profit $ 10,291$ 10,110 $ 10,276$ 9,804 $ 8,274
Provision for/(benefit from) income taxes (b)$ 1,959$ (3,370) $ 4,694$ 2,174 $ 1,941
Net income attributable to PepsiCo (b)$ 7,314$ 12,515 $ 4,857$ 6,329 $ 5,452
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common
share – basic (b)$ 5.23$ 8.84 $ 3.40$ 4.39 $ 3.71
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common
share – diluted (b)$ 5.20$ 8.78 $ 3.38$ 4.36 $ 3.67
Cash dividends declared per common share $ 3.7925$ 3.5875 $ 3.1675$ 2.96 $ 2.7625
Total assets (c)$ 78,547$ 77,648 $ 79,804$ 73,490 $ 68,976
Long-term debt obligations $ 29,148$ 28,295 $ 33,796$ 30,053 $ 29,213
(a) Our 2016 results included  an extra week of results (53rd reporting week). The 53rd reporting week increased  2016 net revenue by $657
million, including $294 million in our FLNA  segme nt, $43 million in our QFNA  segment, $300 million in our PBNA  segment and $20
million in our Europe segment.
(b) Our 2019, 2018 and 2017 results included the impact of the TCJ Act. Additionally , our 2018 results includ ed other net tax benefits related to
the reor ganization of our international operations. See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
(c) During the first quarter of 2019, we prospectively adopted the guidance requiring lessees to recognize most leases on the balance sheet. See
Note 2 and Note 13 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
The following information highlights certain items that impacted our results of operations and financial
condition for the five years presented above:
 2019
 Operating
profit  Other
pension
and r etiree
medical
benefits
expense(Provision
for)/benefit
from income
taxes(d) Net income
attributable to
noncontr olling
inter ests  Net income
attributable
to PepsiCo  Net income
attributable
to PepsiCo
per common
share –
diluted
Mark-to-market net impact (e)$ 112 $ — $ (25) $ — $ 87 $ 0.06
Restructuring and impairment charges
(f) $ (368) $ (2)$ 67 $ 5 $ (298) $ (0.21)
Inventory fair value adjustments and
merger and integration charges (g)$ (55) $ — $ 8 $ — $ (47) $ (0.03)
Pension-related settlement charges (h)$ — $ (273)$ 62 $ — $ (211) $ (0.15)
Net tax related to the TCJ Act (i)$ — $ — $ 8 $ — $ 8 $ 0.01
Gains on sales of assets (j)$ 77 $ — $ (19) $ — $ 58 $ 0.04
37
Table of Contents
 2018
 Operating
profit  Other
pension
and
retiree
medical
benefits
incomeInterest
expenseBenefit
from/(provision
for) income
taxes(d) Net income
attributable to
noncontrolling
interests  Net income
attributable
to PepsiCo  Net income
attributable to
PepsiCo per
common
share –
diluted
Mark-to-market net impact (e)$(163) $ — $ — $ 38 $ — $ (125) $ (0.09)
Restructuring and impairment
charges (f)$(272) $(36)$ — $ 56 $ 1 $ (251) $ (0.18)
Merger and integration charges
(g) $ (75) $ — $ — $ —  $ — $ (75) $ (0.05)
Net tax related to the TCJ Act (i)$ — $ — $ — $ 28 $ — $ 28 $ 0.02
Other net tax benefits (k)$ — $ — $ — $ 5,064 $ — $ 5,064 $ 3.55
Charges related to cash tender
and exchange offers (l)$ — $ — $ (253)$ 62 $ — $ (191) $ (0.13)
Tax reform bonus (m)$ (87) $ — $ — $ 21 $ — $ (66) $ (0.05)
Gains on beverage refranchising
(n) $ 202 $ — $ — $ (30) $ — $ 172 $ 0.12
Gains on sale of assets (j)$ 76 $ — $ — $ (19) $ — $ 57 $ 0.04
 2017
 Operating
profitOther
pension and
retiree
medical
benefits
income  (Provision
for)/benefit from
income taxes(d) Net income
attributable to
PepsiCoNet income
attributable to
PepsiCo per
common
share –
diluted
Mark-to-market net impact (e)$ 15$ — $ (7) $ 8$ 0.01
Restructuring and impairment charges (f)$ (229)$ (66) $ 71 $ (224)$ (0.16)
Provisional net tax related to the TCJ Act (i)$ — $ — $ (2,451) $ (2,451)$ (1.70)
Gain on sale of Britvic plc (Britvic) securities (o)$ 95$ — $ (10) $ 85$ 0.06
Gain on beverage refranchising (n)$ 140$ — $ (33) $ 107$ 0.07
Gain on sale of assets (j)$ 87$ — $ (25) $ 62$ 0.04
 2016
 Operating
profit  Other
pension
and
retiree
medical
benefits
expenseInterest
expense(Provision
for)/benefit
from income
taxes(d)Net income
attributable to
noncontrolling
interests  Net income
attributable to
PepsiCo  Net income
attributable to
PepsiCo per
common
share –
diluted
Mark-to-market net impact (e)$ 167 $ — $ — $ (56)$ —  $ 111 $ 0.08
Restructuring and impairment
charges (f)$(155) $ (5)$ — $ 26 $ 3 $ (131) $ (0.09)
Charge related to the transaction
with Tingyi (p)$(373) $ — $ — $ — $ —  $ (373) $ (0.26)
Charge related to debt
redemption (l)$ — $ — $ (233)$ 77 $ —  $ (156) $ (0.11)
Pension-related settlement charge
(h) $ — $(242)$ — $ 80 $ —  $ (162) $ (0.11)
53rd reporting week (q)$ 126 $ — $ (19)$ (44)$ (1) $ 62 $ 0.04
38
Table of Contents
 2015
 Operating
profitOther
pension and
retiree
medical
benefits
income  (Provision
for)/benefit from
income taxes(d)Net income
attributable to
PepsiCo  Net income
attributable to
PepsiCo per
common
share –
diluted
Mark-to-market net impact (e)$ 11$ — $ (3)$ 8 $ —
Restructuring and impairment charges (f)$ (207)$ (23) $ 46$ (184) $ (0.12)
Charge related to the transaction with Tingyi (p)$ (73)$ — $ — $ (73) $ (0.05)
Pension-related settlement benefits (h)$ 67$ — $ (25)$ 42 $ 0.03
Venezuela impairment charges (r)$(1,359)$ — $ — $ (1,359) $ (0.91)
Tax benefit (k)$ — $ — $ 230$ 230 $ 0.15
Müller Quaker Dairy (MQD) impairment (s)$ (76)$ — $ 28$ (48) $ (0.03)
Gain on beverage refranchising (n)$ 39$ — $ (11)$ 28 $ 0.02
Other productivity initiatives (t)$ (90)$ — $ 24$ (66) $ (0.04)
Joint venture impairment charge (u)$ (29)$ — $ — $ (29) $ (0.02)
(d) Provision for/benefit from income taxes is the expected tax charge/benefit on the underlying item based on the tax laws and income tax rates
applicable to the underlying item in its corresponding tax jurisdiction and tax year .
(e) Mark-to-market net gains and losses on commodity derivatives in corporate unallocated expenses.
(f) Expenses related to the 2019 Multi-Y ear Productivity Plan (2019 Productivity Plan), 2014 Multi-Y ear Productivity Plan (2014 Productivity
Plan) and 2012 Multi-Y ear Productivity Plan (2012 Productivity Plan). See Note 3 to our consolidate d financial statements for further
discussion of our 2019 and 2014 Productivity Plans.
(g) In 2019, inventory fair value adjustments and merger and integration charges primarily related to our acquisition of SodaStream. $46 million
of this charge was recorded  in our Europe segment, $7 million  in our AMES A segment and $2 million  in corporate unallocated expenses. In
2018, merger and integrat ion charges related to our acquisition of SodaStream. $57 million  of this charge was recorded in our Europe
segment, with the balance  recorded in corporate unallocated expenses. See Note 14 to our consolidate d financial statements for further
information.
(h) In 2019 , pension settlement charges of $220 million related to the purchase of a group annuity contract and settlement charges of $53 million
related to one-time lump sum payments to certain former employees who had vested benefits , record ed in other pension and retiree medical
benefits expense/income. See Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.  In 2016, pension settleme nt charge
related to the purchase of a group annuity contract. In 2015, benefits in the PBNA  segment associated with the settlement of pension-related
liabilities from previous acquisitions.
(i) In 2019, 2018 and 2017, net tax related to the TCJ Act. See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
(j) In 2019, gains associated with the sale of assets in the following segments: $31 million  in FLNA  and $46 million  in PBNA. In 2018, gains
associated with the sale of assets in the following segments: $64 million  in PBNA  and $12 million  in AMESA. In 2017, gains associated with
the sale of assets in the following segments: $17 million in FLNA, $21 million in PBNA, $21 millio n in AMESA  and $28 million in
corporate unallocated expenses.
(k) In 2018, other net tax benefits of $4.3 billion  resulting from the reorganization of our internationa l operations, including the intercompany
transfer of certain intangib le assets. Also in 2018, non-cash tax benefits of $717 million  associ ated with both the conclusion of certain
international tax audits and our agreement with the IRS resolving all open matters related to the audits of taxable years 2012 and 2013. See
Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for further information. In 2015, non-cash tax benefit associated with our agreement with the
IRS resolving substantially all open matters related  to the audits for taxable years 2010 through 2011, which reduced our reserve for
uncertain tax positions for the tax years 2010 through 201 1.
(l) In 2018, interest expense in connection with our cash tender and exchange offers, primarily representing the tender price paid over the
carrying value of the tendered notes. See Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.  In 2016, interest expense
primarily representing the premium paid in accordance with the “make-whole” redemption provisions to redeem all of our outstanding
7.900% senior notes due 2018 and 5.125% senior notes due 2019 for the principal amounts of $1.5 billion and $750 million, respectively .
(m) In 2018, bonus extended to certain U.S. employees related to the TCJ Act in the following segments: $44 million in FLNA, $2 million in
QFNA  and $41 million  in PBNA.
(n) In 2018 , gains of $58 million and $144 million  associ ated with refranchising our entire beverage bottling operations and snack distribution
operations in Czech Repub lic, Hungary and Slovakia (CHS) in the Europe segment and refranchising a portion of our beverage business in
Thailand in the APAC segm ent, respectively . In 2017 , gain in the AMESA  segment associated with refranchising a portion of our beverage
business in Jordan. See Note 14 to our consolidated financial statements. In 2015, gain in the AMESA  segment associated with refranchising
a portion of our beverage businesses in India.
(o) In 2017, gain in the Europe segment associated with the sale of our minority stake in Britvic.
(p) In 2016, impairment charge in the APAC segment to reduce the value of our 5% indirect equity interest in KSF Beverage Holding Co., Ltd.
(KSFB), form erly known as Tingyi-Asahi Beverages Holding Co. Ltd., to its estimated fair value. In 2015,  write-of f in the APAC segment of
the value of a call option to increase our holding in KSFB to 20%.
(q) Our 2016 results included the 53rd reporting week, the impact of which was fully of fset by incremental investments in our business.
39
Table of Contents
(r) In 2015, charges in the LatAm segment related to the impairment of investments in our wholly-owned Venezuelan subsidiaries and beverage
joint venture. Beginning in the fourth quarter of 2015, our financial results have not included the results of our Venezuelan businesses.
(s) In 2015 , impairment charges in the QFNA  segment associated with our MQD joint venture investment, including a charge related to ceasing
its operations.
(t) In 2015, expenses related to other productivity initiatives outside the scope of the 2014 and 2012 Productivity Plans.
(u) In 2015, impairment char ge in the AMESA  segment associated with a joint venture in the Middle East.
40
Table of Contents
Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
OUR BUSINESS  
Executive Overview 42
Our Operations 42
Other Relationships 43
Our Business Risks 43
OUR FINANCIAL RESULTS  
Results of Operations – Consolidated Review 47
Results of Operations – Division Review 48
FLNA 51
QFNA 52
PBNA 52
LatAm 53
Europe 53
AMESA 54
APAC 55
Results of Operations – Other Consolidated Results 56
Non-GAAP Measures 57
Items Affecting Comparability 59
Our Liquidity and Capital Resources 63
Return on Invested Capital 66
OUR CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES  
Revenue Recognition 67
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets 68
Income Tax Expense and Accruals 69
Pension and Retiree Medical Plans 70
Consolidated Statement of Income 73
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income 74
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows 75
Consolidated Balance Sheet 76
Consolidated Statement of Equity 77
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements  
Note 1 – Basis of Presentation and Our Divisions 78
Note 2 – Our Significant Accounting Policies 82
Note 3 – Restructuring and Impairment Charges 86
Note 4 – Property, Plant and Equipment and Intangible Assets 90
Note 5 – Income Taxes 93
Note 6 – Share-Based Compensation 97
Note 7 – Pension, Retiree Medical and Savings Plans 100
Note 8 – Debt Obligations 107
Note 9 – Financial Instruments 109
Note 10 – Net Income Attributable to PepsiCo per Common Share 114
Note 11 – Preferred Stock 114
Note 12 – Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss Attributable to PepsiCo 115
Note 13 – Leases 116
Note 14 – Acquisitions and Divestitures 118
Note 15 – Supplemental Financial Information 120
Note 16 – Selected Quarterly Financial Data (unaudited) 121
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 123
GLOSSARY 127
41
Table of Contents
Our discussion and analysis is intended to help the reader understand our results of operations and financial
condition and is provided as an addition to, and should be read in connection with, our consolidated
financial statements and the accompanying notes. Definitions of key terms can be found in the glossary .
Unless otherwise noted, tabular dollars are presented in millions, except per share amounts. All per share
amounts reflect common stock per share amounts, assume dilution unless other wise noted, and are based on
unrounded amounts. Per centage changes ar e based on unr ounded amounts.
OUR BUSINESS
Executive Overview
PepsiCo is a leading global food and beverage company with a complementary portfolio of brands, including
Frito-Lay , Gatorade,  Pepsi-Cola, Quaker and Tropicana. Through our operations , authorized bottlers, contract
manufacturers and other third parties, we make, market, distribute and sell a wide variety of convenient
beverages, foods and snacks, serving customers and consumers in more than 200 countries and territories
Everything we do is driven by an approach we call Winning with Purpose. Winning with Purpose is our guide
for achieving accelerated, sustainable growth that includes our mission, to Create More Smiles with Every
Sip and Every Bite; our vision, to Be the Global Leader in Convenient Foods and Beverages by Winning with
Purpose; and The PepsiCo Way, seven behaviors that define our shared culture.
Winning with Purpo se is designed to help us meet the needs of our shareholders, customers, consumers,
partners and communities, while caring for our planet and inspiring our associates.
This strate gy is also designed to addres s key challenges facing our Company , including: shifting consumer
preferences and behaviors; a highly competitive operating environment; a rapid ly changing retail landscape,
including the growth in e-commerce; continued macroeconomic and political volatility; and an evolving
regulatory landscape.
To adapt to these challenges, we intend to continue to focus on becoming Faster , Stronger , and Better:
•Faster by winning in the marketplace, being more consumer -centric and accelerating investment for
topline growth. This includes broadening our portfolios to win locally in convenient foods and
beverages, fortifying  our North American businesses, and accelerating our international expansion,
with disciplined focus on markets where we see a strong likelihood of prevailing over our
competition.
•Stronger by continuing to transform our capabilities, cost, and culture by leveraging scale and
technology in global markets across our operations and winning locally . This includes continuing to
focus on driving savings through holistic cost management to reinvest to succeed in the marketplace,
developing and scaling core capabilities through technology , and building differentiated talent and
culture.
•Better by continuing to focus our sustainability agenda on helping to build a more sustainable food
system and investing in six priority areas: next generation agriculture, water stewardship, plastic
packaging, products, climate change, and people.
We believe these priorities will position our Company for long-term sustainable growth.
See also “Item 1A. Risk Factors” for further information about risks and uncertainties that the Company
faces.
Our Operations
See “Item 1. Busin ess” for information on our divisions and a description of our distribution network,
ingredients and other supplies, brands and intellectual property rights, seasonality , customers and
competition. In addition, see Note 1 to our consolidated financial statements for financial information about
our divisions and geographic areas.
42
Table of Contents
Other  Relationships
Certain members of our Board of Directors also serve on the boards of certain vendors and customers. These
Board members do not participate in our vendor selection and negotiations nor in our customer negotiations.
Our transactions with these vendors and customers are in the normal course of business and are consistent
with terms negotiated with other vendors and customers. In addition, certain of our employees serve on the
boards of Pepsi Bottling Ventures LLC and other affiliated companies of PepsiCo and do not receive
incremental compensation for such services.
Our Business Risks
We are subject to risks in the normal course of business. During the periods presented in this report, certain
jurisdictions in which our products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold operated in a challenging
environment, experiencing unstable economic, political and social conditions, civil unrest, natural disasters,
debt and credit issues, and currency controls or fluctuations. We continue to monitor the economic, operating
and political environment in these markets closely and to identify actions to potentially mitigate any
unfavorable impacts on our future results.
In addition, certain jurisdictions in which our products are made, manufactu red, distributed or sold have
either imposed, or are considering imposing, new or increased taxes or regulations on the manufacture,
distribution or sale of our products or their packaging, ingredients or substances contained in, or attributes of,
our produc ts or their packaging, commo dities used in the production of our products or their packaging or the
recyclability or recoverability of our packaging. These taxes and regulations vary in scope and form. For
example, some taxes apply to all beve rages, including non-caloric beverages, while others apply only to
beverages with a caloric sweetener (e.g., sugar). In addition, some regulation s apply to all products using
certain types of packaging (e.g., plastic), while others are designed to increase the sustainability of packaging,
encourage waste reduction and increase d recycling rates or facilitate waste management process or restrict
the sale of products in certain packaging.
We sell a wide variety of beverages, foods and snacks in more than 200 countries  and territories and the
profile of the produc ts we sell, the amount of revenue attributable to such produ cts and the type of packaging
used varies by jurisdiction. Because of this, we cannot predict the scope or form potential taxes, regulations
or other limitations on our products or their packaging may take, and therefore cannot predict the impact of
such taxes, regulations or limitations on our financial results. In addition, taxes, regulations and limitations
may impact us and our competitors differently . We continue to monitor existing and proposed taxes and
regulations in the jurisdictions in which  our products are made, manufactured , distributed and sold and to
consider actions we may take to potentially mitigate the unfavorable impact, if any, of such taxes, regulations
or limitati ons, inclu ding advocating alternative measures with respect to the imposition, form and scope of
any such taxes, regulations or limitations.
In addition, our industry continues to be affected by disruption of the retail landscape, including the rapid
growth in sales through e-commerce websites and mobile commerce applications, including through
subscription services, the integration of physical and digital operations among retailers and the international
expansion of hard discounters. We continue to monitor changes in the retail landscape and to identify actions
we may take to build our global e-commerce and digital capabilities, distribute our products effectively
through all existing and emer ging chann els of trade and potentially mitigate any unfavorable impacts on our
future results.
During the fourth quarter of 2017, the TCJ Act was enacted in the United States. Our provisional
measurement period ended in the fourth  quarter of 2018 and while  our accounting for the recorded impact  of
the TCJ Act was deemed to be complete , additional guidance issued by the IRS impacted, and may continue
to impact, our recorded amounts after December 29, 2018. For further information, see “Our Liquidity and
Capital Resources,” “Our Critical Accounting Policies” and Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements.
43
Table of Contents
On May 19, 2019, a public referendum held in Switzerland passed the TRAF , effective  January 1, 2020. The
enactment of certain provisions of the TRAF in 2019 resulted in adjustments to our deferred taxes. During
2019 , we recor ded net tax expense of $24 million  related to the impact of the TRAF . Enactment of the TRAF
provisions subseque nt to December 28, 2019 is expected to result in adjustments  to our consolidated financial
statements and related disclosures in future periods. The future impact of the TRAF cannot currently be
reasonably estimated ; we will continue to monitor and assess the impact the TRAF may have on our business
and financial results.  See “Our Critical Accounting Policie s” and Note 5 to our consolidated financial
statements for further information.
See also “Item 1A. Risk Factors,” “Executive Overview” above and “Market Risks” below for more
information about these risks and the actions we have taken to address key challenges.
Risk Management Framework
The achie vement of our strategic and operating objectives involves taking risks and that those risks may
evolve over time. To identify , assess, prioritize, address, manage, monitor and communicate these risks across
the Company’ s operations, we leverage an integrated risk management framew ork. This framework includes
the following:
•PepsiCo’ s Board of Directors has oversight responsibility for PepsiCo’ s integra ted risk management
framework. One of the Board’ s primary responsibilities is overseeing and interacting with senior
management with respect to key aspect s of the Company’ s business, including risk assessment and
risk mitiga tion of the Company’ s top risks. The Board receives updates on key risks throughout the
year, including risks related to cybersecurity . In addition, the Board has tasked designated
Committees of the Board with overs ight of certain categories of risk management, and the
Committees report to the Board regularly on these matters.
◦The Audit Committee of the Board reviews and assesses the guidelines and policies
governing PepsiCo’ s risk management and oversight processes, and assists the Board’ s
oversight of financial, compliance and employee safety risks facing PepsiCo;
◦The Com pensation Committee of the Board reviews PepsiCo’ s employee compensation
policies and practices to assess whether such policies and practices could lead to unnecessary
risk-taking behavior;
◦The Nominating and Corporate Govern ance Committee assists the Board in its oversight of
the Comp any’s governance structure and other corporate governance matters, including
succession planning; and
◦The Public Policy and Sustainability Committee of the Board assists the Board in its
oversight of PepsiCo’ s policies, programs and related risks that concern key sustainability
and public policy matters.
•The Pepsi Co Risk Committee (PRC), which is comprised of a cross-functional, geographically
diverse, senior mana gement group, including PepsiCo’ s Chairman of the Board  and Chief Executive
Officer, meets regul arly to identify , assess, prioritize and address top strategic,  financial, operating,
compliance, safety , reputational and other risks. The PRC is also responsible for reporting progress
on our risk mitigation ef forts to the Board;
•Division and key country risk committees, comprised of cross-functional senio r management teams,
meet regularly to identify , assess, prioritize and address division and country-specific business risks;
•PepsiCo’ s Risk Management Office, which manages the overall risk management process, provides
ongoing guidance, tools and analytical support to the PRC and the division and key country risk
committees, identifies and assesses potential risks and facilitates ongoing communication between
44
Table of Contents
the parties, as well as with PepsiCo’ s Board of Directors, the Audit Committee of the Board and
other Committees of the Board;
•PepsiCo’ s Corporate Audit Departmen t evaluates the ongoing effectiveness of our key internal
controls through periodic audit and review procedures; and
•PepsiCo’ s Compliance & Ethics and Law Departments lead and coordinate our compliance policies
and practices.
Market Risks
We are exposed to market risks arising from adverse changes in:
•commodity prices, af fecting the cost of our raw materials and ener gy;
•foreign exchange rates and currency restrictions; and
•interest rates.
In the normal course of business, we manage commodity price, foreign exchange and interest rate risks
through a variety of strategies, including productivity initiatives, global purch asing programs and hedging.
Ongoing productivity initiatives involve  the identification and effective implementation of meaningful cost-
saving opportunities or efficiencies, including the use of derivatives. Our global purchasing programs include
fixed-price contracts and purchase orders and pricing agreements. See “Item 1A. Risk Factors” for further
discussion of our market risks, and see “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources” for further information on our
non-cancelable purchasing commitments.
The fair value of our derivatives fluctuates based on market rates and prices. The sensitivity of our
derivatives to these market fluctuations is discussed below . See Note 9 to our consolidated financial
statements for further discussion of these derivatives and our hedging policies. See “Our Critical Accounting
Policies” for a discussion of the exposure of our pension and retiree medical plan assets and liabilities to risks
related to market fluctuations.
Inflationary , deflatio nary and recessionary conditions impacting these market risks also impact the demand
for and pricing of our products. See “Item 1A. Risk Factors” for further discussion.
Commodity Prices
Our commodity derivatives had a total notional value of $1.1 billion  as of December 28, 2019  and
December 29, 2018 . At the end of 2019 , the potential change in fair value of commodity derivative
instruments, assumi ng a 10% decrease in the underlying commodity price, would have increased our net
unrealized losses in 2019  by $106 million .
Foreign Exchange
Our operations outside of the United States generated 42% of our consolidated net revenue in 2019 , with
Mexico, Russia, Canada, the United Kingdom, China and Brazil , collectively , comprising approximately 22%
of our consolidated  net revenue in 2019 . As a result, we are exposed to foreign exchange risks in the
international markets in which our produ cts are made, manufactured, distributed or sold. Additionally , we are
exposed to foreign exchange risk from net investments in foreign subsidiaries , foreign currency purchases,
foreign currency assets and liabilities created in the normal course of business, as well as the proposed
acquisition of Pioneer Foods. During 2019 , unfavora ble foreig n exchange reduced net revenue growth by 2
percentage points, reflecting declines in the euro, Turkish lira, Brazilian real, Russian ruble and Argentine
peso. Currency declines against the U.S. dollar which are not offset could adversely impact our future
financial results.
45
Table of Contents
In addition, volatile economic, political and social conditions and civil unrest in certain markets in which our
products are made, manufactured, distributed or sold, including in Argentina, Brazil, China, Mexico, the
Middle East, Russia and Turkey , and currency controls or fluctuations in certain of these international
markets, continue to, and the threat or imposition of new or increased tariffs or sanctions or other impositions
in or related to these international markets may, result in challenging operating environments. We also
continue to monitor the economic and political developments related to the United Kingdom’ s withdrawal
from the European Union, including how the United Kingdom will interact  with other European Union
countries following its departure, as well as the economic, operating and political environment in Russia and
the potential impact for the Europe segment and our other businesses.
Our foreign currency derivatives had a total notional value of $1.9 billion  as of December 28, 2019  and $2.0
billion  as of December 29, 2018 . At the end of 2019 , we estim ate that an unfavorable 10% change in the
underlying exchange rates would have increased our net unrealized losses in 2019  by $135 million .
The total notional amount of our debt instruments designated as net investment hedges was $2.5 billio n as of
December 28, 2019  and $0.9 billion  as of December 29, 2018 .
Inter est Rates
Our interest rate derivatives had a total notional value of $5.0 billio n as of December 28, 2019  and $10.5
billion  as of December 29, 2018 . Assuming year-end 2019  investment levels and variable rate debt, a 1-
percentage-point increase in interest rates would have decreased our net interest expense in 2019  by $25
million  due to higher cash and cash equivalents as compared with our variable rate debt.
46
Table of Contents
OUR FINANCIAL  RESUL TS
Results of Operations — Consolidated Review
Volume
Beverage volume reflects sales of concentrate and beverage products bearing company-owned or licensed
trademarks to authorized bottlers, indepe ndent distributors and retailers. Concentrate beverage volume is sold
to franchised-owned  bottlers and independent distributors. Finished goods beverage volume is sold to
retailers and independent distributors and includes direct shipments to retailers. Beverage volume is measured
in bottler case sales (BCS), which converts all beverage volume to an 8-ounce-case metric. We believe that
BCS is a valuable measure as it quantifies the sell-through of our beverage products at the customer level. In
our franchised-owned business, beverage revenue is based on concentrate shipments and equivalents (CSE),
representing physical concentrate volume shipments to such customers. As a result, for our franchise-owned
businesses, BCS and CSE are not typically equal during any given period due to seasonality , timing of
product launches, product mix, bottler inventory practices and other factors.  Sales of products from our
unconsolidated joint ventures are reflected in our reported volume. PBNA, LatAm, Europe, AMESA  and
APAC, either indepe ndently or in conjunction with third parties, make, market, distribute and sell ready-to-
drink tea products through a joint venture with Unilever (under the Lipton brand name), and PBNA, either
independently or in conjunction with third parties, makes, markets, distributes and sells ready-to-drink coffee
products through a joint venture with Starbucks. In addition, APAC licenses the Tropicana brand for use in
China on co-branded juice products in connection with a strategic alliance with Tingyi.
Food and snack volume is reported on a system-wide basis, which includes our own sales and the sales by our
noncontrolled affiliates of snacks bearin g company-owned or licensed trademarks. In addition, FLNA  makes,
markets, distributes and sells Sabra refrigerated dips and spreads through a joint venture with Strauss Group.
Servings
Since our divisions each use different measures of physical unit volume (i.e., kilos, gallons, pounds and case
sales), a common servings metric is necessary to reflect our consolidated  physical unit volume. Our
divisions’  physical volume measures are converted into servings based  on U.S. Food and Drug
Administration guidelines for single-serving sizes of our products.
In 2019 , total servings increased 4% compared  to 2018 , prim arily reflecting our acquisition of SodaStream.
In 2018, total servings increased 1% compared to 2017.
Consolidated Net Revenue and Operating Profit
      Change
 2019  2018  2017 2019  2018
Net revenue $67,161  $ 64,661 $63,525 4 % 2 %
Operating profit $10,291  $ 10,110 $10,276 2 % (2)%
Operating profit margin 15.3% 15.6% 16.2% (0.3) (0.5)
See “Resu lts of Operations – Division Review” for a tabular presentation and discussion of key drivers of net
revenue.
47
Table of Contents
2019
Operating profit grew 2% and operating profit margin declined 0.3 percentag e points. Operating profit
growth was driven by productivity savin gs of more than $1 billion and net revenue growth, partially offset by
certain operating cost increases, a 5-percentage-point impact of higher commodity costs and higher
advertising and marketing expenses. The operating profit margin decline primar ily reflects higher advertising
and marketing expenses.
Favorable mark-to-m arket net impact on commodity derivatives included in corporate unallocated expenses
(see “Item s Affecting Comparability”) contributed 3 percentage points to operating profit growth. Gains on
the refran chising of a portion of our beverage business in Thailand and our entire beverage bottling
operations and snack distribution operations in CHS in the prior year reduced operating profit growth by 2
percentage points.
2018
Operating profit decreased 2% and operating profit margin declined 0.5 percentage points. The operating
profit performance was driven by certain operating cost increases and a 6-percentage-point impact of higher
commodity costs, partially of fset by productivity savings of more than $1 billion and net revenue growth.
The impac t of refranchising a portion of our beverage business in Jordan in 2017 and a 2017 gain associated
with the sale of our minority stake in Britvic negatively impacted operating profit performance by 2.5
percentage points. These impacts were offset by a 2-percentage-point positiv e impact of refranchising a
portion of our beverage business in Thailand and our entire beverage bottling operations and snack
distribution operations in CHS in 2018. Items affecting comparability (see “Items Affecting Comparability”)
negatively impacted operating profit performance by 3 percentage points and decreased operating profit
margin by 0.5 percentage points, primarily due to higher mark-to-market net impact on commodity
derivatives included in corporate unallocated expenses.
Results of Operations — Division Review
During the fourth quarter of 2019, we realigned certain of our reportable segm ents to be consistent with a
recent strategic realignment of our organizational structure and how our Chief Executive Officer assesses the
performance of, and allocates resources to, our reportable segments. Our historical segment reporting
presented in this report has been retrospectively revised to reflect the new organizational structure.  See “Our
Operations” in “Item 1. Business” for further information.
See “Non-GAAP  Measures” and “Items  Affecting Comparability” for a discussion of items to consider when
evaluating our results and related information regarding measures not in accordance with U.S. Generally
Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP).
In the discussions of net revenue and operating profit below , “effective net pricing” reflects the year-over -
year impact of discrete pricing actions , sales incentive activities and mix resulting from selling varying
products in different package sizes and in different countries, and “net pricing” reflects the year-over -year
combined impact of list price changes, weight changes per package, discounts and allowances. Additionally ,
“acquisitions and divestitures” reflect all mergers and acquisitions activit y, including the impact of
acquisitions, divestitures and change s in ownership or control in consolidated subsidiaries and
nonconsolidated equity investees .
48
Table of Contents
Net Revenue and Organic Revenue Growth
Organic revenue growth is a non-GAAP  financial measure. For further information on organic revenue
growth, see “Non-GAAP  Measures.”
 2019
  Impact of  Impact of
 Reported
% Change,
GAAP
Measure  Foreign
exchange
translationAcquisitions
and
divestituresOrganic
% Change,
Non-GAAP
Measure(a)Volume(b)Effective net
pricing
FLNA 4.5 % — — 4.5% 2 3
QFNA 1 % — — 1% — 1
PBNA 3 % — (1) 3% (1) 4
LatAm 3 % 4 — 7% — 7
Europe 7 % 5 (6) 5.5% (1) 6
AMESA — % 2 4 6% 4 2.5
APAC 4.5 % 3 2 9% 7 2
Total 4 % 2 (1) 4.5% 0.5 4
 2018
  Impact of  Impact of
 Reported
% Change,
GAAP
MeasureForeign
exchange
translation Acquisitions
and
divestituresSales and
certain other
taxes  Organic
% Change,
Non-GAAP
Measure(a)Volume(b)Effective net
pricing
FLNA 3.5 % —  — — 3 % 1 2
QFNA (1.5)% —  — — (2)% (0.5) (1)
PBNA 1 % —  — — 0.5 % (1) 2
LatAm 2 % 6 — — 8 % 1 7
Europe 4 % 2 — 0.5 7 % 5 3
AMESA (0.5)% 2 4 — 5 % 1.5 4
APAC (3)% (1) 11 0.5 8 % 6 2
Total 2 % 1 1 — 4 % 1 3
(a) Amounts may not sum due to rounding.
(b) Excludes the impact of acquisitions and divestitures. In certain instances, volume growth varies from the amounts disclosed in the following
divisional discussions due to nonconsolidated joint venture volume, and, for our beverage businesses, temporary timing differences between
BCS and CSE, as well as the mix of beverage volume sold by our company-owned and franchise-owned bottlers. Our net revenue excludes
nonconsolidated joint venture volume, and, for our franchise-owned beverage businesses, is based on CSE.
49
Table of Contents
Operating Profit, Operating Profit Adjusted for Items Affecting Comparability and Operating Profit
Growth Adjusted for Items Affecting Comparability on a Constant Currency Basis
Operating profit adjusted for items affecting comparability and operating profit growth adjusted for items
affecting comparabi lity on a constant currency basis are both non-GAAP  financial measures. For further
information on these measures see “Non-GAAP  Measures” and “Items Affecting Comparability .”
Operating Pr ofit and Operating Pr ofit Adjusted for Items Affecting Comparability
2019
 Items Affecting Comparability(a) 
Reported, GAAP
Measur eMark-to-market
net impact  Restructuring and
impairment charges  Inventory fair
value
adjustments
and merger  and
integration
charges  Core,
Non-GAAP
Measur e
FLNA $ 5,258 $ — $ 22 $ — $ 5,280
QFNA 544 — 2 — 546
PBNA 2,179 — 51 — 2,230
LatAm 1,141 — 62 — 1,203
Europe 1,327 — 99 46 1,472
AMESA 671 — 38 7 716
APAC 477 — 47 — 524
Corporate unallocated expenses (1,306 ) (112) 47 2 (1,369 )
Total $ 10,291 $ (112) $ 368  $ 55 $ 10,602
2018
 Items Affecting Comparability(a) 
Reported,
GAAP  MeasureMark-to-market
net impactRestructuring and
impairment char ges Merger and
integration
charges  Core,
Non-GAAP
Measure
FLNA $ 5,008 $ — $ 36 $ — $ 5,044
QFNA 637 — 7 — 644
PBNA 2,276 — 88 — 2,364
LatAm 1,049 — 40 — 1,089
Europe 1,256 — 59 57 1,372
AMESA 661 — 18 — 679
APAC 619 — 14 — 633
Corporate unallocated expenses (1,396 ) 163 10 18 (1,205 )
Total $ 10,110 $ 163 $ 272  $ 75 $ 10,620
2017
  Items Affecting Comparability(a) 
Reported,
GAAP  Measure  Mark-to-market net
impactRestructuring
and impairment
chargesCore,
Non-GAAP
Measure
FLNA $ 4,793  $ — $ 54 $ 4,847
QFNA 640  — 9 649
PBNA 2,700  — 43 2,743
LatAm 924  — 56 980
Europe 1,199  — 53 1,252
AMESA 789  — 2 791
APAC 401  — (5) 396
Corporate unallocated expenses (1,170 ) (15) 17 (1,168 )
Total $ 10,276  $ (15)$ 229 $ 10,490
(a)See “Items Affecting Comparability.”
50
Table of Contents
Operating Profit Growth and Operating Profit Growth Adjusted for Items Affecting Comparability on a
Constant Curr ency Basis
 2019
  Impact of Items Affecting Comparability(a) Impact of   
 Reported %
Change,
GAAP
Measur eMark-to-
market net
impact  Restructuring
and impairment
charges  Inventory fair
value
adjustments
and merger
and
integration
charges  Core
% Change,
Non-GAAP
Measur e(b)Foreign
exchange
translation  Core
Constant
Curr ency
% Change,
Non-GAAP
Measur e(b)
FLNA 5 % — — — 5 % — 5 %
QFNA (15)% — (0.5) — (15)% — (15)%
PBNA (4)% — (1) — (6)% — (6)%
LatAm 9 % — 2 — 10 % 2 13 %
Europe 6 % — 2 (1) 7 % 5 13 %
AMESA 1.5 % — 3 1 5.5 % 2.5 8 %
APAC (23)% — 6 — (17)% 2 (16)%
Corporate unallocated
expenses (6)% 22 (3) 1 14 % — 14 %
Total 2 % (3) 1 — — % 1 1 %
 2018
 Impact of Items Affecting Comparability(a) Impact of  
 Reported
% Change,
GAAP
MeasureMark-to-
market net
impact  Restructuring
and impairment
charges  Merger and
integration
chargesCore
% Change,
Non-GAAP
Measure(b)Foreign
exchange
translationCore Constant
Currency
% Change,
Non-GAAP
Measure(b)
FLNA 4.5 % — — — 4 % — 4 %
QFNA — % — — — (1)% — (1)%
PBNA (16)% — 2 — (14)% — (14)%
LatAm 13 % — (2) — 11 % 2 13 %
Europe 5 % — — 4 10 % 3 13 %
AMESA (16)% — 2 — (14)% — (14)%
APAC 54 % — 5 — 60 % (2) 58 %
Corporate unallocated
expenses 19 % (15) 1 (1.5) 3 % — 3 %
Total (2)% 2 — 1 1 % 0.5 2 %
(a)See “Items Affecting Comparability” for further information.
(b)Amounts may not sum due to rounding.
FLNA
2019
Net revenue grew 4.5% and volume grew 1%. The net revenue growth was driven by effective net pricing
and volume growth. The volume growth reflects mid-single-digit growth in trademark Doritos, Cheetos and
Ruffles and low-single-digit growth in variety packs, partially offset by a double-digit decline in trademark
Santitas.
Operating profit grew 5%, primarily reflecting the net revenue growth and productivity savings, partially
offset by certain operating cost increases and higher advertising and marketing expenses. Additionally , a
prior -year bonus extended to certain U.S. employees in connection with the TCJ Act contributed 1 percentage
point to operating profit growth .
51
Table of Contents
2018
Net revenue grew 3.5%, primarily reflecting effective net pricing and volum e growth. Volume grew 1%,
reflecting mid-single-digit growth in variety packs and low-single-digit growth in trademark Doritos,
partially of fset by a double-digit decline in trademark Santitas.
Operating profit grew 4.5%, primarily reflecting the net revenue growth and productivity savings, partially
offset by certain operating cost increases and a 1-percentage-point impact of a bonus extended to certain U.S.
employees related to the TCJ Act.
QFNA
2019
Net revenue grew 1% and volume was flat. The net revenue growth primarily reflects favorable mix. The
volume performance was driven by double-digit growth in trademark Gamesa and mid-single-digit growth in
Aunt Jemima mixes and syrups, offset by a mid-single-digit decline in oatmeal and a low-single-digit decline
in ready-to-eat cereals.
Operating profit decreased 15%, reflect ing certain operating cost increases, a 5-percentage-point impact of
higher commodity costs, and higher advertising and marketing expenses. These  impacts were partially offset
by productivity savings.
2018
Net revenue declined 1.5% and volume declined 0.5%. The net revenue performance reflects unfavorable net
pricing and mix and the volume decline. The volume decline was driven by a double-digit decline in
trademark Gamesa and a mid-single-dig it decline in ready-to-eat cereals, partia lly offset by mid-single-digit
growth in oatmeal.
Operating profit decreased slightly , reflecting certain operating cost increases, the net revenue performance
and a 3-percentage -point impact of higher commodity costs. These impacts were partially offset by
productivity saving s, lower advertising and marketing expenses and a 1-percentage-point positive
contribution from insurance settlement recoveries related to the 2017 earthquake in Mexico.
PBNA
2019
Net revenue grew 3%, driven by effective net pricing, partially offset by a decline in volume. Acquisitions
contributed 1 percentage point to the net revenue growth. Volume decreased 1%, driven by a 3% decline in
CSD volume, partially offset by a 2% increase in non-carbonated beverage (NCB) volume. The NCB volume
increase primarily reflected a mid-sing le-digit increase in our overall water portfolio, partially offset by a
low-single-digit decrease in our juice and juice drinks portfolio.
Operating profit decreased 4%, reflectin g certain operating cost increases, higher advertising and marketing
expenses, an 8-percentage-point impact  of higher commodity costs and the volume decline. These impacts
were partially offset by the effective net pricing and productivity savings. Year-over-year gains on asset sales
negatively contributed 1 percentage point to operating profit performance. A gain associated with an
insurance recovery positively contributed 1 percentage point to current-year operating profit performance and
was offset by less-favorable insurance adjustments compared to the prior year, which negatively impacted the
current-year operating profit performanc e by 1 percentage point. Additionally , a prior -year bonus extended to
certain U.S. employees in connection with the TCJ Act positively contributed 2 percentage points to
operating profit performance.
52
Table of Contents
2018
Net revenue grew 1%, driven by effective net pricing, partially offset by a decline in volume. Volume
decreased 1%, driven by a 3% decline in CSD volume, partially offset by a 2% increase in non-carbonated
beverage volume. The non-carbonated  beverage volume increase primarily reflected a high-single-digit
increase in our overa ll water portfolio. Additionally , a low-single-digit increase in Gatorade sports drinks was
offset by a low-single-digit decline in our juice and juice drinks portfolio.
Operating profit decreased 16%, reflecting certain operating cost increases, inclu ding increased transportation
costs, a 7-percentage-point impact of higher commodity costs and higher adverti sing and marketing expenses.
These impacts were partially offset by productivity savings and the net revenue growth. Higher gains on asset
sales positively contributed 1.5 percen tage points to operating profit perform ance. A bonus extended to
certain U.S. employees related to the TCJ Act negatively impacted operating profit performance by 1.5
percentage points and was partially offset by 2017 costs related to hurricanes which positively contributed 1
percentage point to operating profit performance.
LatAm
2019
Net revenue increased 3%, primarily reflecting effective net pricing, partially offset by a 4-percentage-point
impact of unfavorable foreign exchange.
Snacks volume experienced a slight decline, reflecting a high-single-digit decline in Brazil, partially offset by
low-single-digit growth in Mexico.
Beverage volume grew 4%, reflecting high-single-digit growth in Brazil and Guatemala, partially offset by a
mid-single-digit decline in Argentina and a low-single-digit decline in Colom bia. Additionally , Honduras
experienced low-single-digit growth and Mexico and Chile each experienced mid-single-digit growth.
Operating profit increased 9%, reflecting  the effective net pricing and productivity savings, partially offset by
certain operating cost increases and a 10-percentage-point impact of higher commodity costs largely due to
transaction-related foreign exchange. Unfavorable foreign exchange and higher restructuring and impairment
charges each reduced operating profit growth by 2 percentage points.
2018
Net reven ue grew 2%, reflecting effective net pricing, partially offset by a 6-percentage-point impact of
unfavorable foreign exchange.
Snacks volume grew 1%, reflecting low-single-digit growth in Mexico, partially offset by a mid-single-digit
decline in Brazil.
Beverage volume declined 1%, reflectin g a high-single-digit decline in Brazil,  a low-single-digit decline in
Mexico and a mid-single-digit decline in Argentina, partially offset by double-di git growth in Colombia, mid-
single-digit growth in Guatemala and low-single-digit growth in Honduras.
Operating profit increased 13%, reflecting the net revenue growth, productivity  savings and a 4-percentage-
point impact of insurance settlement recoveries related to the 2017 earthquak e in Mexico. These impacts
were partially offset by certain operating cost increases, a 14-percentage-point impact of higher commodity
costs and higher advertising and marketing expenses.
Europe
2019
Net revenue increased 7%, reflecting an 8-percentage-point impact of our SodaStream acquisition and
effective net pricing, partially of fset by a 5-percentage-point impact of unfavorable foreign exchange.
53
Table of Contents
Snacks volume grew 1%, primarily reflecting mid-single-digit growth in Poland and France and low-single-
digit grow th in Spain and the Netherland s, partially offset by a mid-single-digit decline in Turkey and a slight
decline in the United Kingdom. Additionally , Russia experienced slight growth.
Beverage volume grew 23%, primarily reflecting a 24-percentage-point impact of our SodaStream
acquisition, mid-single-digit growth in Poland and low-single-digit growth in the United Kingdom and
Germany , partially offset by a mid-single-digit decline in Russia, a high-single-digit decline in Turkey and a
slight decline in France.
Operating profit increased 6%, reflecting the net revenue growth, productivity savings and a 10-percentage-
point net impact of our SodaStream acquisition. These impacts were partially offset by certain operating cost
increases, a 10-percentage-point impact of higher commodity costs largely due to transaction-related foreign
exchange, higher advertising and marketing expenses, and a 4-percentage-point impact of a prior -year gain
on the refranchising of our entire beve rage bottling operations and snack distribution operations in CHS.
Unfavorable foreign exchange reduced operating profit growth by 5 percentage points.
2018
Net revenue increased 4%, reflecting volume growth and effective net pricing, partially offset by a 2-
percentage-point impact of unfavorable foreign exchange.
Snacks volume grew 4%, reflecting high-single-digit growth in Poland and France and mid-single-digit
growth in the Netherlands, partially offset by a low-single-digit decline in the United Kingdom. Additionally ,
Spain, Russia, and Turkey each experienced low-single-digit growth.
Beverage volume grew 6%, reflecting double-digit growth in Germany and Poland and high-single-digit
growth in France, partially offset by a low-single-digit decline in the United Kingdom. Additionally , Russia
and Turkey each experienced mid-single-digit growth.
Operating profit increased 5%, reflectin g the net revenue growth, productivity savings and a 4-percentage-
point net impact of refranchising our entire beverage bottling operations and snack distribution operations in
CHS. These impacts were partially offset by certain operating cost increases and a 9-percentage-point impact
of higher commodity costs. Additionally , a 2017 gain on the sale of our minority stake in Britvic and the
merger and integrati on charges related to our acquisition of SodaStream reduced  operating profit growth by 8
percentage points and 4 percentage points, respectively .
AMESA
2019
Net reven ue decrea sed slightly , reflecting a 3-percentage-point impact of refranchising a portion of our
beverage business in India, partially of fset by volume growth and ef fective net pricing.
Snacks volume grew 7%, reflecting double-digit growth in Pakistan and high-single-digit growth in the
Middle East and India, partially of fset by a low-single-digit decline in South Africa.
Beverage volume grew 4%, reflecting high-single-digit growth in India and Nigeria, partially offset by low-
single-digit declines in the Middle East and Pakistan.
Operating profit increased 1.5%, reflecting productivity savings, the volume growth and the effective net
pricing. These impacts were partially offset by certain operating cost increases , a 5-percentage-point impact
of higher commodity costs and higher advertising and marketing expense s. Higher restructuring and
impairment charges and unfavorable foreign exchange reduced operating profit growth by 3 percentage
points and 2.5 percentage points, respectively .
54
Table of Contents
2018
Net revenue decreased 0.5%, reflecting a 4-percentage-point impact of the 2017 refranchising of a portion of
our beverage business in Jordan, partially of fset by ef fective net pricing and volume growth.
Snacks volume grew  2.5%, reflecting double-digit growth in India and Pakist an, partially offset by a mid-
single-digit decline in the Middle East and a low-single-digit decline in South Africa.
Beverage volume grew 1%, reflecting mid-single-digit growth in India, high-s ingle-digit growth in Nigeria
and low-single-digit growth in Pakistan, partially of fset by a mid-single-digit decline in the Middle East.
Operating profit decreased 16%, reflec ting a 22-percentage-point impact of the 2017 refranchising of a
portion of our beverage business in Jordan, certain operating cost increases and a 6-percentage-point impact
of higher commodity costs. These impa cts were partially offset by the effective net pricing and productivity
savings.
APAC
2019
Net revenue increased 4.5%, reflecting  volume growth and effective net pricing, partially offset by a 3-
percentage-point impact of unfavorable foreign exchange and a 2-percentage-point impact of the prior -year
refranchising of a portion of our beverage business in Thailand.
Snacks volume grew 6%, reflecting double-digit growth in China and mid-sin gle-digit growth in Thailand,
partially offset by a low-single-digit decline in Indonesia. Additionally , Australia and Taiwan each
experienced low-single-digit growth.
Beverage volume grew 4%, reflecting double-digit growth in Vietnam and Thailand and mid-single-digit
growth in the Philippines. Additionally , China experienced low-single-digit growth.
Operating profit decreased 23%, primarily reflecting a 23-percentage-point impact of the gain on the prior -
year refranchising of a portion of our beverage business in Thailand. Additionally , certain operating cost
increases and higher  advertising and marketing expenses negatively impacted operating profit performance.
These impacts were  partially offset by the net revenue growth and productivity savings. Higher restructuring
and impairment char ges negatively impacted operating profit performance by 6 percentage points.
2018
Net revenue decreased 3%, reflecting an 11-percentage-point impact of refranchising a portion of our
beverage business in Thailand, partially of fset by net volume growth and ef fective net pricing.
Snacks volume grew 7%, reflecting double-digit growth in China, partially offset by a slight decline in
Taiwan. Additionally , Thailand experi enced high-single-digit growth and Indonesia and Australia each
experienced low-single-digit growth.
Beverage volume declined slightly , reflecting a double-digit decline in the Philippines, partially offset by
double-digit growth in Vietnam, low-single-digit growth in China and mid-single-digit growth in Thailand.
Operating profit increased 54%, reflecti ng a 35-percentage-point net impact of refranchising a portion of our
beverage business in Thailand. The net volume growth, productivity savings and the effective net pricing also
contributed to operating profit growth. These impacts were partially offset by higher advertising and
marketing expenses and certain operating cost increases. Higher restructuring and impairment charges
reduced operating profit growth by 5 percentage points.
55
Table of Contents
Other Consolidated Results  
     Change
 2019 2018  2017  2019  2018
Other pension and retiree medical benefits
(expense)/income $ (44) $ 298  $ 233 $(342) $ 65
Net interest expense $(935) $(1,219) $(907) $ 284  $(312)
Annual tax rate (a)21.0% (36.7)% 48.9%  
Net income attributable to PepsiCo $7,314 $12,515  $4,857 (42)% 158%
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common
share – diluted $ 5.20 $ 8.78  $ 3.38 (41)% 160%
Mark-to-market net impact (0.06) 0.09  (0.01)  
Restructuring and impairment charges 0.21 0.18  0.16  
Inventory fair value adjustments and merger and
integration charges 0.03 0.05  —   
Pension-related settlement charges 0.15 —  —   
Net tax related to the TCJ Act (a)(0.01) (0.02) 1.70  
Other net tax benefits (a)— (3.55) —   
Charges related to cash tender and exchange
offers — 0.13  —   
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common
share – diluted, excluding above items (b) $ 5.53(c) $ 5.66  $ 5.23 (2)% 8%
Impact of foreign exchange translation   1  1
Growth in net income attributable to PepsiCo
per common share – diluted, excluding above
items, on a constant currency basis (b)  (1)% 9%
(a)See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
(b)See “Non-GAAP Measures.”
(c)Does not sum due to rounding.
2019
Other pension and retiree medical benefits expense increased $342 million, primarily reflecting settlement
charges of $220 million related to the purchase of a group annuity contract and settlement charges of $53
million related to one-time lump sum payments to certain former employees who had vested benefits.
Net interest expense decreased $284 million  reflecting the prior -year charge of $253 million in connection
with our cash tender and exchange offers, primarily representing the tender price paid over the carrying value
of the tendered notes, as well as gains on the market value of investments used to economically hedge a
portion of our deferr ed compensation liability . This decrease also reflects lower interest expense due to lower
average debt balanc es. These impacts were partially offset by lower interest income due to lower average
cash balances.
The reported tax rate increased 57.7 percentage points, primarily reflecting  the prior -year other net tax
benefits related to the reorganization of our international operations, whic h increased the current-year
reported tax rate by 47 percentage points. Additionally , the prior -year favorable conclusion of certain
international tax audits and the favorabl e resolution with the IRS of all open matters related to the audits of
taxable years 2012 and 2013, collectivel y, increased the current-year reported tax rate by 8 percentage points.
See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
Net income attributable to PepsiCo decreased 42% and net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share
decreased 41%. Items af fecting comparability (see “Items Affecting Comparability”) negatively impacted
56
Table of Contents
both net income attributable to PepsiCo performance and net income attributable to PepsiCo per common
share performance by 38 percentage points.
2018
Other pension and retiree medical benefits income increased $65 million, reflecting the impact of the $1.4
billion discretionary  pension contribution to the PepsiCo Employees Retirem ent Plan A (Plan A) in the
United States, as well as the recognitio n of net asset gains, partially offset by higher amortization of net
losses.
Net interest expense increased $312 million reflecting a charge of $253 million in connection with our cash
tender and exchange offers, primarily representing the tender price paid over the carrying value of the
tendered notes. This increase also reflects higher interest rates on debt balances, as well as losses on the
market value of investments used to economically hedge a portion of our deferred compensation liability .
These impacts were partially of fset by higher interest income due to higher interest rates on cash balances.
The reported tax rate decreased 85.6 percentage points, reflecting both other net tax benefits related to the
reorganization of our international operations, which reduced the reported tax rate by 45 percentage points,
and the 2017 provisional net tax expens e related to the TCJ Act, which reduced  the 2018 reported tax rate by
25 percen tage points. Additionally , the favorable conclusion of certain international tax audits and the
favorable resolution with the IRS of all open matters related to the audits of taxable years 2012 and 2013,
collectively , reduced the reported tax rate by 7 percentage points. See Note 5 to our consolidated financial
statements for further information.
Net incom e attribut able to PepsiCo increased 158% and net income attributable to PepsiCo per common
share increased 160%. Items affectin g comparability (see “Items Affecting Comparability”) positively
contributed 150 percentage points to net income attributable to PepsiCo growth and 152 percentage points to
net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share growth.
Non-GAAP  Measur es
Certain financial measures contained in this Form 10-K adjust for the impact of specified items and are not in
accordance with U.S. GAAP . We use non-GAAP  financial measures internally to make operating and
strategic decisions, including the preparation of our annual operating plan, evaluation of our overall business
performance and as a factor in determining compensation for certain employee s. We believe presenting non-
GAAP  financial measures in this Form 10-K provides additional information to facilitate comparison of our
historical operating results and trends in our underlying operating results, and provides additional
transparency on how we evaluate our business. We also believe presenting these measures in this Form 10-K
allows investors to view our performance using the same measures that we use in evaluating our financial and
business performance and trends.
We consider quantitative and qualitative factors in assessing whether to adjust for the impact of items that
may be significant or that could affect an understanding of our ongoing financial and business performance or
trends. Examples of items for which we may make adjustments include: amounts related to mark-to-market
gains or losses (non-cash); charges related to restructuring plans; amoun ts associated with mergers,
acquisitions, divestitures and other structural changes; pension and retiree medical related items; charges or
adjustments related to the enactment of new laws, rules or regulations, such as significant tax law changes;
amounts related to the resolution of tax positions; tax benefits related to reorganizations of our operations;
debt redemptions, cash tender or exchan ge offers; asset impairments (non-cash); and remeasurements of net
monetary assets.  See below  and “Items Affecting Comparability” for a description of adjustment s to our U.S.
GAAP  financial measures in this Form 10-K. 
Non-GAAP  information should be considered as supplemental in nature and is not meant to be considered in
isolation or as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP .
57
Table of Contents
In addition, our non-GAAP  financial measures may not be the same as or comparable to similar non-GAAP
measures presented by other companies.
The following non-GAAP  financial measures contained in this Form 10-K are discussed below .
Cost of sales, gross profit, selling, gene ral and administrative expenses, other pension and retiree medical
benefits expense/income, interest expense, provision for/benefit from income taxes, net income attributable to
noncontr olling interests and net income attributable to PepsiCo, each adjusted for items affecting
comparability , operating profit, adjusted for items affecting comparability , and net income attributable to
PepsiCo per common share – diluted,  adjusted for items affecting comparab ility, and the corresponding
constant curr ency gr owth rates
These measures exclude the net impact of mark-to-market gains and losses on centrally managed commodity
derivatives that do not qualify for hedge accounting, restructuring and impairme nt charges related to our 2019
and 2014 Productivi ty Plans, inventory fair value adjustments and merger and integration charges primarily
associated with our acquisition of SodaStream, pension-related settlement charges, net tax related to the TCJ
Act, other net tax benefits and charges related to cash tender and exchange offers (see “Items Affecting
Comparability” for a detailed descriptio n of each of these items). We also evaluate performance on operating
profit, adjusted for items affecting comparability , and net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share –
diluted, adjusted for items affecting comparability , on a constant currency basis, which measure our financial
results assuming constant foreign currency exchange rates used for translation based on the rates in effect for
the comparable prior -year period. In order to compute our constant currency results, we multiply or divide, as
appropriate, our current-year U.S. dolla r results by the current-year average foreign exchange rates and then
multiply or divide, as appropriate, those amounts by the prior -year average foreign exchange rates. We
believe these measures provide useful information in evaluating the results of our business because they
exclude items that we believe are not indicative of our ongoing performance.
Organic r evenue gr owth
We define organic revenue growth as net revenue growth adjusted for the impact of foreign exchange
translation, as well as the impact from acquisitions, divestitures and other structural changes. Starting in
2018, our reported results reflected the accounting policy election taken in conjunction with the adoption of
the revenu e recognition guidance to exclude from net revenue and cost of sales all sales, use, value-added and
certain excise taxes assessed by governmental authorities on revenue-producing transactions not already
excluded. Our 2018 organic revenue growth excluded the impact of approximately $75 million of these taxes
previously recognized in net revenue.
We believ e organic  revenue growth provides useful information in evaluatin g the results of our business
because it excludes items that we believ e are not indicative of ongoing performance or that we believe impact
comparability with the prior year .
See “Net Revenue and Organic Revenu e Growth” in “Results of Operations – Division Review” for further
information.
Free cash flow
We define free cash flow as net cash provided by operating activities less capital spending, plus sales of
property , plant and equipment . Since net capital spending is essential to our product innovation initiatives and
maintaining our operational capabilities , we believe that it is a recurring and necessary use of cash. As such,
we believe investors should also consider net capital spending when evaluating our cash from operating
activities. Free cash flow is used by us primarily for financing activities,  including debt repayments,
dividends and share repurchases. Free cash flow is not a measure of cash available for discretionary
expenditures since we have certain non-discretionary obligations such as debt service that are not deducted
from the measure.
58
Table of Contents
See “Free Cash Flow” in “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources” for further information.
Return on invested capital (ROIC) and net ROIC, excluding items affecting comparability
We define ROIC as net income attributable to PepsiCo plus interest expense after-tax divided by the sum of
quarterly average debt obligations and quarterly average common shareholders’  equity . Although ROIC is a
common financial metric, numerous methods exist for calculating ROIC. Accordingly , the method used by
management to calculate ROIC may dif fer from the methods other companies use to calculate their ROIC.
We believe this metric serves as a measure of how well we use our capital to generate returns. In addition, we
use net ROIC, excluding items affecting comparability , to compare our performance over various reporting
periods on a consis tent basis because it removes from our operating results the impact of items that we
believe are not indicative of our ongoing performance and reflects how management evaluates our operating
results and trends. We define net ROIC, excluding items affecting comparability , as ROIC, adjusted for
quarterly average cash, cash equivalen ts and short-term investments, after-tax interest income and items
affecting comparabi lity. We believe the calculation of ROIC and net ROIC, excluding items affecting
comparability , provides useful informa tion to investors and is an additional relevant comparison of our
performance to consider when evaluating our capital allocation ef ficiency .
See “Return on Invested Capital” in “Our Liquidity and Capital Resources” for further information.
Items Affecting Comparability
Our reported financial results in this Form 10-K are impacted by the following items in each of the following
years:  
 2019
 Cost of
sales Gross profitSelling, general
and
administrative
expenses  Operating
profit Other pension
and retiree
medical benefits
(expense)/incomeProvision
for income
taxes(a)Net income
attributable to
noncontrolling
interests  Net income
attributable
to PepsiCo
Reported, GAAP Measure$30,132 $ 37,029 $ 26,738 $10,291 $ (44) $ 1,959 $ 39 $ 7,314
Items Affecting
Comparability         
Mark-to-market net
impact 57 (57) 55 (112) — (25) — (87)
Restructuring and
impairment charges (115) 115 (253) 368 2 67 5 298
Inventory fair value
adjustments and
merger and
integration charges (34) 34 (21) 55 — 8 — 47
Pension-related
settlement charges — — — — 273 62 — 211
Net tax related to the
TCJ Act — — — — — 8 — (8)
Core, Non-GAAP Measure$30,040 $ 37,121 $ 26,519 $10,602 $ 231 $ 2,079 $ 44 $ 7,775
59
Table of Contents
 2018
 Cost of
salesGross
profitSelling, general
and
administrative
expensesOperating
profitOther
pension
and retiree
medical
benefits
incomeInterest
expense(Benefit
from)/provision
for income
taxes(a)Net income
attributable to
noncontrolling
interests  Net income
attributable
to PepsiCo
Reported, GAAP
Measure $29,381 $35,280 $ 25,170 $ 10,110 $ 298 $1,525 $ (3,370)$ 44 $ 12,515
Items Affecting
Comparability        
Mark-to-
market net
impact (83) 83 (80) 163 — — 38 — 125
Restructuring
and
impairment
charges (3) 3 (269) 272 36 — 56 1 251
Merger and
integration
charges — — (75) 75 — — — — 75
Net tax related
to the TCJ
Act — — — — — — 28 — (28)
Other net tax
benefits — — — — — — 5,064 — (5,064)
Charges related
to cash
tender and
exchange
offers — — — — — (253) 62 — 191
Core, Non-GAAP
Measure $29,295 $35,366 $ 24,746 $ 10,620 $ 334 $1,272 $ 1,878 $ 45 $ 8,065
 2017
 Cost of sales Gross profitSelling, general
and
administrative
expenses Operating
profit Other
pension and
retiree
medical
benefits
income Provision for
income taxes(a)Net income
attributable to
PepsiCo
Reported, GAAP Measure$ 28,796 $ 34,729 $ 24,453 $10,276 $ 233 $ 4,694 $ 4,857
Items Affecting Comparability       
Mark-to-market net impact8 (8) 7 (15) — (7) (8)
Restructuring and impairment charges— — (229) 229 66 71 224
Provisional net tax related to the TCJ
Act — — — — — (2,451) 2,451
Core, Non-GAAP Measure $ 28,804 $ 34,721 $ 24,231 $10,490 $ 299 $ 2,307 $ 7,524
(a)Provision for income taxes is the expected tax charge/benefit on the underlying item based on the tax laws and income tax rates applicable to the underlying
item in its corresponding tax jurisdiction.
Mark-to-Market Net Impact
We centrally manage commodity derivatives on behalf of our divisions. These commodity derivatives include
energy, agricultural products and metal s. Commodity derivatives that do not qualify for hedge accounting
treatment are marked to market each period with the resulting gains and losses recorded in corporate
unallocated expense s as either cost of sales or selling, general and administrativ e expenses, depending on the
underlying commod ity. These gains and losses are subsequently reflected in division results when the
divisions recognize the cost of the unde rlying commodity in operating profit. Therefore, the divisions realize
the econom ic effects of the derivative without experiencing any resulting mark-to-market volatility , which
remains in corporate unallocated expenses.
Restructuring and Impairment Charges
2019 Multi-Y ear Pr oductivity Plan
The 2019 Productiv ity Plan, publicly announced on February 15, 2019, will levera ge new technology and
business models to further simplify , harmonize and automate processes; re-engineer our go-to-market and
60
Table of Contents
information systems , including deploying the right automation for each market; and simplify our organization
and optimize our manufacturing and supply chain footprint.  In connection with this plan, we expect to incur
pre-tax charges of approximately $2.5 billion , of which we have incurred $508 million  plan to date through
December 28, 2019  and cash expenditures of approxima tely $1.6 billio n, of which we have incurred
approximately $261 million  plan to date through December 28, 2019 . We expect to incur pre-tax charges of
approximately $450  million and cash expenditures of approximately $400 million in our 2020 financial
results, with the balance to be reflected in our 2021 through 2023 financial results. These charges will be
funded primarily through cash from operations. We expect to incur the majority of the remaining pre-tax
charges and cash expenditures in our 2020 and 2021 results.
2014 Multi-Y ear Pr oductivity Plan
The 2014 Productivity Plan was completed in 2019. The total plan pre-tax charges and cash expenditures
approximated the previously disclosed plan estimates of $1.3 billion  and $960 million , respectively .
See Note 3 to our consolidated financial statements for further information related to our 2019 and 2014
Productivity Plans.
We regularly evaluate productivity initiatives beyond the productivity plans and other initiatives discussed
above and in Note 3 to our consolidated financial statements.
Inventory Fair V alue Adjustments and Merger and Integration Charges
In 2019 , we recorded inven tory fair value adjustments and merger and integration charges of $55 million
($47 million  after-tax or $0.03  per share), including $46 million  in our Europe segment, $7 million  in our
AMESA  segment and $2 million  in corporate unallo cated expenses. These charges are primarily related to
fair value adjustmen ts to the acquired inventory included in SodaStream’ s balance sheet at the acquisition
date, as well as mer ger and integration char ges, including employee-related costs.
In 2018 , we recorded merger and integration charges of $75 million ($0.05 per share), including $57 million
in our Europe segm ent and $18 million in corporate unallocated expenses, related to our acquisition of
SodaStream. These char ges include closing costs, advisory fees and employee-related costs.
See Note 14 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
Pension-Related Settlement Charges
In 2019 , we recorded pension settlement charges of $273 million ($211 million after-tax or $0.15 per share),
reflecting settlement charges of $220 million ($170 million after-tax or $0.12  per share) related to the
purchase of a group annuity contract and settlement charges of $53 million  ($41 million  after-tax or $0.03  per
share) related to one-time lump sum payments to certain former employees who had vested benefits.
See Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
Net T ax Related to the TCJ Act
During the fourth quarter of 2017, the TCJ Act was enacted in the United States . Among its many provisions,
the TCJ Act imposed a mandatory one-t ime transition tax on undistributed intern ational earnings and reduced
the U.S. corporate income tax rate from 35% to 21%, effective January 1, 2018. 
In 2017, we recorded a provisional net tax expense of $2.5 billion  ($1.70  per share) associated with the
enactment of the TCJ Act.
We recognized net tax benefits of $8 million  ($0.01  per share)  and $28 million  ($0.02  per share)  in 2019  and
2018 , respectively , related to the TCJ Act.
See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
61
Table of Contents
Other Net T ax Benefits
In 2018, we reorganized our international operations, including the interc ompany transfer of certain
intangible assets. As a result, we recognized other net tax benefits of $4.3 billion ($3.05 per share). Also in
2018, we recognize d non-cash tax benefits associated with both the conclusion of certain international tax
audits and our agree ment with the IRS resolving all open matters related to the audits of taxable years 2012
and 2013. The conclusion of certain international tax audits and the resolution with the IRS, collectively ,
resulted in non-cash tax benefits totaling $717 million ($0.50 per share).
See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
Charges Related to Cash T ender and Exchange Of fers
In 2018, we recorde d a pre-tax charge of $253 milli on ($191 million after-tax or $0.13 per share) to interest
expense in connectio n with our cash tender and exchange offers, primarily representing the tender price paid
over the carrying value of the tendered notes.
See Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
62
Table of Contents
Our Liquidity and Capital Resour ces
We believe that our cash generating capability and financial condition, together with our revolving credit
facilities, bridge loan facilities, working  capital lines and other available methods of debt financing, such as
commercial paper borrowings and long-term debt financing, will be adequate to meet our operating, investing
and financing needs. Our primary sources of cash available to fund cash outflows, such as our anticipated
share repurchases, dividend payments, debt repayments, the proposed acquisition of Pioneer Foods and the
transition tax liability under the TCJ Act, include cash from operations, proceed s obtained from issuances of
commercial paper , bridge loan facilities and long-term debt and cash and cash equivalents. However , there
can be no assurance  that volatility in the global capital and credit markets will not impair our ability to access
these mark ets on terms commercially acceptable to us, or at all. See Note 8 to our consolidated financial
statements for a description of our revolving credit facilities and bridge loan facilities. See also “Item 1A.
Risk Factors” and “Our Business Risks” for further discussion.
As of December 28, 2019 , cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments in our consolidated subsidia ries
subject to currency controls or currency exchange restrictions were not material.
The TCJ Act imposed a mandatory one-time transition tax on undistributed international earnings, including
$18.9 billion held in our consolidated subsidiaries outside the United States as of December 30, 2017. As of
December 28, 2019 , our mandatory transition tax liability was $3.3 billion , which must be paid through 2026
under the provisions of the TCJ Act; we currently expect to pay approximately $0.1 billion of this liability in
2020 . See “Cre dit Facilit ies and Long-T erm Contractual Commitments.” Any additi onal guidance issued by
the IRS may impac t our recorded amounts for this transition tax liability . See Note 5 to our consolidated
financial statements for further discussion of the TCJ Act.
Furthermore, our cash provided from operating activities is somewhat impacted by seasonality . Working
capital needs are impacted by weekly sales, which are generally highest in the third quarter due to seasonal
and holida y-related sales patterns, and generally lowest in the first quarter . On a continuing basis, we
consider various transactions to increase shareholder value and enhance our business results, including
acquisitions, divestitures, joint venture s, dividends, share repurchases, productivity and other efficiency
initiatives, and other structural changes. These transactions may result in future cash proceeds or payments.
The table below summarizes our cash activity:  
 2019  2018  2017
Net cash provided by operating activities $9,649  $9,415  $10,030
Net cash (used for)/provided by investing activities $(6,437 ) $4,564  $(4,403 )
Net cash used for financing activities $(8,489 ) $(13,769 ) $(4,186 )
Operating Activities
During 2019 , net cash provided by operating activities was $9.6 billion , compared to $9.4 billion  in the prior
year. The operating cash flow performa nce primarily reflects lower pre-tax pension and retiree medical plan
contributions in the current year , partially of fset by higher net cash tax payments in the current year .
During 2018, net cash provided by operating activities was $9.4 billion, compared to $10.0 billion in 2017.
The operating cash flow performance primarily reflects discretionary contributions of $1.5 billion to our
pension and retiree medical plans in 2018, partially of fset by lower net cash tax payments in 2018.
Investing Activities
During 2019 , net cash used for investing activities was $6.4 billion , primarily reflecting $4.1 billion of net
capital spending, as well as $1.9 billion of the remaining cash paid in conne ction with our acquisition of
SodaStream.
63
Table of Contents
During 2018, net cash provided by investing activities was $4.6 billion, primarily reflecting net maturities
and sales of debt securities with maturities greater than three months of $8.7 billion, partially offset by net
capital spending of $3.1 billion and $1.2 billion of cash paid, net of cash and cash equivalents acquired, in
connection with our acquisition of SodaStream.
See Note 1 to our consolidated financial statements for further discussion of capital spending by division; see
Note 9 to our consolidated financial statements for further discussion of our investments in debt securities.
We expect 2020  net capital spending to be approximately $5 billion .
Financing Activities
During 2019 , net cash used for financing activities was $8.5 billio n, primarily  reflecting the return of
operating cash flow to our shareholders through dividend payments and share repurchases of $8.3 billion,
payments of long-term debt borrowings of $4.0 billion and debt redemptions of $1.0 billion, partially offset
by proceeds from issuances of long-term debt of $4.6 billion.
During 2018, net cash used for financ ing activities was $13.8 billion, primarily reflecting the return of
operating cash flow to our shareholders through dividend payments and share repurchases of $6.9 billion,
payments of long-term debt borrowings of $4.0 billion, cash tender and exchange offers of $1.6 billion and
net payments of short-term borrowings of $1.4 billion.
See Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements for further discussion of debt obligations.
We annually review our capital structure with our Board of Directors, including our dividend policy and share
repurchase activity . On February 13, 2018, we announced the 2018 share repurchase program providing for
the repurchase of up to $15.0 billion of PepsiCo common stock which commen ced on July 1, 2018 and will
expire on June 30, 2021. On February 13, 2020 , we annou nced a 7% increase in our annualized dividend to
$4.09 per share from  $3.82 per share, effective with the dividend expected to be paid in June 2020 . We expec t
to return a total of approximately $7.5 billion to shareholders in 2020  through share repurchases of
approximately $2 billion and dividends of approximately $5.5 billion.
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is a non-GAAP  financial measure. For further information on free cash flow see “Non-GAAP
Measures.”
The table below reconciles net cash provided by operating activities, as reflected in our cash flow statement,
to our free cash flow . 
    % Change
2019 2018 2017 2019 2018
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 9,649 $9,415 $10,030 2.5 (6)
Capital spending (4,232) (3,282) (2,969)  
Sales of property, plant and equipment 170 134 180  
Free cash flow $ 5,587$6,267$ 7,241 (11) (13)
We use free cash flow primarily for financing activities, including debt repayments, dividends and share
repurchases.  We expect to continue to return free cash flow to our shareholders through dividends and share
repurchases while maintaining Tier 1 commercial paper access, which we believe will facilitate appropriate
financial flexibility and ready access to global capital and credit markets at favorable interest rates. However ,
see “Item 1A. Risk Factors” and “Our Business Risks” for certain factors that may impact our credit ratings
or our operating cash flows.
Any downgrade of our credit ratings by a credit rating agency , especially any downgrade to below investment
grade, whether or not as a result of our actions or factors which are beyond our control, could increase our
64
Table of Contents
future borrowing costs and impair our ability to access capital and credit markets on terms commercially
acceptable to us, or at all. In addition, any downgrade of our current short-ter m credit ratings could impair
our ability to access the commercial paper market with the same flexibility that we have experienced
historically , and therefore require us to rely more heavily on more expensive types of debt financing. See
“Item 1A. Risk Factors,” “Our Business Risks” and Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements for
further discussion.
Credit Facilities and Long-T erm Contractual Commitments
See Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements for a description of our credit facilities.
The following table summarizes our long-term contractual commitments by period:
 Payments Due by Period(a)
 Total 2020 2021 –
20222023 –
2024 2025 and
beyond
Recorded Liabilities:     
Long-term debt obligations (b)$ 29,142$ — $ 7,156$ 3,110 $ 18,876
Operating leases (c)1,763 501 654 300 308
One-time mandatory transition tax - TCJ Act (d)3,317 75 617 888 1,737
Other:     
Interest on debt obligations (e)12,403 996 1,730 1,388 8,289
Purchasing commitments (f)2,032 874 844 213 101
Marketing commitments (g)1,308 403 548 188 169
Total contractual commitments $ 49,965$ 2,849 $ 11,549$ 6,087 $ 29,480
 
(a) Based on year -end foreign exchange rates.
(b) Excludes $2,848 million  related to current maturities of debt, $6 million related to the fair value adjustments for debt acquired  in acquisitions
and interest rate swaps and payments of $163 million  related to unamortized net discounts.
(c) Primarily reflects building leases. See Note 13 to our consolidated financial statements for further information on operating leases.
(d) Reflects our transition tax liability as of December 28, 2019 , which must be paid through 2026 under the provisions of the TCJ Act.
(e) Interest paym ents on floating-rate debt are estimated using interest rates effective as of December 28, 2019 . Includes accrued interest of $305
million  as of December 28, 2019.
(f) Reflects non-cancelable commitments, primarily for the purchase of commodities and outsourcing services in the normal course of business
and does not include purchases that we are likely to make based on our plans, but are not obligated to incur .
(g) Reflects non-cancelable commitments, primarily for sports marketing in the normal course of business.
Reserves for uncerta in tax positions are excluded from the table above as we are unable to reasonably predict
the ultimate amount or timing of any such settlements. Bottler funding to independent bottlers is not reflected
in the table above as it is negotiated on an annual basis. Accrued liabilities for pension and retiree medical
plans are not reflected in the table above. See Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements for further
information regarding our pension and retiree medical obligations.
Off-Balance-Sheet Arrangements
We do not have guarantees or other off-balance-sheet financing arrangements, including variable interest
entities, that we believe could have a material impact on our financial condition or liquidity .
We coordinate, on an aggregate basis,  the contract negotiations of raw material requirements, including
sweeteners, aluminum cans and plastic bottles and closures for us and certain of our independent bottlers.
Once we have negot iated the contracts, the bottlers order and take delivery directly from the supplier and pay
the suppli ers direct ly. Consequently , transactions between our independent bottlers and suppliers are not
reflected in our consolidated financial  statements. As the contracting party , we could be liable to these
suppliers in the event of any nonpayment by our independent bottlers, but we consider this exposure to be
remote.
65
Table of Contents
Return on Invested Capital
ROIC is a non-GAAP  financial measure. For further information on ROIC, see “Non-GAAP  Measures.”
 2019 2018 2017
Net income attributable to PepsiCo (a)$ 7,314 $12,515 $ 4,857
Interest expense 1,135 1,525 1,151
Tax on interest expense (252) (339) (415)
 $ 8,197 $13,701 $ 5,593
      
Average debt obligations (b)$31,975 $38,169 $38,707
Average common shareholders’ equity (c) 14,317 11,368 12,004
Average invested capital $46,292 $49,537 $50,711
      
Return on invested capital 17.7% 27.7% 11.0%
(a) Results include the impact of the TCJ Act. Additionally , our 2018 results included other net tax benefits related to the reorganization of our
international operations. See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
(b) Average debt obligations includes a quarterly average of short-term and long-term debt obligations.
(c) Average common shareholders’  equity includes a quarterly average of common stock, capital in excess of par value, retained earnings,
accumulated other comprehensive loss and repurchased common stock.
The table below reconciles ROIC as calculated above to net ROIC, excluding items af fecting comparability .
 2019 2018 2017
ROIC 17.7% 27.7% 11.0%
Impact of:   
Average cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments 3.0 7.8 7.6
Interest income (0.5) (0.6) (0.5)
Tax on interest income 0.1 0.1 0.2
Mark-to-market net impact (0.2) 0.2 —
Restructuring and impairment charges 0.5 0.4 0.3
Inventory fair value adjustments and merger and integration charges 0.1 0.1 —
Pension-related settlement charges 0.5 — —
Net tax related to the TCJ Act (1.0) (1.1) 4.5
Other net tax benefits 2.2 (9.7) 0.1
Charges related to cash tender and exchange offers (0.1) (0.1) —
Charges related to the transaction with Tingyi (a)— — (0.1)
Venezuela impairment charges (a)— — (0.2)
Net ROIC, excluding items affecting comparability 22.3% 24.8% 22.9%
(a) See “Item 6. Selected Financial Data” for further information.
OUR CRITICAL  ACCOUNTING POLICIES
An appreciation of our critical accounting policies is necessary to understand our financial results. These
policies may require  management to make difficult and subjective judgments regarding uncertainties, and as a
result, such estimates may significantly impact our financial results. The precision of these estimates and the
likelihood of future changes depend on a number of underlying variables and a range of possible outcomes.
Other than our accounting for pension and retiree medical plans, our critica l accounting policies do not
involve a choice between alternative methods of accounting. We applied our critical accounting policies and
estimation methods consistently in all material respects and for all periods presented. We have discussed our
critical accounting policies with our Audit Committee.
66
Table of Contents
Our critical accounting policies are:
•revenue recognition;
•goodwill and other intangible assets;
•income tax expense and accruals; and
•pension and retiree medical plans.
Revenue Recognition
We recognize revenue when our performance obligation is satisfied. Our primary performance obligation (the
distribution and sales of beverage products and food and snack products) is satisfied upon the shipment or
delivery of products to our customers, which is also when control is transferre d. The transfer of control of
products to our customers is typically based on written sales terms that do not allow for a right of return.
However , our policy for DSD and certain chilled products is to remove and replace damaged and out-of-date
products from store shelves to ensure that consumers receive the product quality and freshness they expect.
Similarly , our policy for certain warehouse-distributed products is to replace damaged and out-of-date
products. As a result, we record reser ves, based on estimates, for anticipated damaged and out-of-date
products.
Our produ cts are sold for cash or on credit terms. Our credit terms, which are established in accordance with
local and industry practices, typically require payment within 30 days of delivery in the United States, and
generally within 30 to 90 days internationally , and may allow discounts for early payment.
We estima te and reserve for our bad debt exposure based on our experience with past due accounts and
collectibility , write-of f history , the aging of accounts receivable and our analysis of customer data.
Our policy is to provide customers with product when needed. In fact, our commitment to freshness and
product dating serves to regulate the quantity of product shipped or delivered. In addition, DSD products are
placed on the shelf by our employees with customer shelf space and storerooms limiting the quantity of
product. For product delivered through other distribution networks, we monitor customer inventory levels.
As discussed in “Our Customers” in “Item 1. Business,” we offer sales incentives and discounts through
various programs to customers and consumers. Total marketplace spendin g includes sales incentives,
discounts, advertisin g and other marketi ng activities. Sales incentives and disco unts are primarily accounted
for as a reduction of revenue and include payments to customers for performing  activities on our behalf, such
as payments for in-store displays, payments to gain distribution of new products, payments for shelf space
and discounts to promote lower retail prices. Sales incentives and discounts also include support provided to
our independent bottlers through funding of advertising and other marketing activities.
A number of our sales incentives, such as bottler funding to independent bottlers and customer volume
rebates, are based on annual targets, and accruals are established during the year, as products are delivered,
for the expected payout, which may occur after year-end once reconciled and settled. These accruals are
based on contract terms and our historical experience with similar programs and require management
judgment with respect to estimating customer and consumer participation and performance levels.
Differences betwee n estimated expense and actual incentive costs are normally insignificant and are
recognized in earnings in the period such differences are determined. In addition, certain advertising and
marketing costs are also based on annual tar gets and recognized during the year as incurred.
See Note 2 to our consolidated financia l statements for further information on our revenue recognition and
related policies, including total marketplace spending.
67
Table of Contents
Goodwill and Other  Intangible Assets
We sell products under a number of brand names, many of which were developed by us. Brand development
costs are expensed as incurred. We also purchase brands and other intangible assets in acquisitions. In a
business combination, the consideration  is first assigned to identifiable assets and liabilities, including brands
and other intangible assets, based on estimated fair values, with any excess recorded as goodwill.
Determining fair value requires significa nt estimates and assumptions based on an evaluation of a number of
factors, such as marketplace participan ts, product life cycles, market share,  consumer awareness, brand
history and future expansion expectations, amount and timing of future cash flows and the discount rate
applied to the cash flows.
We believe that a brand has an indefinite life if it has a history of strong revenu e and cash flow performance
and we have the intent and ability to support the brand with marketplace spendi ng for the foreseeable future.
If these indefinite-lived brand criteria are not met, brands are amortized over their expected useful lives,
which generally range from 20 to 40 years. Determining the expected life of a brand requires management
judgment and is based on an evaluation of a number of factors, including market share, consumer awareness,
brand history , future expansion expec tations and regulatory restrictions, as well as the macroeconomic
environment of the countries in which the brand is sold.
In connection with previous acquisitions, we reacquired certain franchise rights which provided the exclusive
and perpet ual rights to manufacture and/or distribute beverages for sale in specified territories. In determining
the useful life of these franchise rights, many factors were considered, including the pre-existing perpetual
bottling arrangements, the indefinite period expected for these franchise rights to contribute to our future cash
flows, as well as the lack of any factors that would limit the useful life of these franchise rights to us,
including legal, regulatory , contractual, competitive, economic or other factor s. Therefore, certain of these
franchise rights are considered as indefinite-lived. Franchise rights that are not considered indefinite-lived are
amortized over the remaining contractual period of the contract in which the right was granted.
Indefinite-lived intan gible assets and goodwill are not amortized and, as a result , are assessed for impairment
at least annually , using either a qualita tive or quantitative approach. We perform this annual assessment
during our third quarter , or more frequently if circumstances indicate that the carrying value may not be
recoverable. Where we use the qualitative assessment, first we determine if, based on qualitative factors, it is
more likely than not that an impairment exists. Factors considered include macroeconomic, industry and
competitive conditio ns, legal and regulatory environment, historical financial  performance and significant
changes in the brand or reporting unit. If the qualitative assessment indicates that it is more likely than not
that an impairment exists, then a quantitative assessment is performed.
In the quantitative assessment for indefinite-lived intangible assets and goodwill, estimated fair value is
determined using discounted cash flows and requires an analysis of several estimates including future cash
flows or income consistent with management’ s strategic business plans, annual sales growth rates, perpetuity
growth assumptions and the selection of assumptions underlying a discount rate (weighted-average cost of
capital) based on market data available at the time. Significant management judgment is necessary to estimate
the impact of competitive operating, macroeconomic and other factors to estimate future levels of sales,
operating profit or cash flows. All assumptions used in our impairment evaluations for indefinite-lived
intangible assets and goodwill, such as forecasted growth rates and weighted-average cost of capital, are
based on the best available market information and are consistent with our internal forecasts and operating
plans. These assumptions could be adversely impacted by certain of the risks described in “Item 1A. Risk
Factors” and “Our Business Risks.”
68
Table of Contents
Amortizable intangible assets are only evaluated for impairment upon a signific ant change in the operating or
macroeconomic environment. If an evaluation of the undiscounted future cash flows indicates impairment,
the asset is written down to its estimated fair value, which is based on its discounted future cash flows.
See Note 2 and Note 4 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
Income Tax Expense and Accruals
Our annual tax rate is based on our income, statutory tax rates and tax structur e and transactions, including
transfer pricing arrangements, available to us in the various jurisdictions in which we operate. Significant
judgment is required in determining our annual tax rate and in evaluating our tax positions. We establish
reserves when, despite our belief that our tax return positions are fully supportable, we believe that certain
positions are subject to challenge and that we likely will not succeed. We adjust these reserves, as well as the
related interest, in light of changing facts and circumstances, such as the progress of a tax audit, new tax laws
or tax authority settlements. See “Item 1A. Risk Factors” for further discussion.
An estima ted annual effective tax rate is applied to our quarterly operating results. In the event there is a
significant or unusual item recognized in our quarterly operating results, the tax attributable to that item is
separately calculated  and recorded at the same time as that item. We consider the tax adjustments from the
resolution of prior -year tax matters to be among such items.
Tax law requires items to be included in our tax returns at different times than the items are reflected in our
consolidated financial statements. As a result, our annual tax rate reflected in our consolidated financial
statements is different than that reported in our tax returns (our cash tax rate). Some of these differences are
permanent, such as expenses that are not deductible in our tax return, and some differences reverse over time,
such as depreciation expense. These temporary differences create deferred tax assets and liabilities. Deferred
tax assets generally represent items that can be used as a tax deduction or credit in our tax returns in future
years for which we have already recorded the tax benefit on our consolidated financial statements. We
establish valuation allowances for our deferred tax assets if, based on the available evidence, it is more likely
than not that some portion or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized. Deferred tax liabilities
generally represent tax expense recognized in our consolidated financial statements for which payment has
been deferred, or expense for which we have already taken a deduction in our tax return but have not yet
recognized as expense in our consolidated financial statements.
During the fourth quarter of 2017, the TCJ Act was enacted in the United States . Among its many provisions,
the TCJ Act imposed a mandatory one-t ime transition tax on undistributed intern ational earnings and reduced
the U.S. corporate income tax rate from  35% to 21%, effective  January 1, 2018. As a result of the enactment
of the TCJ Act, we recognized a provisional net tax expense of $2.5 billio n ($1.70  per share) in the fourth
quarter of 2017.
We recorded a net tax benefit of $28 million  ($0.02  per share ) in 2018, related to the TCJ Act. Our
provisional measurement period ended  in the fourth quarter of 2018 and while  our accou nting for the
recorded impact of the TCJ Act was deemed to be complete, additional guidance issued by the IRS impacted,
and may continue to impact, our recorded amounts after December 29, 2018. In 2019, we recognized a net
tax benefit totaling $8 million  ($0.01  per share) related to the TCJ Act, including the impact of additional
guidance issued by the IRS in the first quarter of 2019 and adjustments related to the filing of our 2018 U.S.
federal tax return.  See further information in “Items Affecting Comparability .”
On May 19, 2019, a public referendum held in Switzerland passed the TRAF , effective  January 1, 2020. The
enactment of certain provisions of the TRAF in 2019 resulted in adjustments to our deferred taxes. During
2019 , we recor ded net tax expense of $24 million  related to the impact of the TRAF . Enactment of the TRAF
provisions subsequent to December 28, 2019 is expected to result in adjustments to our consolidated financial
69
Table of Contents
statements and related disclosures in future periods. The future impact of the TRAF cannot currently be
reasonably estimated ; we will continue to monitor and assess the impact the TRAF may have on our business
and financial results.
In 2019 , our annu al tax rate was 21.0%  compared to (36.7)%  in 2018 , as discus sed in “Other Consolidated
Results.” The tax rate increased 57.7 percentage points compared to 2018 , primarily reflecting the prior -year
other net tax benefits related to the reorganization of our international operations, which increased the
current-year reporte d tax rate by 47 percentage points. Additionally , the prior -year favorable conclusion of
certain international tax audits and the favorable resolution with the IRS of all open matters related to the
audits of taxable years 2012 and 2013, collectively , increased the current- year reported tax rate by 8
percentage points.
See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
Pension and Retir ee Medical Plans
Our pensio n plans cover certain employ ees in the United States and certain international employees. Benefits
are determined based on either years of service or a combination of years of service and earnings. Certain
U.S. and Canada retirees are also eligible for medical and life insurance benefits (retiree medical) if they
meet age and service requirements. Generally , our share of retiree medical costs is capped at specified dollar
amounts, which vary based upon years of service, with retirees contributing the remainder of the cost. In
addition, we have been phasing out certain subsidies of retiree medical benefits.
In 2019, Plan A purchased a group annuity contract whereby a third-party insurance company assumed the
obligation to pay and administer future annuity payments for certain retirees. This transaction triggered a pre-
tax settlement char ge in 2019 of $220 million  ($170 million  after -tax or $0.12  per share).
Also in 2019, certain former employees who had vested benefits in our U.S. defined benefit pension plans
were offered the option of receiving a one-time lump sum payment equal to the present value of the
participant’ s pension  benefit. This trans action triggered a pre-tax settlement charge in 2019 of $53 million
($41 million  after-tax or $0.03  per share). Collecti vely, the group annuity contract and one-time lump sum
payments to certain former employees who had vested benefits resulted in settlement charges in 2019 of $273
million ($21 1 million  after -tax or $0.15  per share).
Effective January 1, 2017, the U.S. qualified defined benefit pension plans were reorganized into Plan A and
the PepsiCo Employees Retirement Plan I (Plan I) to facilitate a targeted investment strategy over time and
provide additional flexibility in evaluating opportunities to reduce risk and volatility . Actuarial gains and
losses associated with Plan A are amortized over the average remaining service life of the active participants,
while the actuarial gains and losses associated with Plan I are amortized over the remaining life expectancy
of the inactive participants. As a result of these changes, the pre-tax net periodic benefit cost decreased by
$42 millio n ($27 million after-tax, reflecting tax rates effective for the 2017 tax year, or $0.02 per share) in
2017, primarily impacting corporate unallocated expenses.
See “Items Affecting Comparability” and Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements.
Our Assumptions
The determ ination of pension and retiree medical expenses and obligations requires the use of assumptions to
estimate the amount of benefits that employees earn while working, as well as the present value of those
benefits. Annual pension and retiree medical expense amounts are principally based on four components:
(1) the value of benefits earned by employees for working during the year (service cost), (2) the increase in
the projected benefit obligation due to the passage of time (interest cost), and (3) other gains and losses as
discussed in Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements, reduced by (4) the expected return on assets for
our funded plans.
70
Table of Contents
Significant assumptions used to measure our annual pension and retiree medical expenses include:
•certain employee-related demographic factors, such as turnover , retirement age and mortality;
•the expected return on assets in our funded plans;
•for pension expense, the rate of salary increases for plans where benefits are based on earnings;
•for retiree medical expense, health care cost trend rates; and
•for pensio n and retiree medical expense, the spot rates along the yield curve used to determine
service and interest costs and the present value of liabilities.
Certain assumptions reflect our historical experience and management’ s best judgment regarding future
expectations. All actuarial assumptions are reviewed annually , except in the case of an interim remeasurement
due to a significant event such as a curtailment or settlement. Due to the significant management judgment
involved, these assumptions could have a material impact on the measurement of our pension and retiree
medical expenses and obligations.
At each measurement date, the discount  rates are based on interest rates for high-quality , long-term corporate
debt securities with maturities comparable to those of our liabilities. Our U.S. obligation and pension and
retiree medical expense is based on the discount rates determined using the Mercer Above Mean Curve. This
curve includes bonds that closely match the timing and amount of our expected benefit payments and reflects
the portfolio of investments we would consider to settle our liabilities.
See Note 7 to our consolidated financia l statements for information about the expected rate of return on plan
assets and our plans’  investment strategy . Although we review our expected long-term rates of return on an
annual basis, our asset returns in a given year do not significantly influence our evaluation of long-term rates
of return.
The health care trend rate used to determine our retiree medical plans’  liability and expense is reviewed
annually . Our review is based on our claims experience, information provid ed by our health plans and
actuaries, and our knowledge of the health care industry . Our review of the trend rate considers factors such
as demographics, plan design, new medical technologies and changes in medical carriers.
Weighted-average assumptions for pension and retiree medical expense are as follows:  
 2020 2019  2018
Pension  
Service cost discount rate 3.4% 4.4% 3.7%
Interest cost discount rate 2.8% 3.9% 3.2%
Expected rate of return on plan assets 6.6% 6.8% 6.9%
Expected rate of salary increases 3.2% 3.2% 3.2%
Retiree medical  
Service cost discount rate 3.2% 4.3% 3.6%
Interest cost discount rate 2.6% 3.8% 3.0%
Expected rate of return on plan assets 5.8% 6.6% 6.5%
Current health care cost trend rate 5.6% 5.7% 5.8%
In 2019, we incurred pension settlement charges related to the purchase of a group annuity contract of $220
million and one-time lump sum settlements of $53 million to certain former  employees who had vested
benefits. In addition, based on our assumptions, we expect our total pension and retiree medical expense to
decrease in 2020  prim arily driven by the recognition of fixed income gains on plan assets and the impact of
approved plan contributions, primarily of fset by the decrease in discount rates.
71
Table of Contents
Sensitivity of Assumptions
A decrease in each of the collective discount rates or in the expected rate of return assumptions would
increase expense for our benefit plans. A 25-basis-point decrease in each of the above discount rates and
expected rate of return assumptions would individually increase 2020  pre-tax pension and retiree medical
expense as follows:
Assumption  Amount
Discount rates used in the calculation of expense  $ 48
Expected rate of return  $ 44
Funding
We make contributions to pension trusts that provide plan benefits for certain pension plans. These
contributions are made in accordance with applicable tax regulations that provi de for current tax deductions
for our contributions and taxation to the employee only upon receipt of plan benefits. Generally , we do not
fund our pension plans when our contributions would not be currently tax deductible. As our retiree medical
plans are not subject to regulatory funding requirements, we generally fund these plans on a pay-as-you-go
basis, although we periodically review available options to make additional contributions toward these
benefits.
We made discretionary contributions to Plan A in the United States of $150 million in January 2020, $400
million in 2019 and $1.4 billion in 2018.
Our pensi on and retiree medical contributions are subject to change as a result of many factors, such as
changes in interest rates, deviations between actual and expected asset returns and changes in tax or other
benefit laws. We regularly evaluate different opportunities to reduce risk and volatility associated with our
pension and retiree medical plans. See Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements for our past and
expected contributions and estimated future benefit payments.
72
Table of Contents
Consolidated Statement of Income
PepsiCo, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Fiscal years ended December 28, 2019 , December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017
(in millions except per share amounts)
 
 2019  2018 2017
Net Revenue $ 67,161  $ 64,661 $ 63,525
Cost of sales 30,132  29,381 28,796
Gross profit 37,029  35,280 34,729
Selling, general and administrative expenses 26,738  25,170 24,453
Operating Pr ofit 10,291  10,110 10,276
Other pension and retiree medical benefits (expense)/income (44) 298 233
Interest expense (1,135 ) (1,525 ) (1,151 )
Interest income and other 200  306 244
Income before income taxes 9,312  9,189 9,602
Provision for/(benefit from) income taxes (See Note 5) 1,959  (3,370 ) 4,694
Net income 7,353  12,559 4,908
Less: Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 39  44 51
Net Income Attributable to PepsiCo $ 7,314  $ 12,515 $ 4,857
Net Income Attributable to PepsiCo per  Common Shar e   
Basic $ 5.23  $ 8.84 $ 3.40
Diluted $ 5.20  $ 8.78 $ 3.38
Weighted-average common shares outstanding   
Basic 1,399  1,415 1,425
Diluted 1,407  1,425 1,438
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
73
Table of Contents
Consolidated Statement of Compr ehensive Income
PepsiCo, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Fiscal years ended December 28, 2019 , December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017
(in millions)
 2019 2018  2017
Net income $ 7,353 $ 12,559  $ 4,908
Other comprehensive income/(loss), net of taxes:   
Net currency translation adjustment 628 (1,641 ) 1,109
Net change on cash flow hedges (90) 40  (36)
Net pension and retiree medical adjustments 283 (467) (159)
Net change on available-for -sale securities (2) 6 (68)
Other — —  16
 819 (2,062 ) 862
Comprehensive income 8,172 10,497  5,770
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling
interests (39) (44) (51)
Compr ehensive Income Attributable to PepsiCo $ 8,133 $ 10,453  $ 5,719
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
74
Table of Contents
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows
PepsiCo, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Fiscal years ended December 28, 2019 , December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017
(in millions)
 2019 2018  2017
Operating Activities   
Net income $ 7,353 $ 12,559  $ 4,908
Depreciation and amortization 2,432 2,399  2,369
Share-based compensation expense 237 256  292
Restructuring and impairment char ges 370 308  295
Cash payments for restructuring char ges (350) (255) (113)
Pension and retiree medical plan expenses 519 221  221
Pension and retiree medical plan contributions (716) (1,708 ) (220)
Deferred income taxes and other tax char ges and credits 453 (531) 619
Net tax related to the TCJ Act (8) (28) 2,451
Tax payments related to the TCJ Act (423) (115) —
Other net tax benefits related to international reor ganizations (2) (4,347 ) —
Change in assets and liabilities:   
Accounts and notes receivable (650) (253) (202)
Inventories (190) (174) (168)
Prepaid expenses and other current assets (87) 9 20
Accounts payable and other current liabilities 735 882  201
Income taxes payable (287) 448  (338)
Other , net 263 (256) (305)
Net Cash Pr ovided by Operating Activities 9,649 9,415  10,030
Investing Activities   
Capital spending (4,232 ) (3,282 ) (2,969 )
Sales of property , plant and equipment 170 134  180
Acquisition of SodaStream, net of cash and cash equivalents acquired (1,939 ) (1,197 ) —
Other acquisitions and investments in noncontrolled af filiates (778) (299) (61)
Divestitures 253 505  267
Short-term investments, by original maturity:   
More than three months - purchases — (5,637 ) (18,385 )
More than three months - maturities 16 12,824  15,744
More than three months - sales 62 1,498  790
Three months or less, net 19 16 2
Other investing, net (8) 2 29
Net Cash (Used for)/Pr ovided by Investing Activities (6,437 ) 4,564  (4,403 )
Financing Activities   
Proceeds from issuances of long-term debt 4,621 — 7,509
Payments of long-term debt (3,970 ) (4,007 ) (4,406 )
Debt redemption/cash tender and exchange of fers (1,007 ) (1,589 ) —
Short-term borrowings, by original maturity:   
More than three months - proceeds 6 3 91
More than three months - payments (2) (17) (128)
Three months or less, net (3) (1,352 ) (1,016 )
Cash dividends paid (5,304 ) (4,930 ) (4,472 )
Share repurchases - common (3,000 ) (2,000 ) (2,000 )
Share repurchases - preferred — (2) (5)
Proceeds from exercises of stock options 329 281  462
Withholding tax payments on r estricted stock units (RSUs), performance stock units (PSUs) and
PepsiCo equity performance units (PEPunits)  converted (114) (103) (145)
Other financing (45) (53) (76)
Net Cash Used for  Financing Activities (8,489 ) (13,769 ) (4,186 )
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash 78 (98) 47
Net (Decr ease)/Incr ease in Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash (5,199 ) 112 1,488
Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash, Beginning of Year 10,769 10,657  9,169
Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash, End of Year $ 5,570 $ 10,769  $ 10,657
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
75
Table of Contents
Consolidated Balance Sheet
PepsiCo, Inc. and Subsidiaries
December 28, 2019  and December 29, 2018
(in millions except per share amounts)
 2019 2018
ASSETS  
Current Assets  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 5,509$ 8,721
Short-term investments 229 272
Restricted cash — 1,997
Accounts and notes receivable, net 7,822 7,142
Inventories 3,338 3,128
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 747 633
Total Current Assets 17,645 21,893
Property, Plant and Equipment, net 19,305 17,589
Amortizable Intangible Assets, net 1,433 1,644
Goodwill 15,501 14,808
Other indefinite-lived intangible assets 14,610 14,181
Indefinite-Lived Intangible Assets 30,111 28,989
Investments in Noncontrolled Affiliates 2,683 2,409
Deferred Income Taxes 4,359 4,364
Other Assets 3,011 760
Total Assets $ 78,547$ 77,648
  
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY  
Current Liabilities  
Short-term debt obligations $ 2,920$ 4,026
Accounts payable and other current liabilities 17,541 18,112
Total Current Liabilities 20,461 22,138
Long-Term Debt Obligations 29,148 28,295
Deferred Income Taxes 4,091 3,499
Other Liabilities 9,979 9,114
Total Liabilities 63,679 63,046
Commitments and contingencies
PepsiCo Common Shareholders’ Equity  
Common stock, par value 12/3¢ per share (authorized 3,600 shares; issued, net of repurchased
common stock at par value: 1,391 and 1,409 shares, respectively) 23 23
Capital in excess of par value 3,886 3,953
Retained earnings 61,946 59,947
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (14,300) (15,119)
Repurchased common stock, in excess of par value (476 and 458 shares, respectively) (36,769) (34,286)
Total PepsiCo Common Shareholders’ Equity 14,786 14,518
Noncontrolling interests 82 84
Total Equity 14,868 14,602
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 78,547$ 77,648
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
76
Table of Contents
Consolidated Statement of Equity
PepsiCo, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Fiscal years ended December 28, 2019 , December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017
(in millions)  
 2019 2018 2017
 Shares Amount Shares Amount Shares Amount
Preferred Stock     
Balance, beginning of year— $ — 0.8 $ 41 0.8 $ 41
Conversion to common stock— — (0.1) (6) — —
Retirement of preferred stock— — (0.7) (35) — —
Balance, end of year— — — — 0.8 41
Repurchased Preferred Stock      
Balance, beginning of year— — (0.7) (197) (0.7) (192)
Redemptions— — — (2) — (5)
Retirement of preferred stock— — 0.7 199 — —
Balance, end of year— — — — (0.7) (197)
Common Stock      
Balance, beginning of year1,409 23 1,420 24 1,428 24
Shares issued in connection with preferred stock conversion to
common stock — — 1 — — —
Change in repurchased common stock(18) — (12) (1) (8) —
Balance, end of year1,391 23 1,409 23 1,420 24
Capital in Excess of Par Value      
Balance, beginning of year 3,953  3,996  4,091
Share-based compensation expense 235  250  290
Equity issued in connection with preferred stock conversion to
common stock  —  6  —
Stock option exercises, RSUs, PSUs and PEPunits converted (188)  (193)  (236)
Withholding tax on RSUs, PSUs and PEPunits converted (114)  (103)  (145)
Other —  (3)  (4)
Balance, end of year 3,886  3,953  3,996
Retained Earnings      
Balance, beginning of year 59,947  52,839  52,518
Cumulative effect of accounting changes 8  (145)  —
Net income attributable to PepsiCo 7,314  12,515  4,857
Cash dividends declared - common (a) (5,323)  (5,098)  (4,536)
Retirement of preferred stock —  (164)  —
Balance, end of year 61,946  59,947  52,839
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss      
Balance, beginning of year (15,119)  (13,057)  (13,919)
Other comprehensive income/(loss) attributable to PepsiCo 819  (2,062)  862
Balance, end of year (14,300)  (15,119)  (13,057)
Repurchased Common Stock      
Balance, beginning of year(458) (34,286) (446) (32,757) (438) (31,468)
Share repurchases(24) (3,000) (18) (2,000) (18) (2,000)
Stock option exercises, RSUs, PSUs and PEPunits converted6 516 6 469 10 708
Other— 1 — 2 — 3
Balance, end of year(476) (36,769) (458) (34,286) (446) (32,757)
Total PepsiCo Common Shareholders’ Equity 14,786  14,518  11,045
Noncontrolling Interests      
Balance, beginning of year 84  92  104
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 39  44  51
Distributions to noncontrolling interests (42)  (49)  (62)
Other, net 1  (3)  (1)
Balance, end of year 82  84  92
Total Equity  $ 14,868  $ 14,602  $ 10,981
(a) Cash dividends declared per common share were $3.7925, $3.5875 and $3.1675 for 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
See accompanying notes to the consolidated financial statements.
77
Table of Contents
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
Note 1 — Basis of Pr esentation and Our  Divisions
Basis of Presentation
The accom panying consolidated financial statements have been prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP  and
include the consolidated accounts of PepsiCo, Inc. and the affiliates that we control. In addition, we include
our share of the results of certain other affiliates using the equity method based on our economic ownership
interest, our ability to exercise significant influence over the operating or financial decisions of these
affiliates or our ability to direct their economic resources. We do not control  these other affiliates, as our
ownership in these other affiliates is generally 50% or less. Intercomp any balances and transactions are
eliminated. As a result of exchange restrictions and other operating restrictions, we do not have control over
our Venezuelan subsidiaries. As such, our Venezuelan subsidiaries are not included within our consolidated
financial results for any period presented.
Raw materials, direct labor and plant overhead, as well as purchasing and receiving costs, costs directly
related to production planning, inspectio n costs and raw materials handling facilities, are included in cost of
sales. The costs of moving, storing and delivering finished product, including merchandising activities, are
included in selling, general and administrative expenses.
The preparation of our consolidated financial statements requires us to make estimates and assumptions that
affect reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues, expenses and disclosure of contingent assets and
liabilities. Estimates are used in determ ining, among other items, sales incentives accruals, tax reserves,
share-based compen sation, pension and retiree medical accruals, amounts and useful lives for intangible
assets and future cash flows associated with impairment testing for indefinite-lived brands, goodwill and
other long-lived assets. We evaluate our estimates on an ongoing basis using our historical experience, as well
as other factors we believe appropriate under the circumstances, such as current economic conditions, and
adjust or revise our estimates as circumstances change. As future events and their effect cannot be determined
with precision, actual results could dif fer significantly from these estimates.
Our fiscal  year ends on the last Saturday of each December , resulting in an additional week of results every
five or six years. While our North America results are reported on a weekly calendar basis, substantially all of
our international operations report on a monthly calendar basis. Certain operations in our Europe segment
report on a weekly calendar basis. The following chart details our quarterly reporting schedule for the three
years presented:
Quarter United States and Canada  International
First Quarter 12 weeks  January , February
Second Quarter 12 weeks  March, April and May
Third Quarter 12 weeks  June, July and August
Fourth Quarter 16 weeks  September , October , November and December
Unless otherwise noted, tabular dollars  are in millions, except per share amounts. All per share amounts
reflect common per share amounts, assume dilution unless otherwise noted, and are based on unrounded
amounts. Certain reclassifications were made to the prior years’  consolidated financial statements to conform
to the current year presentation.
Our Divisions
During the fourth quarter of 2019, we realigned our ESSA  and AMENA  reportable segments to be consistent
78
Table of Contents
with a recent strategic realignment of our organizational structure and how our Chief Executive Officer
assesses the performance of, and allocates resources to, our reportable segments. As a result, our beverage,
food and snack businesses in North Africa, the Middle East and South Asia that were part of our former
AMENA  segment and our businesses in Sub-Saharan Africa that were part of our former ESSA  segment are
now reported together as our AMESA  segment. The remaining beverage, food and snack businesses that were
part of our former AMENA  segment are now reported together as our APAC segment and our beverage, food
and snack businesses in Europe are now reported as our Europe segment.
These changes did not impact our FLNA , QFNA, PBNA  or LatAm reportable segments or our consolidated
financial results.
Our historical segment reporting presen ted in this report has been retrospectively revised to reflect the new
organizational structure.
We are or ganized into seven  reportable segments (also referred to as divisions), as follows:
1)FLNA, which includes our branded food and snack businesses in the United States and Canada;
2)QFNA, which includes our cereal, rice, pasta and other branded food businesses in the United States
and Canada;
3)PBNA, which includes our beverage businesses in the United States and Canada;
4)LatAm, which includes all of our beverage, food and snack businesses in Latin America;
5)Europe, which includes all of our beverage, food and snack businesses in Europe;
6)AMESA, which includes all of our beverage, food and snack businesses in Africa, the Middle East
and South Asia; and
7)APAC, which includes all of our beverage, food and snack businesses in Asia Pacific, Australia and
New Zealand and China region.
Through our operations, authorized bottlers, contract manufacturers and other third parties, we make, market,
distribute and sell a wide variety of convenient beverages, foods and snacks, serving customers and
consumers in more than 200 countries and territories with our largest operations in the United States, Mexico,
Russia, Canada, the United Kingdom, China and Brazil .
The accounting policies for the division s are the same as those described in Note 2, except for the following
allocation methodologies:
•share-based compensation expense;
•pension and retiree medical expense; and
•derivatives.
Share-Based Compensation Expense
Our divisi ons are held accountable for share-based compensation expense and, therefore, this expense is
allocated to our divisions as an incremental employee compensation cost.
79
Table of Contents
The allocation of share-based compensation expense of each division is as follows:
 2019 2018 2017
FLNA 13% 13% 13%
QFNA 1% 1% 1%
PBNA 17% 18% 18%
LatAm 7% 8% 7%
Europe 17% 9% 9%
AMESA 3% 4% 5%
APAC 5% 4% 4%
Corporate unallocated expenses 37% 43% 43%
The expense allocated to our divisions excludes any impact of changes in our assumptions during the year
which reflect market conditions over which division management has no control. Therefore, any variances
between allocated expense and our actual expense are recognized in corporate unallocated expenses.
Pension and Retir ee Medical Expense
Pension and retiree medical service costs measured at fixed discount rates are reflected in division results.
The variance between the fixed discount rate used to determine the service cost reflected in division results
and the discount rate as disclosed in Note 7 is reflected in corporate unallocated expenses.
Derivatives
We centrally manage commodity derivatives on behalf of our divisions. These commodity derivatives include
energy, agricultural products and metal s. Commodity derivatives that do not qualify for hedge accounting
treatment are marked to market each period with the resulting gains and losses recorded in corporate
unallocated expense s as either cost of sales or selling, general and administrativ e expenses, depending on the
underlying commod ity. These gains and losses are subsequently reflected in division results when the
divisions recognize the cost of the unde rlying commodity in operating profit. Therefore, the divisions realize
the econom ic effects of the derivative without experiencing any resulting mark-to-market volatility , which
remains in corporat e unallocated expenses. These derivatives hedge underlying commodity price risk and
were not entered into for trading or speculative purposes.
Net revenue and operating profit of each division are as follows:
 Net Revenue  Operating Profit
 2019(a)2018(a)2017 2019 2018 2017
FLNA $ 17,078$ 16,346$ 15,798 $ 5,258$ 5,008 $ 4,793
QFNA 2,482 2,465 2,503 544 637 640
PBNA 21,730 21,072 20,936 2,179 2,276 2,700
LatAm 7,573 7,354 7,208 1,141 1,049 924
Europe 11,728 10,973 10,522 1,327 1,256 1,199
AMESA 3,651 3,657 3,674 671 661 789
APAC 2,919 2,794 2,884 477 619 401
Total division 67,161 64,661 63,525 11,597 11,506 11,446
Corporate unallocated expenses — — — (1,306) (1,396) (1,170)
Total $ 67,161$ 64,661$ 63,525 $ 10,291$ 10,110 $ 10,276
(a) Our primary performance obligation is the distributio n and sales of beverage products and food and snack products to our customers, with
our food and snack business representing approximately 55% of our consolidated net revenue. Internationally , LatAm’ s food and snack
business is approximately 90% of the segment’ s net revenue, Europe’ s beverage business and food and snack business are approximately
55% and 45%, respec tively , of the segment’ s net revenue, AMESA ’s beverage business and food and snack business are approximately 40%
and 60%, respec tively , of the segment’ s net revenue and APAC’s beverage business and food and snack business are approximately 25% and
75%, respectively , of the segment’ s net revenue. Beverage revenue from company-owned bottlers, which primarily includes our consolidated
bottling operations in our PBNA  and Europe segments, is approximately 40% of our consolidated net revenue. Generally , our
80
Table of Contents
finished goods beverage operations produce higher net revenue, but lower operating margins as compared  to concentrate sold to authorized
bottling partners for the manufacture of finished goods beverages. See Note 2 for further information.
Corporate Unallocated Expenses
Corporate unallocated expenses include costs of our corporate headquarters, centrally managed initiatives
such as commodity derivative gains and losses, foreign exchange transaction gains and losses, our ongoing
business transforma tion initiatives, unallocated research and development costs, unallocated insurance and
benefit programs, and certain other items.
Other Division Information  
Total assets and capital spending of each division are as follows:
 Total Assets Capital Spending
 2019 2018 2019 2018 2017
FLNA $ 7,519$ 6,577 $ 1,227$ 840 $ 665
QFNA 941 870 104 53 44
PBNA 31,449 29,878 1,053 945 904
LatAm 7,007 6,458 557 492 481
Europe 17,814 16,887 613 466 463
AMESA 3,672 3,252 267 198 181
APAC 4,113 3,704 195 138 145
Total division 72,515 67,626 4,016 3,132 2,883
Corporate (a) 6,032 10,022 216 150 86
Total $ 78,547$ 77,648 $ 4,232$ 3,282 $ 2,969
(a) Corporate assets consist principally of certain cash and cash equivalents, restricted cash, short-term investments, derivative instruments,
property , plant and equipment and tax assets. In 2019 , the change in assets was primarily due to a decrease in cash and cash equivalents and
restricted cash.  Refer to the cash flow statement for additional information.
Amortization of intangible assets and depreciation and other amortization of each division are as follows:
 Amortization of 
Intangible AssetsDepreciation and
Other Amortization
 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
FLNA $ 7$ 7 $ 7 $ 492$ 457$ 449
QFNA — — — 44 45 47
PBNA 29 31 31 857 821 780
LatAm 5 5 5 270 253 245
Europe 37 23 22 341 319 317
AMESA 2 2 2 116 169 170
APAC 1 1 1 76 80 99
Total division 81 69 68 2,196 2,144 2,107
Corporate — — — 155 186 194
Total $ 81$ 69 $ 68 $ 2,351$ 2,330$ 2,301
81
Table of Contents
Net revenue and long-lived assets by country are as follows:
 Net Revenue Long-Lived Assets(a)
 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018
United States $ 38,644 $ 37,148 $ 36,546$ 30,601 $ 29,169
Mexico 4,190 3,878 3,650 1,666 1,404
Russia 3,263 3,191 3,232 4,314 3,926
Canada 2,831 2,736 2,691 2,695 2,565
United Kingdom 1,723 1,743 1,650 827 759
China 1,300 1,164 963 705 509
Brazil 1,295 1,335 1,427 590 639
All other countries 13,915 13,466 13,366 12,134 11,660
Total $ 67,161 $ 64,661 $ 63,525$ 53,532 $ 50,631
(a) Long-lived assets represent property , plant and equipment, indefinite-lived intangible assets, amortizable intangible assets and investments in
noncontrolled af filiates. These assets are reported in the country where they are primarily used.
Note 2 — Our Significant Accounting Policies
Revenue Recognition
We recognize revenue when our performance obligation is satisfied. Our primary performance obligation (the
distribution and sales of beverage products and food and snack products) is satisfied upon the shipment or
delivery of products to our customers, which is also when control is transferred. Merchandising activities are
performed after a customer obtains control of the product, are accounted for as fulfillment of our performance
obligation to ship or deliver product to our customers and are recorded in selling, general and administrative
expenses. Merchandising activities are immaterial in the context of our contracts.
The transfer of control of products to our customers is typically based on written  sales terms that do not allow
for a right of return. However , our policy for DSD and certain chilled produ cts is to remove and replace
damaged and out-of -date products from store shelves to ensure that consumers receive the product quality
and freshness they expect. Similarly , our policy for certain warehouse-distributed products is to replace
damaged and out-of-date products. As a result, we record reserves, based on estimates, for anticipated
damaged and out-of-date products.
As a resul t of the implementation of the revenue recognition guidance adopted  in the first quarter of 2018,
which did not have a material impact on our accounting policies, we record ed an adjustment in the first
quarter of 2018 of $137 million  to beginning retained earnings to reflect marketplace spending that our
customers and independent bottlers expect to be entitled to in line with revenue recognition. In addition,
starting in 2018, we excluded from net revenue and cost of sales all sales, use, value-added and certain excise
taxes assessed by governmental author ities on revenue-producing transaction s. The impact of these taxes
previously recognized in net revenue and cost of sales was approximately $75 million  for the fiscal year
ended December 30, 2017, with no impact on operating profit.
Our produ cts are sold for cash or on credit terms. Our credit terms, which are established in accordance with
local and industry practices, typically require payment within 30 days of delivery in the United States, and
generally within 30 to 90 days internationally , and may allow discounts for early payment.
We estima te and reserve for our bad debt exposure based on our experience with past due accounts and
collectibility , write-o ff history , the aging  of accounts receivable and our analysis of customer data. Bad debt
expense is classified within selling, general and administrative expenses on our income statement.
82
Table of Contents
We are exposed to concentration of credit risk from our major customers, including Walmart. In 2019 , sales
to Walmart and its affiliates (including Sam’ s) represented approximately 13% of our consolidated net
revenue, including concentrate sales to our independent bottlers, which were used in finished goods sold by
them to Walmart. We have not experienced credit issues with these customers.
Total Marketplace Spending
We offer sales incentives and discoun ts through various programs to customers and consumers. Total
marketplace spendin g includes sales incentives, discounts, advertising and other marketing activities. Sales
incentives and discounts are primarily accounted for as a reduction of reven ue and include payments to
customers for performing activities on our behalf, such as payments for in-store displays, payments to gain
distribution of new products, payments for shelf space and discounts to prom ote lower retail prices. Sales
incentives and discounts also include support provided to our independent bottlers through funding of
advertising and other marketing activities.
A number of our sales incentives, such as bottler funding to independent bottlers and customer volume
rebates, are based on annual targets, and accruals are established during the year, as products are delivered,
for the expected payout, which may occur after year end once reconciled and settled. These accruals are
based on contract terms and our historical experience with similar programs and require management
judgment with respect to estimating customer and consumer participation and performance levels.
Differences betwee n estimated expense and actual incentive costs are normally insignificant and are
recognized in earnings in the period such differences are determined. In addition, certain advertising and
marketing costs are also based on annual tar gets and recognized during the year as incurred.
The terms  of most of our incentive arrangements do not exceed a year, and, therefore, do not require highly
uncertain long-term estimates. Certain arrangements, such as fountain pouring rights, may extend beyond one
year. Upfront payments to customers under these arrangements are recognized over the shorter of the
economic or contractual life, primarily as a reduction of revenue, and the remaining balances of $272 million
as of December 28, 2019  and $218 milli on as of December 29, 2018  are includ ed in prepaid expenses and
other current assets and other assets on our balance sheet.
For interim reporting, our policy is to allocate our forecasted full-year sales incentives for most of our
programs to each of our interim reporting periods in the same year that bene fits from the programs. The
allocation methodolo gy is based on our forecasted sales incentives for the full year and the proportion of each
interim period’ s actual gross revenue or volume, as applicable, to our forecasted annual gross revenue or
volume, as applicable. Based on our review of the forecasts at each interim period, any changes in estimates
and the related allocation of sales incentives are recognized beginning in the interim period that they are
identified. In addition, we apply a similar allocation methodology for interim reporting purposes for certain
advertising and other marketing activities. Our annual consolidated financial statements are not impacted by
this interim allocation methodology .
Advertising and other marketing activit ies, reported as selling, general and administrative expenses, totaled
$4.7 billion in 2019 , $4.2 billion in 2018  and $4.1 billion in 2017 , including  advertisi ng expenses of $3.0
billion  in 2019 , $2.6 billion in 2018  and $2.4 billion in 2017 . Deferred  advertising costs are not expensed
until the year first used and consist of:
•media and personal service prepayments;
•promotional materials in inventory; and
•production costs of future media advertising.
Deferred advertising  costs of $55 milli on and $47 milli on as of December 28, 2019  and December 29, 2018 ,
respectively , are classified as prepaid expenses and other current assets on our balance sheet.
83
Table of Contents
Distribution Costs
Distribution costs, including the costs of shipping and handling activi ties, which include certain
merchandising activ ities, are reported as selling, general and administrative expenses. Shipping and handling
expenses were $10.9 billion  in 2019 , $10.5 billion  in 2018  and $9.9 billion  in 2017 .
Software Costs
We capitalize certain computer softw are and software development costs incurred in connection with
developing or obtaining computer software for internal use when both the preliminary project stage is
completed and it is probable that the software will be used as intended. Capitalized software costs include
(1) external direct costs of materials and services utilized in developing or obtaining computer software,
(2) compensation and related benefits for employees who are directly associat ed with the software projects
and (3) interest costs incurred while developing internal-use computer softwar e. Capitalized software costs
are included in property , plant and equipment on our balance sheet and amortized on a straight-line basis
when placed into service over the estim ated useful lives of the software, which approximate five to 10 years.
Software amortization totaled $166 million  in 2019 , $204 million  in 2018  and $224 million  in 2017 . Net
capitalized software and development costs were $572 million  and $577 million  as of December 28, 2019  and
December 29, 2018 , respectively .
Commitments and Contingencies
We are subject to various claims and contingencies related to lawsuits, certain taxes and environmental
matters, as well as commitments under contractual and other commercial obligations. We recognize liabilities
for contingencies and commitments when a loss is probable and estimable.
Research and Development
We engage in a variety of research and development activities and continue to invest to accelerate growth and
to drive innovation  globally . Consumer research is excluded from research and development costs and
included in other marketing costs. Research and development costs were $711 million , $680 million  and $737
million  in 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , respectively , and are reported within selling, general and administrative
expenses.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
Indefinite-lived intan gible assets and goodwill are not amortized and, as a result , are assessed for impairment
at least annually , using either a qualita tive or quantitative approach. We perform this annual assessment
during our third quarter , or more frequently if circumstances indicate that the carrying value may not be
recoverable. Where we use the qualitative assessment, first we determine if, based on qualitative factors, it is
more likely than not that an impairment exists. Factors considered include macroeconomic, industry and
competitive conditio ns, legal and regulatory environment, historical financial  performance and significant
changes in the brand or reporting unit. If the qualitative assessment indicates that it is more likely than not
that an impairment exists, then a quantitative assessment is performed.
In the quantitative assessment for indefinite lived-intangible assets and goodwill, an assessment is performed
to determine the fair value of the indefinite-lived intangible asset and the reporting unit, respectively .
Estimated fair value is determined using discounted cash flows and requires an analysis of several estimates
including future cash flows or income consistent with management’ s strategic business plans, annual sales
growth rates, perpetuity growth assumptions and the selection of assumption s underlying a discount rate
(weighted-average cost of capital) based on market data available at the time. Significant management
judgment is necessary to estimate the impact of competitive operating, macroeconomic and other factors to
estimate future levels of sales, operating profit or cash flows. All assumptions used in our impairment
evaluations for indefinite-lived intangible assets and goodwill, such as forecasted growth rates (including
perpetuity growth assumptions) and weighted-average cost of capital, are based on the best available market
84
Table of Contents
information and are consistent with our internal forecasts and operating plans. A deterioration in these
assumptions could adversely impact our results.
Amortizable intangible assets are only evaluated for impairment upon a signific ant change in the operating or
macroeconomic environment. If an evaluation of the undiscounted future cash flows indicates impairment,
the asset is written down to its estimated fair value, which is based on its discounted future cash flows.
See Note 4 for further information.
Other Significant Accounting Policies
Our other significant accounting policies are disclosed as follows:
•Basis of Presentation  – Note 1 includes a description of our policies regarding use of estimates, basis
of presentation and consolidation.
•Property , Plant and Equipment – Note 4.
•Income T axes – Note 5.
•Share-Based Compensation –  Note 6.
•Pension, Retir ee Medical and Savings Plans  – Note 7.
•Financial Instruments  – Note 9.
•Cash Equivalents  – Cash equivalents  are highly liquid investments with original maturities of three
months or less.
•Inventories – Note 15. Inventor ies are valued at the lower of cost or net realizable value. Cost is
determined using the average; first-in, first-out (FIFO) or, in limited instances, last-in, first-out (LIFO)
methods.
•Translation of Financial Statements of Foreign Subsidiaries  – Financial statem ents of foreign
subsidiaries are translated into U.S. dollars using period-end exchange rates for assets and liabilities
and weighted-average exchange rates for revenues and expenses. Adjustments resulting from
translating net assets are reported as a separate component of accumulated other comprehensive loss
within common shareholders’  equity as currency translation adjustment.
Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements - Adopted
In 2018, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued guidance related to the TCJ Act for the
optional reclassifica tion of the residual tax effects, arising from the change in corporate tax rate, in
accumulated other comprehensive loss to retained earnings. The reclassification is the difference between the
amount previously recorded in other comprehensive income at the historical U.S. federal tax rate that remains
in accumu lated other comprehensive loss at the time the TCJ Act was effective and the amount that would
have been recorded using the newly enacted rate. This guidance became effective during the first quarter of
2019; however , we did not elect to make the optional reclassification.
In 2017, the FASB issued guidance to amend and simplify the application of hedge accounting guidance to
better portray the economic results of risk management activities in the financial statements. The guidance
expands the ability to hedge nonfinanc ial and financial risk components, reduces complexity in fair value
hedges of interest rate risk, eliminates the requirement to separately measure and report hedge
ineffectiveness, as well as eases certain hedge effectiveness assessment requir ements. Under this guidance,
certain of our derivatives used to hedge commodity price risk that did not previously qualify for hedge
accounting treatmen t can now qualify prospectively . We adopted this guidance during the first quarter of
2019; the adoption did not have a material impact on our consolidated financial statements or disclosures. See
Note 9 for further information.
In 2016, the FASB issued guidance on leases, with amendments issued in 2018. The guidance requires lessees
to recogni ze most leases on the balance sheet, but does not change the manner in which expenses are
recorded
85
Table of Contents
in the income statement. For lessors, the guidance modifies the classification criteria and the accounting for
sales-type and direct financing leases. The two permitted transition methods under the guidance are the
modified retrospective transition approa ch, which requires application of the guidance for all comparative
periods presented, and the cumulative effect adjustment approach, which requires prospective application at
the adoption date.
We utilized a comp rehensive approach to assess the impact of this guidance on our consolidated financial
statements and related disclosures, including the increase in the assets and liabilities on our balance sheet and
the impact on our current lease portfolio from both a lessor and lessee perspective. We completed our
comprehensive revie w of our lease portfolio, including significant leases by geography and by asset type that
were impacted by the new guidance, and enhanced our controls. In addition, we implemented a new software
platform, and corresponding controls, for administering our leases and facilitating compliance with the new
guidance.
We adopted the guidance prospectively during the first quarter of 2019. As part of our adoption, we elected
not to reassess historical lease classifica tion, recognize short-term leases on our balance sheet, nor separate
lease and non-lease components for our real estate leases. In addition, we utilized the portfolio approach to
group leases with similar characteristics and did not use hindsight to determine lease term. The adoption did
not have a material impact on our conso lidated financial statements, resulting in an increase of 2% to each of
our total assets and total liabilities on our balance sheet, and had an immaterial  increase to retained earnings
as of the beginning of 2019. See Note 13 for further information.
Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements - Not Yet Adopted
In 2019, the FASB issued guidance to simplify the accounting for income taxes. The guidance primarily
addresses how to (1) recognize a deferred tax liability after we transition to or from the equity method of
accounting, (2) evaluate if a step–up in the tax basis of goodwill is related to a business combination or is a
separate transaction, (3) recognize all the effects of a change in tax law in the period of enactment, including
adjusting the estimated annual tax rate, and (4) include the amount of tax based on income in the income tax
provision and any incremental amount as a tax not based on income for hybrid  tax regimes. The guidance is
effective in the first quarter of 2021 with early adoption permitted. We are currently evaluating the impact of
this guidance on our consolidated financial statements and the timing of adoption.
In 2016, the FASB issued guidance that changes the impairment model used to measure credit losses for most
financial assets. For our trade, certain other receivables and certain other financial instruments, we will be
required to use a new forward-looking expected credit loss model that will replace the existing incurred credit
loss model, which would generally result in earlier recognition of allowances for credit losses. We will adopt
the guidance when it becomes effective in the first quarter of 2020. The guidance is not expected to have a
material impact on our consolidated financial statements or disclosures.
Note 3 — Restructuring and Impairment Charges
A summary of our restructuring and impairment char ges and other productivity initiatives is as follows:
 2019 2018 2017
2019 Productivity Plan $ 370$ 138$ —
2014 Productivity Plan — 170 295
Total restructuring and impairment charges 370 308 295
Other productivity initiatives 3 8 16
Total restructuring and impairment charges and other
productivity initiatives $ 373$ 316$ 311
86
Table of Contents
2019 Multi-Y ear Productivity Plan
The 2019 Productiv ity Plan, publicly announced on February 15, 2019, will levera ge new technology and
business models to further simplify , harmonize and automate processes; re-engineer our go-to-market and
information systems , including deploying the right automation for each market; and simplify our organization
and optimize our manufacturing and supply chain footprint.  In connection with this plan, we expect to incur
pre-tax charges of approximately $2.5 billion  and cash expenditures of approximately  $1.6 billion . These pre-
tax charges are expected to consist of approximately 70% of severance and other employee-relat ed costs,
15% for asset impairments (all non-cash) resulting from plant closures and related actions, and 15% for other
costs associated with the implementation of our initiatives. We expect to complete this plan by 2023.
The total expected plan pre-tax char ges are expected to be incurred by division approximately as follows:
 FLNA QFNA PBNA  LatAm Europe AMESA APAC Corporate
Expected pre-tax
charges 11% 2% 30% 10% 25% 8% 5% 9%
A summary of our 2019 Productivity Plan char ges is as follows:
 2019 2018
Cost of sales $ 115$ 3
Selling, general and administrative expenses 253 100
Other pension and retiree medical benefits expense 2 35
Total restructuring and impairment charges $ 370$ 138
After-tax amount $ 303$ 109
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share $ 0.21$ 0.08
 2019 2018 Plan to Date
through 12/28/2019
FLNA $ 22 $ 31 $ 53
QFNA 2 5 7
PBNA 51 40 91
LatAm 62 9 71
Europe 99 6 105
AMESA 38 3 41
APAC 47 2 49
Corporate 47 7 54
 368 103 471
Other pension and retiree medical benefits expense 2 35 37
Total $ 370 $ 138 $ 508
 Plan to Date
through 12/28/2019
Severance and other employee costs $ 286
Asset impairments 92
Other costs (a)130
Total $ 508
(a) Includes other costs associated with the implementation of our initiatives, including contract termination costs, consulting and other
professional fees.
87
Table of Contents
A summary of our 2019 Productivity Plan activity is as follows:
 Severance
and Other
Employee CostsAsset
Impairments Other Costs Total
2018 restructuring charges $ 137$ — $ 1$ 138
Non-cash charges and translation (32) — — (32)
Liability as of December 29, 2018 105 — 1 106
2019 restructuring charges 149 92 129 370
Cash payments (a)(138) — (119) (257)
Non-cash charges and translation 12 (92) 10 (70)
Liability as of December 28, 2019 $ 128$ — $ 21$ 149
(a) Excludes cash expenditures of $4 million  reported in the cash flow statement in pension and retiree medical contributions.
Substantially all of the restructuring accrual at December 28, 2019  is expected to be paid by the end of 2020 .
2014 Multi-Y ear Productivity Plan
The 2014  Productiv ity Plan, publicly announced on February 13, 2014, included the next generation of
productivity initiatives that we believed would strengthen our beverage, food and snack businesses by:
accelerating our investment in manuf acturing automation; further optimizin g our global manufacturing
footprint, including  closing certain manufacturing facilities; re-engineering our go-to-market systems in
developed markets; expanding shared services; and implementing simplified organization structures to drive
efficiency . To build on the 2014 Productivity Plan, in the fourth quarter of 2017 , we expanded and extended
the plan through the end of 2019 to take advantage of additional opportunities within the initiatives described
above that further strengthened our beverage, food and snack businesses.
The 2014 Productivity Plan was comple ted in 2019. In 2019, there were no material pre-tax charges related to
this plan and all cash payments were paid at year end. The total plan pre-tax charges and cash expenditures
approximated the previously disclosed plan estimates of $1.3 billion  and $960 milli on, respectively . These
total plan pre-tax charges consisted of 59% of severance and other employee costs, 15% of asset impairments
and 26% of other costs, including costs associated with the implementation of our initiatives, including
certain consulting and other contract termination costs. These total plan pre-t ax charges were incurred by
division as follows: FLNA  14%, QFNA  3%, PBNA  29%, LatAm 15%, Europe 23%, AMESA  3%, APAC 3%
and Corporate 10%.
A summary of our 2014 Productivity Plan char ges is as follows:
 2018 2017
Selling, general and administrative expenses $ 169$ 229
Other pension and retiree medical benefits expense 1 66
Total restructuring and impairment charges $ 170$ 295
After-tax amount $ 143$ 224
Net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share $ 0.10$ 0.16
88
Table of Contents
 2018 2017
FLNA $ 8$ 67
QFNA 2 11
PBNA 51 54
LatAm 30 63
Europe 53 53
AMESA 15 2
APAC (a)12 (5)
Corporate (b)(1) 50
Total $ 170$ 295
(a) Income amount primarily reflects a gain on the sale of property , plant and equipment.
(b) Income amount primarily relates to other pension and retiree medical benefits.
A summary of our 2014 Productivity Plan activity is as follows:
 Severance
and Other
Employee CostsAsset
Impairments Other Costs  Total
Liability as of December 31, 2016 $ 88$ —  $ 8 $ 96
2017 restructuring charges 280 21 (6)(a) 295
Cash payments (91) —  (22) (113)
Non-cash charges and translation (65) (21) 34 (52)
Liability as of December 30, 2017 212 —  14 226
2018 restructuring charges 86 28 56 170
Cash payments (b)(203) —  (52) (255)
Non-cash charges and translation (4) (28) 5 (27)
Liability as of December 29, 2018 91 —  23 114
Cash payments (77) —  (16) (93)
Non-cash charges and translation (14) —  (7) (21)
Liability as of December 28, 2019 $ — $ —  $ — $ —
(a) Income amount represents adjustments for changes in estimates and a gain on the sale of property , plant, and equipment.
(b) Excludes cash expenditures of $11 million  reported in the cash flow statement in pension and retiree medical plan contributions.
Other Productivity Initiatives
There were no material charges related to other productivity and efficiency initiatives outside the scope of the
2019 and 2014 Productivity Plans.
We regula rly evalua te different productivity initiatives beyond the productivity plans and other initiatives
described above.
89
Table of Contents
Note 4 — Property , Plant and Equipment and Intangible Assets
A summary of our property , plant and equipment is as follows:
 Average
Useful Life
(Years) 2019 2018  2017
Property, plant and equipment, net    
Land $ 1,130 $ 1,078  
Buildings and improvements 15 - 44 9,314 8,941  
Machinery and equipment, including fleet and software 5 - 15 29,390 27,715  
Construction in progress 3,169 2,430  
43,003 40,164  
Accumulated depreciation (23,698 ) (22,575 ) 
Total $19,305 $17,589  
Depreciation expense $ 2,257 $ 2,241  $ 2,227
Property , plant and equipment is recorde d at historical cost. Depreciation and amortization are recognized on
a straight-line basis over an asset’ s estimated useful life. Land is not depreciated and construction in progress
is not depreciated until ready for service.
A summary of our amortizable intangible assets is as follows:
 2019 2018 2017
 Average
Useful Life
(Years) Gross  Accumulated
Amortization  Net Gross  Accumulated
Amortization  Net
Amortizable intangible assets,
net        
Acquired franchise rights 56 – 60 $ 846  $ (158) $ 688 $ 838  $ (140) $ 698
Reacquired franchise rights 5 – 14 106  (105) 1 106  (105) 1
Brands 20 – 40 1,326  (1,066 ) 260 1,306  (1,032 ) 274
Other identifiable intangibles (a)10 – 24 810  (326) 484 959  (288) 671
Total $3,088  $ (1,655 ) $1,433 $3,209  $ (1,565 ) $1,644
Amortization expense    $ 81    $ 69 $68
(a) The change from 2018 to 2019 primarily reflects revisions to the purchase price allocation for our acquisition of SodaStream.
Amortization of intangible assets for each of the next five years, based on existing intangible assets as of
December 28, 2019  and using average 2019  foreign exchange rates, is expected to be as follows:
 2020 2021 2022  2023 2024
Five-year projected amortization $ 82 $ 80 $ 77 $ 75 $ 74
Depreciable and amortizable assets are evaluated for impairment upon a significant change in the operating
or macroeconomic environment. In these circumstances, if an evaluation of the undiscounted cash flows
indicates impairment, the asset is written down to its estimated fair value, which is based on discounted
future cash flows. Useful lives are perio dically evaluated to determine whether events or circumstances have
occurred which indicate the need for revision.
Indefinite-Lived Intangible Assets
We did not recognize any impairment charges for goodwill in each of the years ended December 28, 2019 ,
December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017 . We did not recognize any material impairment charges
for indefinite-lived intangible assets in each of the years ended December 28, 2019 , December 29, 2018  and
December 30, 2017 . As of December 28, 2019 , the estimated fair values of our indefi nite-lived reacquired
and acquired franchise rights recorded at PBNA  exceeded their carrying values. However , there could be an
90
Table of Contents
impairment of the carrying value of PBNA ’s reacquired and acquired franchise  rights if future revenues and
their contribution to the operating results of PBNA ’s CSD business do not achieve our expected future cash
flows or if macroeconomic conditions result in a future increase in the weighted-average cost of capital used
to estimate fair value. We have also analyzed the impact of the macroeconomic conditions in Russia and
Brazil on the estimated fair value of our indefinite-lived intangible assets in these countries and have
concluded that there were no impairmen ts for the year ended December 28, 2019 . However , there could be an
impairment of the carrying value of certain brands in these countries, including juice and dairy brands in
Russia, if there is a deterioration in these conditions, if future revenues and their contributions to the
operating results do not achieve our expected future cash flows (including perpetuity growth assumptions), if
there are significant changes in the decisions regarding assets that do not perform consistent with our
expectations, or if macroeconomic conditions result in a future increase in the weighted-average cost of
capital used to estim ate fair value. For further information on our policies for indefinite-lived intangible
assets, see Note 2.
91
Table of Contents
The change in the book value of indefinite-lived intangible assets is as follows:
Balance,
Beginning
2018  Acquisitions/
(Divestitures) Translation
and Other Balance,
End of
2018  Acquisitions/
(Divestitures)Translation
and Other Balance,
End of
2019
FLNA      
Goodwill$ 280 $ 28 $ (11) $ 297 $ (3)$ 5 $ 299
Brands25 138 (2) 161 — 1 162
Total305 166 (13) 458 (3) 6 461
QFNA      
Goodwill175 9 — 184 6 (1) 189
Brands — 25 — 25 (14) — 11
Total 175 34 — 209 (8) (1) 200
PBNA (a)      
Goodwill9,854 — (41) 9,813 66 19 9,898
Reacquired franchise rights7,126 — (68) 7,058 — 31 7,089
Acquired franchise rights1,525 — (15) 1,510 — 7 1,517
Brands353 — — 353 418 (8) 763
Total18,858 — (124) 18,734 484 49 19,267
LatAm      
Goodwill555 — (46) 509 — (8) 501
Brands 141 — (14) 127 — (2) 125
Total 696 — (60) 636 — (10) 626
Europe (b) (c)      
Goodwill3,202 526 (367) 3,361 440 160 3,961
Reacquired franchise rights549 (1) (51) 497 — 8 505
Acquired franchise rights195 (25) (9) 161 — (4) 157
Brands2,545 1,993 (350) 4,188 (139) 132 4,181
Total6,491 2,493 (777) 8,207 301 296 8,804
AMESA        
Goodwill 437 — — 437 11 (2) 446
Total 437 — — 437 11 (2) 446
APAC         
Goodwill241 — (34) 207 — — 207
Brands111 — (10) 101 — (1) 100
Total352 — (44) 308 — (1) 307
         
Total goodwill14,744 563 (499) 14,808 520 173 15,501
Total reacquired franchise rights7,675 (1) (119) 7,555 — 39 7,594
Total acquired franchise rights1,720 (25) (24) 1,671 — 3 1,674
Total brands 3,175 2,156 (376) 4,955 265 122 5,342
Total $ 27,314 $ 2,693 $ (1,018) $ 28,989 $ 785 $ 337 $ 30,111
(a) The change in acquisitions/(divestitures) in 2019 is primarily related to our acquisition of CytoSport Inc.
(b) The change in acquisitions /(divestitures) in 2019 and 2018 is primarily related to our acquisition of SodaStream. See Note 14 for further
information.
(c) The change in translation and other in 2019 primarily reflects the appreciation of the Russian ruble. The change in translation and other in
2018 primarily reflects the depreciation of the Russian ruble, euro and Pound sterling.
92
Table of Contents
Note 5 — Income Taxes
The components of income before income taxes are as follows:
  2019 2018 2017
United States  $ 4,123 $ 3,864 $ 3,452
Foreign  5,189 5,325 6,150
  $ 9,312 $ 9,189 $ 9,602
The provision for/(benefit from) income taxes consisted of the following:
 2019  2018 2017
Current: U.S. Federal $ 652  $ 437 $ 4,925
 Foreign 807  378 724
 State 196  63 136
  1,655  878 5,785
Deferred: U.S. Federal 325  140 (1,159 )
 Foreign (31) (4,379 ) (9)
 State 10  (9) 77
  304  (4,248 ) (1,091 )
  $ 1,959  $(3,370 )$ 4,694
A reconciliation of the U.S. Federal statutory tax rate to our annual tax rate is as follows:
 2019  2018 2017
U.S. Federal statutory tax rate 21.0 % 21.0 % 35.0 %
State income tax, net of U.S. Federal tax benefit 1.6  0.5 0.9
Lower taxes on foreign results (0.9) (2.2) (9.4)
One-time mandatory transition tax - TCJ Act (0.1) 0.1 41.4
Remeasurement of deferred taxes - TCJ Act —  (0.4) (15.9)
International reor ganizations —  (47.3) —
Tax settlements —  (7.8) —
Other , net (0.6) (0.6) (3.1)
Annual tax rate 21.0 % (36.7)% 48.9 %
Tax Cuts and Jobs Act
During the fourth quarter of 2017, the TCJ Act was enacted in the United States . Among its many provisions,
the TCJ Act imposed a mandatory one-t ime transition tax on undistributed intern ational earnings and reduced
the U.S. corporate income tax rate from 35% to 21%, effective January 1, 2018. 
In 2017, the SEC issued guidance related to the TCJ Act which allowed recording of provisional tax expense
using a measuremen t period, not to exceed one year, when information necessar y to complete the accounting
for the effects of the TCJ Act is not available. We elected to apply the measurement period provisions of this
guidance to certain income tax ef fects of the TCJ Act when it became ef fective in the fourth quarter of 2017.
As a result of the enactment of the TCJ Act, we recognized a provisional net tax expense of $2.5 billion
($1.70 per share) in the fourth quarter of 2017.  Included in the provisional net tax expense of $2.5 billion
recognized in 2017, was a provisional  mandatory one-time transition tax of approximately $4 billion on
undistributed international earnings, included in other liabilities. This provisional mandatory one-time
transition tax was partially of fset by a provisional $1.5 billion  benefit resulting from the required
93
Table of Contents
remeasurement of our deferred tax assets and liabilities to the new, lower U.S. corporate income tax rate,
effective January 1, 2018.  The effect of the remeasurement was recorded in the fourth quarter of 2017,
consistent with the enactment date of the TCJ Act, and reflected in our provision for income taxes.
The provisional measurement period allowed by the SEC ended in the fourth quarter of 2018. As a result, in
2018, we recognize d a net tax benefit of $28 million  ($0.02 per share) related to the TCJ Act, primarily
reflecting the impact of the final analysis of certain foreign exchange gains or losses, substantiation of foreign
tax credits , as well as cash and cash equivalents as of November 30, 2018, the tax year-end of our foreign
subsidiaries, partially offset by additional transition tax guidance issued by the United States Department of
Treasury , as well as the TCJ Act impact of both the conclusion of certain international tax audits and the
resolution with the IRS of all open matters related to the audits of taxable years 2012 and 2013, each
discussed below .
While our accounting for the recorded impact of the TCJ Act was deemed to be complete, additional
guidance issued by the IRS impacted, and may continue to impact, our recorded amounts after December 29,
2018. In 2019, we recogni zed a net tax benefit totaling $8 million  ($0.01 per share) related to the TCJ Act,
including the impact of additional guidance issued by the IRS in the first quarter of 2019 and adjustments
related to the filing of our 2018 U.S. federal tax return.  
As of December 28, 2019 , our mandatory transition tax liability was $3.3 billion , which must be paid through
2026 under the provisions of the TCJ Act. We reduced our liability through cash payments and application of
tax overpayments by $663 million  in 2019 and $150 million  in 2018. We currently expect to pay
approximately $0.1 billion  of this liability in 2020 .
The TCJ Act also created a requirement that certain income earned by foreign subsidiaries, known as global
intangible low-tax income (GIL TI), must be included in the gross income of their U.S. shareholder . The
FASB allows an accounting policy election of either recognizing deferred taxes for temporary differences
expected to reverse as GILTI in future years or recognizing such taxes as a current-period expense when
incurred. During the first quarter of 2018, we elected to treat the tax effect of GILTI as a current-period
expense when incurred.
Other T ax Matters
On May 19, 2019, a public referendum held in Switzerland passed the TRAF , effective  January 1, 2020. The
enactment of certain provisions of the TRAF in 2019 resulted in adjustments to our deferred taxes. During
2019 , we recor ded net tax expense of $24 milli on related to the impact of the TRAF . Enactment of the TRAF
provisions subseque nt to December 28, 2019 is expected to result in adjustments  to our consolidated financial
statements and related disclosures in future periods. The future impact of the TRAF cannot currently be
reasonably estimated ; we will continue to monitor and assess the impact the TRAF may have on our business
and financial results.
In 2018, we reorganized certain of our international operations, including the intercompany transfer of certain
intangible assets. As a result, we recognized other net tax benefits of $4.3 billion  ($3.05 per share ) in 2018.
The relate d deferred tax asset of $4.4 billion  is being amortized over a period of 15 years beginning in 2019.
Additionally , the reorganization generat ed significant net operating loss carryf orwards and related deferred
tax assets that are not expected to be realized, resulting in the recording of a full valuation allowance.
94
Table of Contents
Deferred tax liabilities and assets are comprised of the following:
 2019  2018
Deferred tax liabilities    
Debt guarantee of wholly-owned subsidiary $ 578  $ 578
Property , plant and equipment 1,583  1,303
Recapture of net operating losses 335  414
Right-of-use assets 345  —
Other 167  71
Gross deferred tax liabilities 3,008  2,366
Deferred tax assets    
Net carryforwards 4,168  4,353
Intangible assets other than nondeductible goodwill 793  985
Share-based compensation 94  106
Retiree medical benefits 154  167
Other employee-related benefits 350  303
Pension benefits 104  221
Deductible state tax and interest benefits 126  110
Lease liabilities 345  —
Other 741  739
Gross deferred tax assets 6,875  6,984
Valuation allowances (3,599 ) (3,753 )
Deferred tax assets, net 3,276  3,231
Net deferred tax assets $ (268) $ (865)
A summary of our valuation allowance activity is as follows:
 2019 2018  2017
Balance, beginning of year $ 3,753 $ 1,163  $ 1,110
Provision (124) 2,639  33
Other (deductions)/additions (30) (49) 20
Balance, end of year $ 3,599 $ 3,753  $ 1,163
Reserves
A number of years may elapse before a particular matter , for which we have established a reserve, is audited
and finally resolved. The number of years with open tax audits varies dependin g on the tax jurisdiction. Our
major taxing jurisdictions and the related open tax audits are as follows:
Jurisdiction  Years Open to AuditYears Currently
Under Audit
United States  2014-2018 2014-2016
Mexico  2017-2018 None
United Kingdom  2017-2018 2017
Canada (Domestic)  2015-2018 2015-2016
Canada (International)  2010-2018 2010-2016
Russia  2016-2018 None
In 2018, we recogni zed a non-cash tax benefit of $364 milli on ($0.26 per share)  resulting from the conclusion
of certain international tax audits. Additionally , in 2018, we recognized non-cash tax benefits of $353 milli on
($0.24 per share) as a result of our agreement with the IRS resolving all open matters related to the audits
95
Table of Contents
of taxable years 2012 and 2013, includin g the associated state impact. The conclusion of certain international
tax audits and the resolution with the IRS, collectively , resulted in non-cash tax benefits totaling $717 million
($0.50 per share) in 2018.
Our annual tax rate is based on our income, statutory tax rates and tax plannin g strategies and transactions,
including transfer pricing arrangements , available to us in the various jurisd ictions in which we operate.
Significant judgment is required in determining our annual tax rate and in evaluating our tax positions. We
establish reserves when, despite our belief that our tax return positions are fully supportable, we believe that
certain positions are subject to challenge  and that we likely will not succeed. We adjust these reserves, as well
as the related interest, in light of changing facts and circumstances, such as the progress of a tax audit, new
tax laws or tax authority settlements. Settlement of any particular issue would usually require the use of cash.
Favorable resolution would be recognized as a reduction to our annual tax rate in the year of resolution.
As of December 28, 2019 , the total gross amount of reserves for income taxes, reported in other liabilit ies,
was $1.4 billion. We accrue interest related to reserves for income taxes in our provision for income taxes and
any associated penalties are recorded in selling, general and administrative expenses. The gross amount of
interest accrued, reported in other liabilities, was $250 million  as of December 28, 2019 , of which $84
million  of tax expense was recognized in 2019 . The gross amount of interest accrued, reported in other
liabilities, was $179 million  as of December 29, 2018 , of which $64 million  of tax benefit was recognized in
2018 .
A reconciliation of unrecognized tax benefits is as follows:
 2019  2018
Balance, beginning of year $ 1,440  $ 2,212
Additions for tax positions related to the current year 179  142
Additions for tax positions from prior years 93  197
Reductions for tax positions from prior years (201) (822)
Settlement payments (74) (233)
Statutes of limitations expiration (47) (42)
Translation and other 5 (14)
Balance, end of year $ 1,395  $ 1,440
Carryforwards and Allowances
Operating loss carryforwards totaling $24.7 billion  at year-end 2019  are being carried forward in a number of
foreign and state jurisdictions where we are permitted to use tax operating losses from prior periods to reduce
future taxable income. These operating losses will expire as follows: $0.2 billion in 2020 , $20.3 billion
between 2021  and 2039 and $4.2 billion  may be carried forward indefinitely . We establish valuation
allowances for our deferred tax assets if, based on the available evidence, it is more likely than not that some
portion or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized.
Undistributed International Earnings
In 2018, we repatriated $20.4 billion  of cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments held in our foreign
subsidiaries without such funds being subject to further U.S. federal income tax liability , related to the TCJ
Act. As of December 28, 2019 , we had approximately $6 billion of undistributed international earnings.  We
intend to continue to reinvest $6 billion  of earnings outside the United States for the foreseeable future and
while future distribution of these earnings would not be subject to U.S. federal tax expense, no deferred tax
liabilities with respect to items such as certain foreign exchange gains or losses, foreign withholding taxes or
state taxes have been recognized. It is not practicable for us to determine the amount of unrecognized tax
expense on these reinvested international earnings.
96
Table of Contents
Note 6 — Shar e-Based Compensation
Our share-based compensation program  is designed to attract and retain employees while also aligning
employees’  interests with the interests of our shareholders. PepsiCo has granted  stock options, RSUs, PSUs,
PEPunits and long-t erm cash awards to employees under the shareholder -approved PepsiCo, Inc. Long-T erm
Incentive Plan (LTIP). Executives who are awarded long-term incentives based on their performance may
generally elect to receive their grant in the form of stock options or RSUs, or a combination thereof.
Executives who elect stock options receive four stock options for every one RSU that would have otherwise
been granted. Certain executive officers and other senior executives do not have a choice and are granted
66% PSUs and 34% long-term cash, each of which are subject to pre-established performance tar gets.
The Company may use authorized and unissued shares to meet share requirements resulting from the exercise
of stock options and the vesting of RSUs, PSUs and PEPunits.
As of December 28, 2019 , 59 million  shares were availab le for future share-b ased compensation grants under
the L TIP.
The following table summarizes our total share-based compensation expense and excess tax benefits
recognized:
 2019  2018 2017
Share-based compensation expense - equity awards $ 237  $ 256 $ 292
Share-based compensation expense - liability awards 8 20 13
Restructuring char ges (2) (6) (2)
Total (a) $ 243  $ 270 $ 303
Income tax benefits recognized in earnings related to share-based
compensation $ 39  $ 45 $ 89(b) 
Excess tax benefits related to share-based compensation $ 50  $ 48 $ 115
(a) Primarily recorded in selling, general and administrative expenses.
(b) Reflects tax rates ef fective for the 2017 tax year .
As of December 28, 2019 , there was $284 million  of total unrecognized compensation cost related to
nonvested share-based compensation grants. This unrecognized compensation cost is expected to be
recognized over a weighted-average period of two years .
Method of Accounting and Our Assumptions
The fair value of share-based award grants is amortized to expense over the vesting period, primarily three
years . Awards to employees eligible for retirement prior to the award becoming fully vested are amortized to
expense over the period through the date that the employee first becomes eligible to retire and is no longer
required to provide service to earn the award. In addition, we use historical data to estimate forfeiture rates
and record share-based compensation expense only for those awards that are expected to vest.
We do not backdate , reprice or grant share-based compensation awards retroa ctively . Repricing of awards
would require shareholder approval under the L TIP.
Stock Options
A stock option permits the holder to purchase shares of PepsiCo common stock at a specified price. We
account for our employee stock option s under the fair value method of accou nting using a Black-Scholes
valuation model to measure stock option  expense at the date of grant. All stock option grants have an exercise
price equal to the fair market value of our common stock on the date of grant and generally have a 10-year
term.
97
Table of Contents
Our weighted-average Black-Scholes fair value assumptions are as follows:
2019 2018 2017
Expected life 5 years 5 years 5 years
Risk-free interest rate 2.4% 2.6% 2.0%
Expected volatility 14% 12% 11%
Expected dividend yield 3.1% 2.7% 2.7%
The expected life is the period over which our employee groups are expected to hold their options. It is based
on our historical experience with similar grants. The risk-free interest rate is based on the expected U.S.
Treasury rate over the expected life. Volatility reflects movements in our stock price over the most recent
historical period equivalent to the expected life. Dividend yield is estimated over the expected life based on
our stated dividend policy and forecasts of net income, share repurchases and stock price.
A summary of our stock option activity for the year ended December 28, 2019  is as follows:
 Options(a) Weighted-
Average
Exer cise
Price  Weighted-
Average
Contractual
Life
Remaining
(years)Aggr egate
Intrinsic
Value(b)
Outstanding at December 29, 2018 15,589  $ 79.94   
Granted 1,286  $ 118.33   
Exercised (4,882 ) $ 67.34   
Forfeited/expired (368) $ 94.30   
Outstanding at December  28, 2019 11,625  $ 89.03  4.68 $563,942
Exer cisable at December  28, 2019 7,972  $ 78.27  3.13 $472,512
Expected to vest as of December  28, 2019 3,364  $ 112.25  8.04 $ 85,066
(a) Options are in thousands and include options previously granted under the PBG plan. No additional option s or shares were granted under the
PBG plan after 2009.
(b) In thousands.
Restricted Stock Units and Performance Stock Units
Each RSU represents our obligation to deliver to the holder one share of Peps iCo common stock when the
award vests at the end of the service period. PSUs are awards pursuant to which a number of shares are
delivered to the holder upon vesting at the end of the service period based on PepsiCo’ s performance against
specified financial and/or operational performance metrics. The number of shares may be increased to the
maximum or reduced to the minimum threshold based on the results of these performance metrics in
accordance with the terms established at the time of the award. During the vesting period, RSUs and PSUs
accrue dividend equivalents that pay out in cash (without interest) if and when the applicable RSU or PSU
vests and becomes payable.
The fair value of RSUs and PSUs are measured at the market price of the Company’ s stock on the date of
grant.
98
Table of Contents
A summary of our RSU and PSU activity for the year ended December 28, 2019  is as follows:
RSUs/PSUs(a)Weighted-
Average
Grant-Date
Fair ValueWeighted-
Average
Contractual
Life
Remaining
(years)Aggr egate
Intrinsic
Value(a)
Outstanding at December 29, 2018 7,175 $ 105.13   
Granted (b)2,754 $ 116.87   
Converted (2,642 )$ 99.35   
Forfeited (852)$ 111.11  
Actual performance change (c)(55)$ 108.32   
Outstanding at December  28, 2019 (d)6,380 $ 111.53 1.22 $877,487
Expected to vest as of December  28, 2019 5,876 $ 111.32 1.19 $808,220
(a) In thousands.
(b) Grant activity for all PSUs are disclosed at tar get.
(c) Reflects the net number of PSUs above and below tar get levels based on actual performance measured at the end of the performance period.
(d) The outstanding PSUs for which the performance period has not ended as of December 28, 2019 , at the threshold, target and maximum
award levels were zero, 0.7 million  and 1.3 million , respectively .
PEPunits
PEPunits provide an opportunity to earn shares of PepsiCo common stock with a value that adjusts based
upon changes in PepsiCo’ s absolute stock price as well as PepsiCo’ s Total Shareholder Return relative to the
S&P 500 over a three-year performance period.
The fair value of PEPunits is measured using the Monte-Carlo simulation mode l, which incorporates into the
fair-value determin ation the possibility that the market condition may not be satisfied, until actual
performance is determined.
PEPunits were last granted in 2015 and all 248,000  units outstanding at December 30, 2017 , with a weighted
average grant date fair value of $68.94 , were converted to 278,000  shares in 2018.
Long-T erm Cash
Certain executive officers and other senior executives were granted long-term  cash awards for which final
payout is based on PepsiCo’ s Total Shareholder Return relative to a specific set of peer companies and
achievement of a specified performance tar get over a three-year performance period.
Long-term cash awards that qualify as liability awards under share-based comp ensation guidance are valued
through the end of the performance period on a mark-to-market basis using the Monte Carlo simulation
model.
99
Table of Contents
A summary of our long-term cash activity for the year ended December 28, 2019  is as follows:
 Long-T erm
Cash
Award(a)Balance Sheet
Date Fair
Value(a)Contractual
Life
Remaining
(years)
Outstanding at December 29, 2018 $ 54,710   
Granted (b)16,112   
Vested (15,438 )  
Forfeited (9,465 )  
Actual performance change (c) (1,695 )  
Outstanding at December  28, 2019 (d) $ 44,224 $ 45,875 1.10
Expected to Vest at December  28, 2019 $ 42,998 $ 44,557 1.10
(a) In thousands.
(b) Grant activity for all long-term cash awards are disclosed at tar get.
(c) Reflects the net number of long-term cash awards above and below target levels based on actual performance measured at the end of the
performance period.
(d) The outstandi ng long-term cash awards for which the performance period has not ended as of December 28, 2019 , at the thresh old, target and
maximum award levels were zero, 28.5 million and 57.1 million, respectively .
Other Share-Based Compensation Data
The following is a summary of other share-based compensation data:
 2019  2018 2017
Stock Options    
Total number of options granted (a)1,286  1,429 1,481
Weighted-average grant-date fair value of options granted $ 10.89  $ 9.80 $ 8.25
Total intrinsic value of options exercised (a)$275,745  $224,663 $327,860
Total grant-date fair value of options vested (a)$ 9,838  $15,506 $23,122
RSUs/PSUs    
Total number of RSUs/PSUs granted (a)2,754  2,634 2,824
Weighted-average grant-date fair value of RSUs/PSUs granted $116.87  $108.75 $109.92
Total intrinsic value of RSUs/PSUs converted (a)$333,951  $260,287 $380,269
Total grant-date fair value of RSUs/PSUs vested (a)$275,234  $232,141 $264,923
PEPunits    
Total intrinsic value of PEPunits converted (a)$ — $30,147 $39,782
Total grant-date fair value of PEPunits vested (a)$ — $ 9,430 $18,833
(a) In thousands.
As of December 28, 2019  and December 29, 2018 , there were approximately 269,000  and 248,000
outstanding awards,  respectively , consisting primarily of phantom stock units that were granted under the
PepsiCo Director Deferral Program and will be settled in shares of PepsiCo common stock pursuant to the
LTIP at the end of the applicable deferral period, not included in the tables above.
Note 7 — Pension, Retir ee Medical and Savings Plans
In 2019, Plan A purchased a group annuity contract whereby a third-party insurance company assumed the
obligation to pay and administer future annuity payments for certain retirees. This transaction triggered a pre-
tax settlement char ge in 2019 of $220 million  ($170 million  after -tax or $0.12 per share).
100
Table of Contents
Also in 2019, certain former employees who had vested benefits in our U.S. defined benefit pension plans
were offered the option of receiving a one-time lump sum payment equal to the present value of the
participant’ s pension  benefit. This trans action triggered a pre-tax settlement charge in 2019 of $53 milli on
($41 million  after-tax or $0.03 per share). Collecti vely, the group annuity contract and one-time lump sum
payments to certain former employees who had vested benefits resulted in settlement charges in 2019 of $273
million  ($211 million  after -tax or $0.15 per share).
Effective January 1, 2017, the U.S. qualified defined benefit pension plans were reorganized into Plan A and
Plan I. Actuarial gains and losses associated with Plan A are amortized over the average remaining service
life of the active participants, while the actuarial gains and losses associated with Plan I are amortized over
the remain ing life expectancy of the inactive participants. As a result of this change, the pre-tax net periodic
benefit cost decreased by $42 million  ($27 million  after-tax, reflecting tax rates effective for the 2017 tax
year, or $ 0.02 per share) in 2017, primarily impacting corporate unallocated expenses.
Gains and losses resulting from actual experience differing from our assumpti ons, including the difference
between the actual return on plan assets and the expected return on plan assets, as well as changes in our
assumptions, are determined at each measurement date. These differences are recognized as a component of
net gain or loss in accumulated other comprehensive loss. If this net accumulated gain or loss exceeds 10% of
the greate r of the market-related value of plan assets or plan liabilities, a portion of the net gain or loss is
included in other pension and retiree medical benefits (expense)/income for the following year based upon
the average remaining service life for participants in Plan A (approximately 10 years) and retiree medica l
(approximately 8 years), or the remaining life expectancy for participants in Plan I (approximately 23 years ).
The cost or benefit of plan changes that increase or decrease benefits for prior employee service (prior service
cost/(credit)) is included in other pension and retiree medical benefits (expense)/income on a straight-line
basis over the average remaining servic e life for participants in Plan A or the remaining life expectancy for
participants in Plan I.
101
Table of Contents
Selected financial information for our pension and retiree medical plans is as follows:  
 Pension Retir ee Medical
 U.S. International   
 2019  2018 2019 2018 2019 2018
Change in projected benefit liability      
Liability at beginning of year $13,807  $14,777 $ 3,098 $ 3,490 $ 996 $ 1,187
Service cost 381  431 73 92 23 32
Interest cost 543  482 97 93 36 34
Plan amendments 15 83 1 2 — —
Participant contributions — — 2 2 — —
Experience loss/(gain) 2,091  (972) 515 (230) 36 (147)
Benefit payments (341) (956) (100) (114) (105) (108)
Settlement/curtailment (1,268 ) (74) (31) (35) — —
Special termination benefits 2 36 — 2 — 1
Other , including foreign currency adjustment — — 98 (204) 2 (3)
Liability at end of year $15,230  $13,807 $ 3,753 $ 3,098 $ 988 $ 996
      
Change in fair value of plan assets      
Fair value at beginning of year $12,258  $12,582 $ 3,090 $ 3,460 $ 285 $ 321
Actual return on plan assets 3,101  (789) 551 (136) 78 (21)
Employer contributions/funding 550  1,495 122 120 44 93
Participant contributions — — 2 2 — —
Benefit payments (341) (956) (100) (114) (105) (108)
Settlement (1,266 ) (74) (31) (32) — —
Other , including foreign currency adjustment — — 98 (210) — —
Fair value at end of year $14,302  $12,258 $ 3,732 $ 3,090 $ 302 $ 285
Funded status $ (928) $ (1,549 )$ (21)$ (8)$ (686)$ (711)
 
Amounts recognized      
Other assets $ 744  $ 185  $ 99 $ 81 $ — $ —
Other current liabilities (52) (107) (1) (1) (58) (41)
Other liabilities (1,620 ) (1,627 ) (119) (88) (628) (670)
Net amount recognized $ (928) $ (1,549 ) $ (21)$ (8)$ (686)$ (711)
      
Amounts included in accumulated other comprehensive loss (pre-tax)    
Net loss/(gain) $ 3,516  $ 4,093  $ 914 $ 780 $ (285)$ (287)
Prior service cost/(credit) 114 109  — (1) (32) (51)
Total $ 3,630  $ 4,202  $ 914 $ 779 $ (317)$ (338)
      
Changes recognized in net (gain)/loss included in other comprehensive loss  
Net (gain)/loss arising in current year $ (120) $ 760  $ 152 $ 103 $ (24)$ (107)
Amortization and settlement recognition (457) (187) (44) (56) 27 8
Foreign currency translation loss/(gain) — — 26 (49) (1) 1
Total $ (577) $ 573  $ 134 $ (2)$ 2$ (98)
      
Accumulated benefit obligation at end of year $14,255  $12,890  $ 3,441 $ 2,806   
The net (gain)/loss arising in the current year is attributed to the change in discount rate, primarily offset by
the actual asset returns dif ferent from expected returns.
The amount we report in operating profit as pension and retiree medical cost is service cost, which is the
102
Table of Contents
value of benefits earned by employees for working during the year .
The amounts we report below operating profit as pension and retiree medical cost consist of the following
components:
•Interest cost is the accrued interest on the projected benefit obligation due to the passage of time.
•Expected return on plan assets is the long-term return we expect to earn on plan investments for our
funded plans that will be used to settle future benefit obligations.
•Amortization of prior service cost/(cre dit) represents the recognition in the income statement of
benefit changes resulting from plan amendments.
•Amortization of net loss/(gain) represen ts the recognition in the income statement of changes in the
amount of plan asset s and the projected benefit obligation based on changes in assumptions and actual
experience.
•Settlement/curtailment loss/(gain) represents the result of actions that effectiv ely eliminate all or a
portion of related projected benefit obligations. Settlements are triggered when payouts to settle the
projected benefit obligation of a plan due to lump sums or other events exceed the annual service and
interest cost. Settlements are recognize d when actions are irrevocable and we are relieved of the
primary responsibility and risk for projected benefit obligations. Curtailments are due to events such
as plant closures or the sale of a business resulting in a reduction of future service or benefits.
Curtailment losses are recognized when  an event is probable and estimable, while curtailment gains
are recognized when an event has occur red (when the related employees terminate or an amendment
is adopted).
•Special termination benefits are the additional benefits offered to employees upon departure due to
actions such as restructuring.
The components of total pension and retiree medical benefit costs are as follows:
 Pension Retir ee Medical
 U.S.  International     
 2019 2018 2017  2019  2018 2017 2019  2018 2017
Service cost $381 $431 $401  $73 $92 $91 $23 $32 $28
Other pension and retiree medical benefits
expense/(income):         
Interest cost $543 $482 $468  $97 $93 $89 $36 $34 $36
Expected return on plan assets (892) (943) (849) (188) (197) (176) (18) (19) (22)
Amortization of prior service cost/(credits) 10 3 1 — — — (19) (20) (25)
Amortization of net losses/(gains) 161 179 123  32 45 53 (27) (8) (12)
Settlement/curtailment losses (a)296 8 8 12 6 11 — — —
Special termination benefits 1 36 60 — 2 — — 1 2
Total other pension and retiree medical benefits
expense/(income) $119 $(235)$(189) $(47) $(51)$(23)$(28) $(12)$(21)
Total $500 $196 $212  $26 $41 $68 $ (5) $20 $ 7
(a) In 2019, U.S. includes settlement charges related to the purchase of a group annuity contract of $220 million  and a pension lump sum
settlement char ge of $53 million .
103
Table of Contents
The following table provides the weighted-average assumptions used to determine projected benefit liability
and net periodic benefit cost for our pension and retiree medical plans:
 Pension  Retir ee Medical
 U.S. International      
 2019  2018 2017 2019  2018 2017  2019 2018  2017
Liability discount rate 3.3% 4.4% 3.7% 2.5% 3.4% 3.0% 3.1% 4.2% 3.5%
Service cost discount rate 4.4% 3.8% 4.5% 4.2% 3.5% 3.6% 4.3% 3.6% 4.0%
Interest cost discount rate 4.1% 3.4% 3.7% 3.2% 2.8% 2.8% 3.8% 3.0% 3.2%
Expected return on plan
assets 7.1% 7.2% 7.5% 5.8% 6.0% 6.0% 6.6% 6.5% 7.5%
Liability rate of salary
increases 3.1% 3.1% 3.1% 3.3% 3.7% 3.7%   
Expense rate of salary
increases 3.1% 3.1% 3.1% 3.7% 3.7% 3.6%   
The following table provides selected information about plans with accumulated benefit obligation and total
projected benefit liability in excess of plan assets:
 Pension Retir ee Medical
 U.S. International   
 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018
Selected information for plans with accumulated benefit obligation in excess of plan assets   
Liability for service to date $ (9,194 )$ (8,040 )$ (192)$ (155)  
Fair value of plan assets $ 8,497 $ 7,223 $ 151 $ 121   
Selected information for plans with projected benefit liability in excess of plan assets    
Benefit liability $ (10,169 )$ (8,957 )$ (632)$ (514)$ (988)$ (996)
Fair value of plan assets $ 8,497 $ 7,223 $ 512 $ 426 $ 302 $ 285
Of the total projecte d pension benefit liability as of December 28, 2019 , approximately $847 milli on relates
to plans that we do not fund because the funding of such plans does not receive favorable tax treatment.
Future Benefit Payments
Our estimated future benefit payments are as follows:
 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 - 2029
Pension $ 945$ 915 $ 900 $ 930 $ 970 $ 5,275
Retiree medical (a)$ 100$ 95 $ 95 $ 90 $ 85 $ 355
(a) Expected future benefit payments for our retiree medical plans do not reflect any estimated subsidies expected to be received under the 2003
Medicare Act. Subsidies are expected to be approximately $2 millio n for each of the years from 2020  throug h 2024  and approxim ately $4
million  in total for 2025 through 2029.
These future benefit payments to beneficiaries include payments from both funded and unfunded plans.
Funding
Contributions to our pension and retiree medical plans were as follows:
 Pension Retiree Medical
 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
Discretionary (a)$ 417$ 1,417$ 6$ — $ 37 $ —
Non-discretionary 255 198 158 44 56 56
Total $ 672$ 1,615$ 164$ 44 $ 93 $ 56
(a) Includes $400 million  contribution in 2019 and $1.4 billion  contribution in 2018 to fund Plan A in the United States.
104
Table of Contents
In January  2020 , we made discretio nary contributions of $150 million  to Plan A in the United States. In
addition, in 2020 , we expect to make non-discretionary contributions of approximately $150 million  to our
U.S. and international pension benefit plans and approximately $60 million  for retiree medical benefits.
We regularly evaluate opportunities to reduce risk and volatility associated with our pension and retiree
medical plans.
Plan Assets
Our pension plan investment strategy  includes the use of actively managed accounts and is reviewed
periodically in conjunction with plan liabilities, an evaluation of market cond itions, tolerance for risk and
cash requirements for benefit payments. This strategy is also applicable to funds held for the retiree medical
plans. Our investment objective includes ensuring that funds are available  to meet the plans’  benefit
obligations when they become due. Assets contributed to our pension plans are no longer controlled by us,
but become the property of our individual pension plans. However , we are indirectly impacted by changes in
these plan assets as compared to changes in our projected liabilities. Our overall investment policy is to
prudently invest plan assets in a well-diversified portfolio of equity and high-quality debt securities and real
estate to achieve our long-term return expectations. Our investment policy also permits the use of derivative
instruments, such as futures and forward contracts, to reduce interest rate and foreign currency risks. Futures
contracts represent commitments to purchase or sell securities at a future date and at a specified price.
Forward contracts consist of currency forwards.
For 2020  and 2019 , our expected long- term rate of return on U.S. plan assets is 6.8% and 7.1%, respectiv ely.
Our tar get investment allocations for U.S. plan assets are as follows:
 2020 2019
Fixed income 50% 47%
U.S. equity 25% 29%
International equity 21% 20%
Real estate 4% 4%
Actual investment allocations may vary from our target investment allocations due to prevailing market
conditions. We regularly review our actual investment allocations and periodically rebalance our investments.
The expected return on plan assets is based on our investment strategy and our expectations for long-term
rates of return by asset class, taking into account volatility and correlation among asset classes and our
historical experience . We also review current levels of interest rates and inflation  to assess the reasonableness
of the long-term rates. We evaluate our expected return assumptions annually to ensure that they are
reasonable. To calculate the expected return on plan assets, our market-related value of assets for fixed
income is the actual  fair value. For all other asset categories, such as equity securities, we use a method that
recognizes investme nt gains or losses (the difference between the expected and actual return based on the
market-related value of assets) over a five-year period. This has the ef fect of reducing year -to-year volatility .
105
Table of Contents
Plan assets  measured at fair value as of year-end 2019  and 2018  are categorized consistently by level, and are
as follows:
 2019 2018
 Total  Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical Assets
(Level 1)  Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs (Level 2)  Significant
Unobservable
Inputs (Level 3) Total
U.S. plan assets (a)      
Equity securities, including preferred stock (b)$ 6,605  $ 6,605  $ — $ — $ 5,605
Government securities (c)2,154  — 2,154  — 1,674
Corporate bonds (c)4,737  — 4,737  — 4,145
Mortgage-backed securities (c)159  — 159  — 212
Contracts with insurance companies (d)9 — — 9 9
Cash and cash equivalents 275  275  — — 215
Sub-total U.S. plan assets 13,939  $ 6,880  $ 7,050  $ 9 11,860
Real estate commingled funds measured at net
asset value (e)605     618
Dividends and interest receivable, net of
payables 60    65
Total U.S. plan assets $ 14,604     $ 12,543
International plan assets       
Equity securities (b)$ 1,973  $ 1,941  $ 32 $ — $ 1,651
Government securities (c)524  — 524  — 433
Corporate bonds (c)585  — 585  — 478
Fixed income commingled funds (f)384  384  — — 356
Contracts with insurance companies (d)42 — — 42 36
Cash and cash equivalents 24 24 — — 27
Sub-total international plan assets 3,532  $ 2,349  $ 1,141  $ 42 2,981
Real estate commingled funds measured at net
asset value (e)193     102
Dividends and interest receivable 7    7
Total international plan assets $ 3,732     $ 3,090
(a)2019 and 2018 amounts include $302 million and $285 million, respectively, of retiree medical plan assets that are restricted for purposes of
providing health benefits for U.S. retirees and their beneficiaries.
(b)The equity securities portfolio was invested in U.S. and international common stock and commingled funds, and the preferred stock portfolio in the
U.S. was invested in domestic and international corporate preferred stock investments. The common stock is based on quoted prices in active
markets. The commingled funds are based on the published price of the fund and the U.S. commingled funds include one large-cap fund that
represents 16% and 15% of total U.S. plan assets for 2019 and 2018, respectively. The preferred stock investments are based on quoted bid prices for
comparable securities in the marketplace and broker/dealer quotes in active markets.
(c)These investments are based on quoted bid prices for comparable securities in the marketplace and broker/dealer quotes in active markets. Corporate
bonds of U.S.-based companies represent 28% of total U.S. plan assets for both 2019 and 2018.
(d)Based on the fair value of the contracts as determined by the insurance companies using inputs that are not observable. The changes in Level 3
amounts were not significant in the years ended December 28, 2019 and December 29, 2018.
(e)The real estate commingled funds include investments in limited partnerships. These funds are based on the net asset value of the appraised value of
investments owned by these funds as determined by independent third parties using inputs that are not observable. The majority of the funds are
redeemable quarterly subject to availability of cash and have notice periods ranging from 45 to 90 days.
(f)Based on the published price of the fund.
Retiree Medical Cost T rend Rates
 2020  2019
Average increase assumed 6% 6%
Ultimate projected increase 5% 5%
Year of ultimate projected increase 2039 2039
106
Table of Contents
These assumed health care cost trend rates have an impact on the retiree medic al plan expense and liability ,
however the cap on our share of retiree medical costs limits the impact.
Savings Plan
Certain U.S. employees are eligible to participate in a 401(k) savings plan, which is a voluntary defined
contribution plan. The plan is designed to help employees accumulate savings for retirement, and we make
Company matching contributions for certain employees on a portion of eligible pay based on years of service.
Certain U.S. salaried employees, who are not eligible to participate in a defined benefit pension plan, are also
eligible to receive an employer contribution to the 401(k) savings plan based on age and years of service
regardless of employee contribution.
In 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , our total Company contributions were $197 million , $180 million  and $176 million ,
respectively .
Note 8 — Debt Obligations
The following table summarizes our debt obligations:
 2019(a) 2018(a)
Short-term debt obligations (b) 
Current maturities of long-term debt $ 2,848  $ 3,953
Other borrowings (6.4% and 6.0%) 72  73
 $ 2,920  $ 4,026
Long-term debt obligations (b) 
Notes due 2019 (3.1%) —  3,948
Notes due 2020 (2.7% and 3.9%) 2,840  3,784
Notes due 2021 (2.4% and 3.1%) 3,276  3,257
Notes due 2022 (2.7% and 2.8%) 3,831  3,802
Notes due 2023 (2.8% and 2.9%) 1,272  1,270
Notes due 2024 (3.4% and 3.2%) 1,839  1,816
Notes due 2025-2049 (3.4% and 3.7%) 18,910  14,345
Other , due 2019-2026 (1.3% and 1.3%) 28  26
 31,996  32,248
Less: current maturities of long-term debt obligations (2,848 ) (3,953 )
Total $29,148  $28,295
(a) Amounts are shown net of unamortized net discounts of $163 million  and $119 million  for 2019  and 2018 , respectively .
(b) The interest rates presente d reflect weighted-average effective interest rates at year-end. Certain of our fixed rate indebtedness have been
swapped to floating rates through the use of interest rate derivative instruments. See Note 9 for further information regarding our interest rate
derivative instruments.
As of December 28, 2019 , our international debt of $69 million  was related to borrowings from external
parties including various lines of credit. These lines of credit are subject to normal banking terms and
conditions and are fully committed at least to the extent of our borrowings.
107
Table of Contents
In 2019 , we issued the following senior notes:
Inter est Rate Maturity Date  Amount(a) 
0.750 % March 2027  € 500(b) 
1.125 % March 2031  € 500(b) 
2.625 % July 2029  $ 1,000  
3.375 % July 2049  $ 1,000  
0.875 % October 2039  € 500(b) 
2.875 % October 2049  $ 1,000  
(a) Represents gross proceeds from issuances of long-term debt excluding debt issuance costs, discounts and premiums.
(b) These notes, issued in euros, were designated as net investment hedges to partially offset the effects of foreign currency on our investments
in certain of our foreign subsidiaries.
The net proceeds from the issuances of the above notes were used for general corporate purposes, including
the repayment of commercial paper , except for an amount equivalent to the net proceeds from our 2.875 %
senior notes due 2049 that will be used to fund, in whole or in part, eligible green projects in the categories of
investments in sustainable plastics and packaging, decarbonizing our operations and supply chain and water
sustainability , which promote our selected Sustainable Development Goals, as defined by the United Nations.
In 2019, we entered into a new five-year  unsecured revolving credit agreement (Five-Y ear Credit Agreement)
which expires on June 3, 2024. The Five-Y ear Credit Agreement enables us and our borrowing subsidiaries to
borrow up to $3.75 billion in U.S. dollars and/or euros, including  a $0.75 billion swing line subfacil ity for
euro-denominated borrowings permitted  to be borrowed on a same-day basis, subject to customary terms and
conditions. We may request that commitments under this agreement be increased up to $4.5 billion  (or the
equivalent amount in euros). Additionally , we may, once a year, request renewal of the agreement for an
additional one-year period.
In 2019, we entered  into a new 364-day unsecured revolving credit agreement (364-Day Credit Agreement)
which expires on June 1, 2020. The 364-Day Credit Agreement enables us and our borrowing subsidiaries to
borrow up to $3.75 billion  in U.S. dollars and/or euros, subject to customary terms and conditions. We may
request that commitments under this agreement be increased up to $4.5 billion  (or the equivalent amount in
euros). We may request renewal of this facility for an additional 364-day period or convert any amounts
outstanding into a term loan for a period of up to one year, which would mature no later than the anniversary
of the then effective termination date. The Five-Y ear Credit Agreement and the 364-Day Credit Agreement
together replaced our $3.75 billion five-year credit agreement and our $3.75 billion 364-day credit
agreement, both dated as of June 4, 2018. Funds borrowed under the Five-Y ear Credit Agreement and the
364-Day Credit Agreement may be used for general corporate purposes. Subject to certain conditions, we
may borrow , prepay and reborrow amounts under these agreements. As of December 28, 2019 , there were no
outstanding borrowings under the Five-Y ear Credit Agreement or the 364-Day Credit Agreement.
In 2019, we entered into two unsecured  bridge loan facilities (Bridge Loan Facilities) which together enable
one of our consolidated subsidiaries to borrow up to 25.0 billion  South African rand, or approximately $1.8
billion , to provide potential funding for our acquisition of Pioneer Foods. Each facility is available from the
date the conditions precedent are met for the acquisition up through July 30, 2020 in the case of one facility
and July 31, 2020 in the case of the other facility . Borrowings under the facilities are for up to one year once
drawn and can be prepaid at any time. Interest rates are reset either every one month or three months. As of
December 28, 2019, there were no outstanding borrowings under the Bridge Loan Facilities.
In 2019, we paid $1.0 billion to redeem all $1.0 billion outstandi ng princip al amount of our 4.50% senior
notes due 2020.
108
Table of Contents
In 2018, we completed a cash tender offer for certain notes issued by PepsiCo and predecessors to a PepsiCo
subsidiary for $1.6 billion  in cash to redeem the following amounts:
Inter est
Rate Maturity Date  Amount
Tender ed
7.290 %September
2026  $ 11
7.440 %September
2026  $ 4
7.000 % March 2029  $ 357
5.500 % May 2035  $ 138
4.875 %November 2040  $ 410
5.500 % January 2040  $ 408
Also in 2018, we completed an exchange offer for certain notes issued by predecessors to a PepsiCo
subsidiary for the following newly issued PepsiCo notes. These notes were issued in an aggregate principal
amount equal to the exchanged notes:
Inter est
Rate  Maturity Date  Amount
Exchanged
7.290 % September
2026  $ 88
7.440 % September
2026  $ 21
7.000 % March 2029  $ 516
5.500 % May 2035  $ 107
As a resul t of the above transactions, we recorded a pre-tax charge of $253 milli on ($191 milli on after-tax or
$0.13 per share) to interest expense in 2018, primarily representing the tender price paid over the carrying
value of the tendered notes.
Note 9 — Financial Instruments
Derivatives and Hedging
We are exposed to market risks arising from adverse changes in:
•commodity prices, af fecting the cost of our raw materials and ener gy;
•foreign exchange rates and currency restrictions; and
•interest rates.
In the normal course of business, we manage commodity price, foreign exchange and interest rate risks
through a variety of strategies, including productivity initiatives, global purch asing programs and hedging.
Ongoing productivity initiatives involve  the identification and effective implementation of meaningful cost-
saving opportunities or efficiencies, including the use of derivatives. Our global purchasing programs include
fixed-price contracts and purchase orders and pricing agreements.
Our hedging strategies include the use of derivatives and, in the case of our net investment hedges, debt
instruments. Certain derivatives are designated as either cash flow or fair value hedges and qualify for hedge
accounting treatmen t, while others do not qualify and are marked to market through earnings. The accounting
for qualifying hedges allows changes in a hedging instrument’ s fair value to offset corresponding changes in
the hedged item in the same reporting period that the hedged item impacts earnings. Gains or losses on
derivatives designat ed as cash flow hedges are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive loss and
reclassified to our income statement when the hedged transaction affects earning s. If it becomes probable that
the hedged transaction will not occur , we immediately recognize the related hedging gains or losses in
earnings; such gains or losses reclassified during the year ended December 28, 2019 were not material.
109
Table of Contents
Cash flows from derivatives used to manage commodity price, foreign exchange or interest rate risks are
classified as operating activities in the cash flow statement. We classify both the earnings and cash flow
impact from these derivatives consistent with the underlying hedged item.
We do not use derivative instruments for trading or speculative purposes. We perform assessments of our
counterparty credit risk regularly , inclu ding reviewing netting agreements, if any, and a review of credit
ratings, credit default swap rates and potential nonperformance of the counterparty . Based on our most recent
assessment of our counterparty credit risk, we consider this risk to be low. In addition, we enter into
derivative contracts with a variety of financial institutions that we believe are creditworthy in order to reduce
our concentration of credit risk.
Certain of our agreements with our counterparties require us to post full collateral on derivative instruments
in a net liability position if our credit rating is at A2 (Moody’ s Investors Service, Inc.) or A (S&P  Global
Ratings) and we have been placed on credit watch for possible downgrade or if our credit rating falls below
these levels. The fair value of all deriva tive instruments with credit-risk-related  contingent features that were
in a net liability position on December 28, 2019 was $415 million . We have posted no collateral under these
contracts and no credit-risk-related contingent features were triggered as of December 28, 2019.
Commodity Prices
We are subject to commodity price risk because our ability to recover increased costs through higher pricing
may be limited in the competitive environment in which we operate. This risk is managed through the use of
fixed-price contracts and purchase orders, pricing agreements and derivative instruments, which primarily
include swaps and futures. In addition, risk to our supply of certain raw materials is mitigated through
purchases from multiple geographies and suppliers. We use derivatives, with terms of no more than three
years , to hedge price fluctuations related to a portion of our anticipated commodity purchases, primarily for
energy, agricultural products and metals . Derivativ es used to hedge commodity price risk that do not qualify
for hedge accounting treatment are marked to market each period with the resulting gains and losses recorded
in corporate unallocated expenses as either cost of sales or selling, general and administrative expenses,
depending on the underlying commodity . These gains and losses are subsequent ly reflected in division results
when the divisions recognize the cost of the underlying commodity in operating profit.
Our commodity derivatives had a total notional value of $1.1 billion  as of December 28, 2019  and
December 29, 2018 .
Foreign Exchange
We are exposed to foreign exchange risks in the international markets in which our products are made,
manufactured, distributed or sold. Additionally , we are exposed to foreign exchange risk from net
investments in foreign subsidiaries, foreign currency purchases and foreign currency assets and liabilities
created in the normal course of business. We manage this risk through sourcing purchases from local
suppliers, negotiatin g contracts in local currencies with foreign suppliers and through the use of derivatives,
primarily forward contracts with terms of no more than two years . Exchange rate gains or losses related to
foreign currency transactions are recognized as transaction gains or losses on our income statement as
incurred. We also use net investment hedges to partially offset the effects of foreign currency on our
investments in certain of our foreign subsidiaries.
Our foreign currency derivatives had a total notional value of $1.9 billion  as of December 28, 2019  and $2.0
billion  as of December 29, 2018 . The total notional amount of our debt instruments designated as net
investment hedges was $2.5 billion  as of December 28, 2019  and $0.9 billion  as of December 29, 2018 . For
foreign currency derivatives that do not qualify for hedge accounting treatment, gains and losses were offset
by changes in the underlying hedged items, resulting in no material net impact on earnings.
110
Table of Contents
Inter est Rates
We centra lly manag e our debt and investment portfolios considering investment opportunities and risks, tax
consequences and overall financing strategies. We use various interest rate derivative instruments including,
but not limited to, interest rate swaps, cross-currency interest rate swaps, Treasury locks and swap locks to
manage our overall interest expense and foreign exchange risk. These instruments effectively change the
interest rate and currency of specific debt issuances. Certain of our fixed rate indebtedness have been
swapped to floating rates. The notional amount, interest payment and maturity date of the interest rate and
cross-currency interest rate swaps match the principal, interest payment and maturity date of the related debt.
Our cross-currency interest rate swaps have terms of no more than twelve years . Our Treasury locks and swap
locks are entered into to protect against unfavorable interest rate changes relating to forecasted debt
transactions.
Our interest rate derivatives had a total notional value of $5.0 billion as of December 28, 2019  and $10.5
billion  as of December 29, 2018 .
As of December 28, 2019 , approxim ately 9% of total debt, after the impact of the related interest rate
derivative instruments, was subject to variable rates, compared to approximately 29% as of December 29,
2018 .
Available-for-Sale Securities
Investments in debt securities are classi fied as available-for -sale. All highly liquid investments with original
maturities of three months or less are classified as cash equivalents. Our investments in available-for -sale
debt securities are reported at fair value. Unrealized gains and losses related to changes in the fair value of
available-for -sale debt securities are recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss within common
shareholders’  equity . Unrealized gains and losses on our investments in debt securities as of December 28,
2019  and December 29, 2018  were not material. Changes in the fair value of available-for -sale debt securities
impact net income only when such securities are sold or an other -than-temporary impairment is recognized.
We recorded no other -than-temporary impairment charges on our available-for -sale debt securities for the
years ended December 28, 2019 , December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017 .
In 2017, we recorded a pre-tax gain of $95 million  ($85 million  after-tax or $0.06 per share), net of discount
and fees, associated with the sale of our minority stake in Britvic. The gain on the sale of this equity
investment was recorded in our Europe segment in selling, general and administrative expenses.
111
Table of Contents
Fair V alue Measurements
The fair values of our financial assets and liabilities as of December 28, 2019  and December 29, 2018  are
categorized as follows:
  2019  2018
 Fair Value
Hierar chy
Levels(a) Assets(a)Liabilities(a) Assets(a) Liabilities(a)
Available-for -sale debt securities
(b)2 $ — $ — $ 3,658  $ —
Short-term investments (c)1  $ 229 $ — $ 196  $ —
Prepaid forward contracts (d)2  $ 17 $ — $ 22 $ —
Deferred compensation (e)2  $ — $ 468  $ — $ 450
Derivatives designated as fair
value hedging instruments:       
Interest rate (f)2  $ — $ 5 $ 1 $ 108
Derivatives designated as cash
flow hedging instruments:       
Foreign exchange (g)2  $ 5$ 32 $ 44 $ 14
Interest rate (g)2  — 390  — 323
Commodity (h)1  2 5 — 1
Commodity (i)2  2 5 — 3
  $ 9$ 432  $ 44 $ 341
Derivatives not designated as
hedging instruments:       
Foreign exchange (g)2  $ 3$ 2 $ 3 $ 10
Commodity (h)1  23 7 2 17
Commodity (i)2  6 24 5 92
  $ 32 $ 33 $ 10 $ 119
Total derivatives at fair value (j) $ 41 $ 470  $ 55 $ 568
Total  $ 287 $ 938  $ 3,931  $ 1,018
(a) Fair value hierarchy levels  are defined in Note 7. Unless otherwise noted, financial assets are classified on our balance sheet within prepaid
expenses and other current assets and other assets. Financial liabilities are classified on our balance sheet within accounts payable and other
current liabilities and other liabilities.
(b) Based on quoted broker prices or other significant inputs derived from or corroborated by observable mark et data. As of December 29, 2018 ,
these debt securities were primarily classified as cash equivalents. The decrease in available-for -sale debt securities was due to maturities and
sales during the current year .
(c) Based on the price of index funds. These investments are classified as short-term investments and are used to manage a portion of market
risk arising from our deferred compensation liability .
(d) Based primarily on the price of our common stock.
(e) Based on the fair value of investments corresponding to employees’  investment elections.
(f) Based on LIBOR forward rates. As of December 28, 2019  and December 29, 2018 , the carrying amount of hedged fixed-rate debt was $2.2
billion  and $7.7 billion , respec tively , and classified on our balance sheet within short-term and long-term debt obligations. As of December
28, 2019, the cumulative amount of fair value hedging adjustments to hedged fixed-rate debt was $5 millio n. As of December 28, 2019 , the
cumulative amount of fair value hedging adjustments on discontinued hedges was a $49 million loss, which is being amortized over the
remaining life of the related debt obligations.
(g) Based on recently reported market transactions of spot and forward rates.
(h) Based on quoted contract prices on futures exchange markets.
(i) Based on recently reported market transactions of swap arrangements.
(j) Derivative assets and liabilities are presented on a gross basis on our balance sheet. Amounts subject to enforceable master netting
arrangements or similar agreements which are not offset on the balance sheet as of December 28, 2019  and December 29, 2018  were not
material. Collateral received or posted against our asset or liability positions is classified as restricte d cash. See Note 15 for further
information.
The carrying amounts of our cash and cash equivalents and short-term investments approximate fair value
due to their short-term maturity . The fair value of our debt obligations as of December 28, 2019  and
112
Table of Contents
December 29, 2018  was $34 billion  and $32 billion , respectively , based upon prices of similar instruments in
the marketplace, which are considered Level 2 inputs.
Losses/(gains) on our hedging instruments are categorized as follows:
 Fair Value/Non-
designated Hedges  Cash Flow and Net Investment Hedges
 Losses/(Gains)
Recognized in
Income Statement(a) Losses/(Gains)
Recognized in
Accumulated Other
Comprehensive Loss  Losses/(Gains)
Reclassified from
Accumulated Other
Comprehensive Loss
into Income
Statement(b)
2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018
Foreign exchange $ (1) $ 9 $ 57 $ (52) $ 3 $ (8)
Interest rate (64) 53 67 110 7 119
Commodity (17) 117 7 3 4 —
Net investment —  — (30) (77) — —
Total $ (82) $ 179 $ 101 $ (16) $ 14 $ 111
 
(a) Foreign exchange derivative losses/gains are primarily included in selling, general and administrative expenses. Interest rate derivative
losses/gains are primarily from fair value hedges and are included in interest expense. These losses /gains are substantially offset by
decreases/increases in the value of the underlying debt, which are also included in interest expense. Commodity derivative losses/gains are
included in either cost of sales or selling, general and administrative expenses, depending on the underlying commodity .
(b) Foreign excha nge derivative losses/gains are primarily included in cost of sales. Interest rate derivative losses/gains are included in interest
expense. Commodity derivative losses/gains are inclu ded in either cost of sales or selling, general and administrative expenses, depending on
the underlying commodity .
Based on current market conditions, we expect to reclassify net losses of $47 milli on related to our cash flow
hedges from accumulated other comprehensive loss into net income during the next 12 months.
113
Table of Contents
Note 10 — Net Income Attributable to PepsiCo per  Common Shar e
The computations of basic and diluted net income attributable to PepsiCo per common share are as follows:
 2019  2018  2017
 Income  Shar es(a) Income Shares(a) Income Shares(a)
Net income attributable to PepsiCo $7,314    $12,515   $4,857
Preferred stock:      
Redemption premium (b)—   (2)  (4)
Net income available for PepsiCo
common shareholders $7,314  1,399  $12,513 1,415  $4,853 1,425
Basic net income attributable to PepsiCo
per common share $5.23    $8.84   $3.40
Net income available for PepsiCo
common shareholders $7,314  1,399  $12,513 1,415  $4,853 1,425
Dilutive securities:      
Stock options, RSUs, PSUs,
PEPunits and Other (c)— 8 — 10 — 12
Employee stock ownership plan
(ESOP) convertible preferred stock — — 2 — 4 1
Diluted $7,314  1,407  $12,515 1,425  $4,857 1,438
Diluted net income attributable to
PepsiCo per common share $5.20    $8.78   $3.38
(a) Weighted-average common shares outstanding (in millions).
(b) See Note 1 1 for further information.
(c) The dilutive ef fect of these securities is calculated using the treasury stock method.
Out-of-the-money options excluded from the calculation of diluted earnings per common share are as
follows: 
 2019 2018 2017
Out-of-the-money options (a)0.3 0.7 0.4
Average exercise price per option $ 117.55 $ 109.83 $ 110.12
(a) In millions.
Note 1 1 — Preferr ed Stock
In connection with our merger with The Quaker Oats Company (Quaker) in 2001, shares of our convertible
preferred stock were authorized and issued to an ESOP  fund established by Quaker . Quaker made the final
award to its ESOP  in June 2001.
In 2018, all of the outstanding shares of our convertible preferred stock were converted into an aggregate of
550,102  shares of our common stock. As a result, there are no shares of our convertible preferred stock
outstanding as of December 29, 2018 and our convertible preferred stock is retired for accounting purposes.
As of December 30, 2017, there were 3 million  shares of convertible preferred stock authorized, 803,953
preferred shares issued and 114,753  shares outstanding. The outstanding preferred shares had a fair value of
$68 million  as of December 30, 2017.
Activities of our preferred stock are included in the equity statement.
114
Table of Contents
Note 12 — Accumulated Other  Compr ehensive Loss Attributable to PepsiCo
The changes in the balances of each component of accumulated other comp rehensive loss attributable to
PepsiCo are as follows:
 Curr ency
Translation
Adjustment  Cash Flow
Hedges  Pension and
Retir ee
MedicalAvailable-
For-Sale
Securities OtherAccumulated Other
Compr ehensive Loss
Attributable to
PepsiCo
Balance as of December 31, 2016 (a)$ (11,386 ) $ 83 $ (2,645 )$ 64 $ (35)$ (13,919 )
Other comprehensive (loss)/income
before reclassifications (b)1,049  130  (375) 25 — 829
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated other comprehensive
loss — (171) 158 (99) — (112)
Net other comprehensive (loss)/income 1,049  (41) (217) (74) — 717
Tax amounts 60 5 58 6 16 145
Balance as of December 30, 2017 (a)(10,277 ) 47 (2,804 ) (4) (19) (13,057 )
Other comprehensive (loss)/income
before reclassifications (c)(1,664 ) (61) (813) 6 — (2,532 )
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated other comprehensive
loss 44 111 218 — — 373
Net other comprehensive (loss)/income (1,620 ) 50 (595) 6 — (2,159 )
Tax amounts (21) (10) 128 — — 97
Balance as of December 29, 2018 (a)(11,918 ) 87 (3,271 ) 2 (19) (15,119)
Other comprehensive (loss)/income
before reclassifications (d)636  (131) (89) (2) — 414
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated other comprehensive
loss — 14 468 — — 482
Net other comprehensive (loss)/income 636  (117) 379 (2) — 896
Tax amounts (8) 27 (96) — — (77)
Balance as of December 28, 2019 (a) $ (11,290 ) $ (3) $ (2,988 )$ — $ (19)$ (14,300 )
(a) Pension and retiree medica l amounts are net of taxes  of $1,280  millio n as of December 31, 2016 , $1,338  millio n as of December 30, 2017 ,
$1,466  million  as of December 29, 2018  and $1,370  million  as of December 28, 2019 .
(b) Currency translation adjustment primarily reflects the appreciation of the euro, Russian ruble, Pound sterling and Canadian dollar .
(c) Currency translation adjustment primarily reflects the depreciation of the Russian ruble, Canadian dollar , Pound sterling and Brazilian real.
(d) Currency translation adjustment primarily reflects the appreciation of the Russian ruble, Canadian dollar , Mexican peso and Pound sterling.
115
Table of Contents
The follow ing table  summarizes the reclassifications from accumulated other comprehensive loss to the
income statement:
 Amount Reclassified from
Accumulated Other Comprehensive
LossAffected Line Item in the Income
Statement
 2019 2018 2017 
Currency translation:    
Divestitures $ — $ 44 $ —Selling, general and administrative
expenses
    
Cash flow hedges:    
Foreign exchange contracts $ 1$ (1) $ — Net revenue
Foreign exchange contracts 2 (7) 10Cost of sales
Interest rate derivatives 7 119 (184)Interest expense
Commodity contracts 3 3 4Cost of sales
Commodity contracts 1 (3) (1)Selling, general and administrative
expenses
Net losses/(gains) before tax 14 111 (171) 
Tax amounts (2) (27) 64 
Net losses/(gains) after tax $ 12$ 84 $ (107) 
    
Pension and retiree medical items:    
Amortization of net prior service credit $ (9)$ (17) $ (24)Other pension and retiree medical
benefits (expense)/income
Amortization of net losses 169 216 167Other pension and retiree medical
benefits (expense)/income
Settlement/curtailment losses 308 19 15Other pension and retiree medical
benefits (expense)/income
Net losses before tax 468 218 158 
Tax amounts (102) (45) (44) 
Net losses after tax $ 366$ 173 $ 114 
    
Available-for-sale securities:    
Sale of Britvic securities $ — $ — $ (99)Selling, general and administrative
expenses
Tax amount — — 10 
Net gain after tax $ — $ — $ (89) 
    
Total net losses/(gains) reclassified for the
year, net of tax $ 378$ 301 $ (82) 
Note 13 — L eases
Lessee
We determine whether an arrangement is a lease at inception. We have operating leases for plants,
warehouses, distribution centers, storage facilities, offices and other facilities, as well as machinery and
equipment, including fleet. Our leases generally have remaining lease terms of up to 20 years , some of which
include options to extend the lease term for up to five years , and some of which include options to terminate
the lease within one year. We consi der these options in determining the lease term used to establish our right-
of-use
116
Table of Contents
assets and lease liabilities. Our lease agreements do not contain any material residual value guarantees or
material restrictive covenants.
As most of our leases do not provide an implicit rate, we use our incremental borrowing rate based on the
information available at commencement date in determining the present value of lease payments.
We have lease agreements that contain  both lease and non-lease components. For real estate leases, we
account for lease components together with non-lease components (e.g., common-area maintenance).
Components of lease cost are as follows:
 2019
Operating lease cost (a)$ 474
Variable lease cost (b)$ 101
Short-term lease cost (c)$ 379
(a) Includes right-of-use asset amortization of $412 million .
(b) Primarily related to adjustments for inflation, common-area maintenance and property tax.
(c) Not recorded on our balance sheet.
In 2019, we recognized gains of $77 million  on sale-leaseback transactions with terms under four years.
Supplemental cash flow information and non-cash activity related to our operating leases are as follows:
 2019
Operating cash flow information:
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities $ 478
Non-cash activity:
Right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for lease obligations $ 479
Supplemental balance sheet information related to our operating leases is as follows:
 Balance Sheet Classification 2019
Right-of-use assets Other assets $ 1,548
Current lease liabilities Accounts payable and other current liabilities $ 442
Non-current lease liabilities Other liabilities $ 1,118
Weighted-average remaining lease term and discount rate for our operating leases are as follows:
 2019
Weighted-average remaining lease term 6 years
Weighted-average discount rate 4%
Maturities of lease liabilities by year for our operating leases are as follows:
2020 $ 501
2021 374
2022 280
2023 183
2024 117
2025 and beyond 308
Total lease payments 1,763
Less: Imputed interest (203)
Present value of lease liabilities $ 1,560
117
Table of Contents
As of December 29, 2018, minimum lease payments under non-cancelable operating leases by period were
expected to be as follows:
2019 $ 459
2020 406
2021 294
2022 210
2023 161
2024 and beyond 310
Total $ 1,840
A summary of rent expense for the years ended December 29, 2018  and December 30, 2017  is as follows:
 2018 2017
Rent expense $ 771$ 742
Lessor
We have various arrangements for certain foodservice and vending equipment under which we are the lessor .
These leases meet the criteria for operating lease classification. Lease income associated with these leases is
not material.
Note 14 — Acquisitions and Divestitur es
Acquisition of Pioneer Food Group Ltd.
On July 19, 2019, we entered into an agreement to acquire all of the outstanding shares of Pioneer Foods, a
food and beverage company in South Africa with exports to countries across the globe , for 110.00  South
African rand per share in cash, in a transaction valued at approximately $1.7 billion . Also in 2019, one of our
consolidated subsidi aries entered into Bridge Loan Facilities to provide potential funding for our acquisition
of Pioneer Foods. See Note 8 for further information.
The transa ction is subject to certain regulatory approvals and other customary conditions and is expected to
be recorded primarily in the AMESA  segment. Closing is expected in the first half of 2020.
Acquisition of SodaStream International Ltd.
On Decem ber 5, 2018, we acquired all of the outstanding shares of Soda Stream, a manufacturer and
distributor of sparkling water makers, for $144.00  per share in cash, in a transaction valued at approximately
$3.3 billion . The total consideration transferred was approximately $3.3 billion  (or $3.2 billion , net of cash
and cash equivalents acquired).
We accounted for the transaction as a business combination. We recognized and measured the identifiable
assets acquired and liabilities assumed at their estimated fair values on the date of acquisition. The purchase
price allocation was finalized in the fourth quarter of 2019.
118
Table of Contents
The follow ing table summarizes the fair value of identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed in the
acquisition of SodaStream and the resulting goodwill as of the acquisition date, all of which are recorded in
the Europe segment.
Inventories $ 176
Property, plant and equipment 193
Amortizable intangible assets 284
Nonamortizable intangible asset (brand) 1,840
Other assets and liabilities 210
Net deferred income taxes (303)
Total identifiable net assets $ 2,400
Goodwill 943
Total purchase price $ 3,343
Goodwill is calculated as the excess of the aggregate of the fair value of the consideration transferred over the
fair value of the net assets recognized. The goodwill recorded as part of the acquisition of SodaStream
primarily reflects the value of expected syner gies from our product portfolios and is not deductible for tax
purposes. 
Refranchising in Thailand
In 2018, we refranchised our beverage business in Thailand by selling a controlling interest in our Thailand
bottling operations to form a joint venture, where we now have an equity metho d investment. We recorded a
pre-tax gain of $144 million  ($126 million  after-tax or $0.09 per share) in selling, general and administrative
expenses in our APAC segment as a result of this transaction.
Refranchising in Czech Republic, Hungary , and Slovakia
In 2018, we refranc hised our entire beverage bottling operations and snack distribution operations in CHS.
We recorded a pre-tax gain of $58 milli on ($46 milli on after-tax or $0.03 per share ) in selling, general and
administrative expenses in our Europe segment as a result of this transaction.
Refranchising in Jordan
In 2017, we refranchised our beverage business in Jordan by selling a controlling interest in our Jordan
bottling operations to form a joint venture, where we now have an equity metho d investment. We recorded a
pre-tax gain of $140 million  ($107 million  after-tax or $0.07 per share) in selling, general and administrative
expenses in our AMESA  segment as a result of this transaction.
Inventory Fair V alue Adjustments and Merger and Integration Charges
In 2019, we recorde d inventory fair value adjustments and merger and integration charges of $55 milli on
($47 million  after-tax or $0.03 per share), including $46 million  in our Europe segment, $7 million  in our
AMESA  segment and $2 million  in corporate unallo cated expenses. These charges are primarily related to
fair value adjustmen ts to the acquired inventory included in SodaStream’ s balance sheet at the acquisition
date, recorded in cost of sales, as well as merger and integration charges, inclu ding employee-related costs,
recorded in selling, general and administrative expenses.
In 2018, we recorded merger and integration charges of $75 million  ($0.05 per share), including $57 million
in our Europe segment and $18 million in corpor ate unallocated expenses, related to our acquisition of
SodaStream, recorded in selling, general and administrative expenses. These charges include closing costs,
advisory fees and employee-related costs.
119
Table of Contents
Note 15 — Supplemental Financial Information
Balance Sheet
 2019 2018 2017
Accounts and notes receivable      
Trade receivables $ 6,447 $ 6,079  
Other receivables 1,480 1,164  
Total 7,927 7,243  
Allowance, beginning of year 101 129 $ 134
Net amounts charged to expense 22 16 26
Deductions (a)(30) (33) (35)
Other (b) 12 (11) 4
Allowance, end of year 105 101 $ 129
Net receivables $ 7,822 $ 7,142  
      
Inventories (c)     
Raw materials and packaging $ 1,395 $ 1,312  
Work-in-process 200 178  
Finished goods 1,743 1,638  
Total $ 3,338 $ 3,128  
      
Other assets      
Noncurrent notes and accounts receivable $ 85 $ 86  
Deferred marketplace spending 147 112  
Pension plans (d)846 269  
Right-of-use assets (e)1,548 —  
Other 385 293  
Total $ 3,011 $ 760  
      
Accounts payable and other current liabilities      
Accounts payable $ 8,013 $ 7,213  
Accrued marketplace spending 2,765 2,541  
Accrued compensation and benefits 1,835 1,755  
Dividends payable 1,351 1,329  
SodaStream consideration payable 58 1,997  
Current lease liabilities (e)442 —  
Other current liabilities 3,077 3,277  
Total $ 17,541 $ 18,112  
(a) Includes accounts written of f.
(b) Includes adjustments related primarily to currency translation and other adjustments.
(c) Approximately 7% and 5% of the invent ory cost in 2019  and 2018 , respectively , were computed using the LIFO metho d. The differences
between LIFO and FIFO methods of valuing these inventories were not material.
(d) See Note 7 for further information.
(e) See Note 13 for further information.
120
Table of Contents
Statement of Cash Flows
 2019 2018 2017
Interest paid (a)$ 1,076 $ 1,388$ 1,123
Income taxes paid, net of refunds (b)$ 2,226 $ 1,203$ 1,962
(a) In 2018, excludes the premiums paid in accordance with the debt transactions discussed in Note 8.
(b) In 2019 and 2018, includes tax payments of $423 million  and $115 million , respectively , related to the TCJ Act.
The follow ing table  provides a reconci liation of cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash as reported
within the balance sheet to the same items as reported in the cash flow statement.
 2019 2018
Cash and cash equivalents $ 5,509$ 8,721
Restricted cash (a)— 1,997
Restricted cash included in other assets (b)61 51
Total cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 5,570$ 10,769
(a) In 2018, primarily represents consideration held by our paying agent in connection with our acquisition of SodaStream.
(b) Primarily relates to collateral posted against our derivative asset or liability positions.
Note 16 — Selected Quarterly Financial Data (unaudited)
Selected financial data for 2019  and 2018  is summarized as follows and highlights certain items that
impacted our quarterly results:
 2019  2018
 First
Quarter Second
QuarterThird
QuarterFourth
Quarter First
Quarter Second
QuarterThird
Quarter Fourth
Quarter
Net revenue $12,884 $16,449$17,188$20,640 $12,562 $16,090$16,485 $19,524
Gross profit $7,196 $9,045$9,494$11,294 $6,907 $8,827$8,958 $10,588
Operating profit $2,008 $2,729$2,855$2,699 $1,807 $3,028$2,844 $2,431
Mark-to-market net impact (a)$ 60 $ (6)$ (4)$ 62 $ (31) $ 3$ (29) $(106)
Restructuring and impairment
charges (b)$ (26) $(158)$ (98)$ (88) $ (12) $ (32)$ (35) $(229)
Inventory fair value adjustments
and merger and integration
charges (c)$ (15) $ (24)$ (7)$ (9) — — — $ (75)
Pension-related settlement charges
(d) — — — $(273) — — — —
Net tax related to the TCJ Act (e)$ 29 — — $ (21) $ (1) $(777)$ (76) $ 882
Gains on sale of assets (f)— $ 32 — $ 45 $ 18 $ 9$ 37 $ 12
Other net tax benefits (g)— — — — — $ 314$ 364 $4,386
Charges related to cash tender and
exchange offers (h)— — — — — — — $(253)
Tax reform bonus (i)— — — — $ (87) — — —
Gains on beverage refranchising (j)— — — — — $ 144 — $ 58
Provision for/(benefit from)
income taxes (e)(f)$ 446 $ 524$ 559$ 430 $ 304 $1,070$ 188 $(4,932)
Net income attributable to
PepsiCo $1,413 $2,035$2,100$1,766 $1,343 $1,820$2,498 $6,854
Net income attributable to
PepsiCo per common share         
Basic $ 1.01 $ 1.45$ 1.50$ 1.27 $ 0.94 $ 1.28$ 1.77 $ 4.86
Diluted $ 1.00 $ 1.44$ 1.49$ 1.26 $ 0.94 $ 1.28$ 1.75 $ 4.83
Cash dividends declared per
common share $0.9275 $0.955$0.955$0.955 $0.805 $0.9275$0.9275 $0.9275
(a) Mark-to-market net gains and losses on commodity derivatives in corporate unallocated expenses.
(b) Expenses related to the 2019 and 2014 Productivity Plans. See Note 3 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
121
Table of Contents
(c) In 2019, inventory fair value adjustments and merger and integration charges primarily related to our acquisition of SodaStream.  In 2018,
merger and integration charges related to our acquisition of SodaStream. See Note 14 to our consolidated financial statements for further
information.
(d) In 2019 , pension settlement charges of $220 million  related to the purchase of a group annuity contract and settlement charges of $53 million
related to one-time lump sum payments to certain former employees who had vested benefits , record ed in other pension and retiree medical
benefits expense/income. See Note 7 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
(e) Net tax related to the TCJ Act. See Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
(f) In 2019, gains associated with the sale of assets in the following segments: $31 million  in FLNA  and $46 million  in PBNA. In 2018, gains
associated with the sale of assets in the following segments: $64 million  in PBNA  and $12 million  in AMESA.
(g) In 2018, other net tax benefits of $4.3 billion  resulting from the reorganization of our internationa l operations, including the intercompany
transfer of certain intangib le assets. Also in 2018, non-cash tax benefits of $717 millio n associ ated with both the conclusion of certain
international tax audits and our agreement with the IRS resolving all open matters related to the audits of taxable years 2012 and 2013. See
Note 5 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
(h) In 2018, interest expense in connection with our cash tender and exchange offers, primarily representing the tender price paid over the
carrying value of the tendered notes. See Note 8 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
(i) In 2018, bonus extended to certain U.S. employees related to the TCJ Act in the following segments: $44 millio n in FLNA, $2 millio n in
QFNA  and $41 million  in PBNA.
(j) In 2018 , gains of $58 millio n and $144 millio n associ ated with refranchising our entire beverage bottling operations and snack distribution
operations in CHS in the Europe segment and refranchising a portion of our beverage business in Thailand in the APAC segment,
respectively . See Note 14 to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
122
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Register ed Public Accounting Firm
To the Shareholders and Board of Directors
PepsiCo, Inc.:
Opinions on the Consolidated Financial Statements and Internal Contr ol over  Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheet of PepsiCo , Inc. and Subsidiaries (the
Company) as of December 28, 2019  and December 29, 2018 , and the related Consolidated Stateme nts of
Income, Comprehensive Income, Cash Flows, and Equity for each of the fiscal years in the three-year period
ended December 28, 2019  and the related notes (collectively , the consolidated financial statements). We also
have audited the Company’ s internal control over financial reporting as of December 28, 2019 , based on
criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Or ganizations of the Treadway Commission.
In our opinion, the consolidated financi al statements referred to above present fairly , in all material respects,
the financial position of the Company as of December 28, 2019  and December 29, 2018 , and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the fiscal years in the three-year perio d ended December 28, 2019 ,
in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. Also in our opinion, the Company
maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 28,
2019 , based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework  (2013) issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Or ganizations of the Treadway Commission.
Basis for  Opinions
The Company’ s management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining
effective internal control over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal
control over financi al reporting, included in the accompanying Management’ s Annual Report on Internal
Control over Financ ial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’ s consolidated
financial statements  and an opinion on the Company’ s internal control over financial reporting based on our
audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with
the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audits to obtai n reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial
statements are free of material misstate ment, whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal
control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits  of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of
material misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing
procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence
regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included
evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as
evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over
financial reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing
the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of
internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included performing such other procedures as we
considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our
opinions.
123
Table of Contents
Definition and Limitations of Internal Contr ol over  Financial Reporting
A compan y’s interna l control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of finan cial statements for external
purposes in accorda nce with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’ s internal control over
financial reporting includes those polici es and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that,
in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispo sitions of the assets of the
company; (2) provide reasonable assura nce that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation
of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and
expenditures of the company are being  made only in accordance with authorizations of management and
directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of
unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’ s assets that could have a material effect on the
financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also , projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk
that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with
the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critic al audit matters communicat ed below are matters arising from the current period audit of the
consolidated financ ial statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit
committee and that: (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial
statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The
communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below , providing
separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Evaluation of certain sales incentive accruals
As discussed in Note 2 of the consolidated financial statements, the Company  offers sales incentives
and discounts through various programs  to customers and consumers. A number of the sales incentives
are based on annual targets, resulting in the need to accrue for the expected liability . These incentives
are accrued for in the “Accounts payable and other current liabilities” line on the balance sheet. These
accruals are based on sales incentive agreements, expectations regarding customer and consumer
participation and performance levels, and historical experience and trends.
We identified the evaluation of certain of the Company’ s sales incentive accruals as a critical audit
matter . Subjective and complex auditor judgment is required in evaluating these sales incentive accruals
as a result of the timing difference betw een when the product is delivered and when the incentive is
settled. This specific ally related to (1) forecasted customer and consumer partici pation and performance
level assumptions underlying the accrual, and (2) the impact of historical experience and trends.
The primary procedures that we perform ed to address this critical audit matter included the following.
We tested certain internal controls over the Company’ s sales incentive process, including (1) the accrual
methodology , (2) assumptions around forecasted customer and consumer participation, (3) performance
levels, and (4) moni toring of actual sales incentives incurred compared to estimated sales incentives in
respect of historical  periods. To evaluat e the timing and amount of certain accrued sales incentives we
(1) analyzed the accrual by sales incen tive type as compared to historical trends to identify specific
sales incentives that may require additional testing, (2) recalculated expenses and closing accruals on a
sample basis, based on volumes sold and terms of the sales incentives, (3) assessed the Company’ s
ability to accurately estimate its sales incentive accrual by comparing previously established accruals
124
Table of Contents
to actual settlements, and (4) tested a sample of settlements or claims that occurred after period end, and
compared them to the recorded sales incentive accrual.
Assessment of the carrying value of certain reacquired and acquired franc hise rights and certain
juice and dairy brands
As discus sed in Notes 2 and 4 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company performs
impairment testing of its indefinite-lived intangible assets on an annual basis during the third quarter of
each fiscal year and whenever events and changes in circumstances indicate that there is a greater than
50% likelihood that the asset is impaire d. The carrying value of indefinite-lived  intangible assets as of
December 28, 2019 was $30.1 billion  which represents 38% of total assets, and includes PepsiCo
Beverages North America’ s (PBNA) reacquired and acquired franchise rights which had a carrying
value of $8.6 billion  as of December 28, 2019.
We identif ied the assessment of the carrying value of PBNA ’s reacquired and acquired franchise rights
and certain of Europe’ s juice and dairy brands in Russia as a critical audit matter . Significant auditor
judgment is necessary to assess the impact of competitive operating and macroeconomic factors on
future levels of sales, operating profit and cash flows. The impairment analysis of these indefinite-lived
intangible assets requires significant auditor judgment to evaluate the Company’ s forecasted revenue
and profitability levels, including the expected long-term growth rates and the selection of the discount
rates to be applied to the projected cash flows.
The primary procedures that we perform ed to address this critical audit matter included the following.
We tested  certain internal controls over the Company’ s indefinite-lived assets  impairment process to
develop the forecasted revenue, profitability levels, and expected long-term growth rates and select the
discount rates to be applied to the projected cash flows. We also evaluated the sensitivity of the
Company’ s conclusion to changes in assumptions, including the assessment of changes in assumptions
from prior  periods. To assess the Compa ny’s ability to accurately forecast, we compared the Company’ s
historical forecasted results to actual results. We compared the cash flow projections used in the
impairment tests with available external industry data and other internal information. We involved
valuation profession als with specialized skills and knowledge who assisted in evaluating (1) the long-
term grow th rates used in the impairme nt tests by comparing against econom ic data and information
specific to the respective assets, including projected long-term nominal Gross Domestic Product growth
in the respective local countries, and (2) the discount rates used in the impairment tests by comparing
them against discou nt rates that were independently developed using publicly available market data,
including that of comparable companies.
Evaluation of unrecognized tax benefits
As discuss ed in Note 5 to the consolida ted financial statements, the Company’ s global operating model
gives rise to income tax obligations in the United States and in certain foreign jurisdictions in which it
operates. As of December 28, 2019, the Company recorded reserves for unrecognized tax benefits of
$1.4 billio n. The Company establishes reserves if it believes that certain positions taken in its tax
returns are subject to challenge and the Company likely will not succeed, even though the Company
believes the tax return position is supportable under the tax law. The Company adjusts these reserves, as
well as the related interest, in light of new information, such as the progress of a tax examination, or
new tax law or tax authority settlements.
We identified the evaluation of the Company’ s unrecognized tax benefits as a critical audit matter
because the application of tax law and interpretation of a tax authority’ s settlem ent history is complex
and involves subjective judgment. Such  judgments impact both the timing and amount of the reserves
that are recognized , including judgments about re-measuring liabilities for positions taken in prior
years’  tax returns in light of new information.
125
Table of Contents
The primary procedures that we perform ed to address this critical audit matter included the following.
We tested  certain internal controls over the Company’ s unrecognized tax benefits process, including
controls to (1) identify uncertain income tax positions, (2) evaluate the tax law and tax authority’ s
settlement history used to estimate the unrecognized tax benefits, and (3) monitor for new information
that may give rise to changes to the existing unrecognized tax benefits, such as progress of a tax
examination, new tax law or tax authority settlements. We involved tax and valuation professionals with
specialized skills and knowledge, who assisted in assessing the unrecognized tax benefits by (1)
evaluating the Company’ s tax structure  and transactions, including transfer pricing arrangements, and
(2) assessing the Company’ s interpretation of existing tax law as well as new and amended tax laws, tax
positions taken, and associated external counsel opinions.
/s/ KPMG LLP
We have served as the Company’ s auditor since 1990.
New York, New York
February 13, 2020
126
Table of Contents
GLOSSAR Y
Acquisitions and divestitur es: all mergers and acquisitions activity , including the impac t of acquisitions,
divestitures and changes in ownership or control in consolidated subsidiaries  and nonconsolidated equity
investees .
Bottler  Case Sales (BCS) : measure of physi cal beverage volume shipped to retailers and independen t
distributors from both PepsiCo and our independent bottlers.
Bottler  funding : financial incentives we give to our independent bottlers to assist in the distribution and
promotion of our beverage products.
Concentrate Shipments and Equivalents (CSE) : measure of our physical beverage volume shipments to
independent bottlers, retailers and independent distributors.
Constant currency : financial results assuming constant foreign currency exchange rates used for translation
based on the rates in effect for the comparable prior -year period. In order to compute our constant currency
results, we multiply or divide, as appropriate, our current year U.S. dollar resul ts by the current year average
foreign exchange rates and then multiply or divide, as appropriate, those amounts by the prior year average
foreign exchange rates.
Consumers : people who eat and drink our products.
CSD : carbonated soft drinks.
Customers : authorized independent bottlers, distributors and retailers.
Direct-Stor e-Delivery (DSD) : delivery system used by us and our independent bottlers to deliver snacks and
beverages directly to retail stores where our products are merchandised.
Effective net pricing : reflects the year-over-year impact of discrete pricing actions, sales incentive activities
and mix resulting from selling varying products in dif ferent package sizes and in dif ferent countries.
Free cash flow: net cash provided by operating activities less capital spending, plus sales of property , plant
and equipment .
Independent bottlers : custome rs to whom we have granted exclusive contracts to sell and manufacture
certain beverage products bearing our trademarks within a specific geographical area.
Mark-to-market net impact : chan ge in market value for commodity derivative contracts that we purchase to
mitigate the volatility in costs of energy and raw materials that we consume. The market value is determined
based on prices on national exchanges and recently reported transactions in the marketplace.
Organic : a measure that adjusts for impacts of acquisitions, divestitures and other structura l changes, foreign
exchange translation and, when applicable, the impact of the 53rd reporting week.  In excluding the impact of
foreign exchange translation, we assume constant foreign exchange rates used for translation based on the
rates in effect for the comparable prior -year period. See the definition of “Constant currency” for further
information. Starting in 2018, our reported results reflect the accounting policy election taken in conjunction
with the adoption of the revenue recognition guidance to exclude from net revenue and cost of sales all sales,
use, value -added and certain excise taxes assessed by governmental autho rities on revenue-producing
transactions not already excluded. Our 2018 organic revenue growth exclud es the impact of these taxes
previously recognized in net revenue.
127
Table of Contents
Servings : common  metric reflecting our consolidated physical unit volume. Our divisions’  physical unit
measures are converted into servings based on U.S. Food and Drug Administration guidelines for single-
serving sizes of our products.
Total marketplace spending : includes sales incentives and discounts offered through various programs to
our customers, consumers or independent bottlers, as well as advertising and other marketing activities.
Transaction gains and losses : the impa ct on our consolidated financial statements of exchange rate changes
arising from specific transactions.
Translation adjust ment : the impact of converting our foreign affiliates’  financial statements into U.S.
dollars for the purpose of consolidating our financial statements.
128
Table of Contents
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosur es About Market Risk.
Included in “Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financia l Condition and Results of
Operations – Our Business Risks.”
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
See “Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules.”
Item 9. Changes in and Disagr eements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosur e.
Not applicable.
Item 9A. Contr ols and Pr ocedur es.
(a) Disclo sure Controls and Procedures.  As of the end of the period covered by this report, we carried out an
evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of our management, including our Chief
Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of the design and operation of our
disclosure controls and procedures, as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act). Based upon that evaluation, our Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that as of the end of the period covered by this report our
disclosure controls and procedures were effective to ensure that information required to be disclosed by us in
reports we file or submit under the Exchange Act is (1) recorded, processed, summarized and reported within
the time periods specified in Securities and Exchange Commission rules and forms, and (2) accumulated and
communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as
appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
(b) Mana gement’ s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting.  Our management is
responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting, as such term
is defined  in Rule 13a-15(f) of the Exchange Act. Under the supervision and with the participation of our
management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, we conducted an evaluation
of the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting based upon criteria established in Internal
Contr ol – Integrate d Framework  (2013) by the Committee of Sponsori ng Organizations of the Treadway
Commission. Based  on that evaluation, our management concluded that our internal control over financial
reporting was ef fective as of December 28, 2019 .
Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm . KPM G LLP, an independent registered public
accounting firm, has audited the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form
10-K and, as part of their audit, has issued their report, included herein, on the effectiveness of our internal
control over financial reporting.
(c) Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting.  Except as discussed, there have been no changes
in our internal control over financial reporting during our fourth quarter of 2019  that have materially affected,
or are reasonably likely to materially af fect, our internal control over financial reporting.
During our fourth quarter of 2019 , we continued migrating certain of our financial processing systems to an
enterprise-wide systems solution. These systems implementations are part of our ongoing global business
transformation initiative, and we plan to continue implementing such systems throughout other parts of our
businesses. In addition, in connection with our 2019 multi-year productivity plan, we continue to migrate to
shared business models across our operations to further simplify , harmonize and automate processes. In
connection with these implementations and resulting business process changes , we continue to enhance the
design and documentation of our internal control over financial reporting processes to maintain effective
controls over our financial reporting. These transitions have not materially af fected, and we do not expect
129
Table of Contents
them to materially af fect, our internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B. Other  Information.
Not applicable.
PART III
Item 10. Dir ectors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance.
Information about our directors and persons nominated to become directors is contained under the caption
“Election of Directors” in our Proxy Statement for our 2020  Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be filed with
the SEC within 120 days of the year ended December 28, 2019  (the 2020  Proxy Statement) and is
incorporated herein  by reference. Information about our executive officers is reported under the caption
“Information About Executive Of ficers” in Part I of this report.
Information on beneficial ownership reporting compliance will be contained under the caption “Ownership of
PepsiCo Common Stock - Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports,” if applicable, in our 2020 Proxy Statement and
is incorporated herein by reference.
We have a written code of conduct that applies to all of our employees, including our Chairman of the Board
of Directors and Chief Executive Officer, Chief Financial Officer and Controller , and to our Board of
Directors. Our Global Code of Conduc t is distributed to all employees and is available on our website at
http://www .pepsico.com . A copy of our Glob al Code of Conduct may be obtained free of charge by writi ng to
Investor Relations, PepsiCo, Inc., 700 Anderson Hill Road, Purchase, New York 10577. Any amendment to
our Global Code of Conduct and any waiver applicable to our executive officers or senior financial officers
will be posted on our website within the time period required by the SEC and applicable rules of The Nasdaq
Stock Market LLC.
Information about the procedures by which security holders may recommend nominees to our Board of
Directors can be found in our 2020  Prox y Statement under the caption “Board Composition and Refreshment
– Shareho lder Reco mmendations and Nominations of Director Candidates” and is incorporated herein by
reference.
Information concern ing the composition of the Audit Committee and our Audit Committee financial experts
is contained in our 2020  Prox y Statement under the caption “Cor porate Governance at PepsiCo – Comm ittees
of the Board of Directors – Audit Committee” and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 1 1. Executive Compensation.
Information about director and executiv e officer compensation, Compensation Committee interlocks and the
Compensation Committee Report is contained in our 2020  Proxy Statement under the captions “2019
Director Compensation,” “Executive Compensation,” “Corporate Governance at PepsiCo – Committees of
the Board of Direc tors – Compensation Committee – Compensation Comm ittee Interlocks and Insider
Participation” and “Executive Compensation – Compensation Committee Report” and is incorporated herein
by reference.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder
Matters.
Information with respect to securities authorized for issuance under equity compensation plans can be found
under the caption “Executive Compensation – Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity
Compensation Plans” in our 2020  Proxy Statement and is incorporated herein by reference.
Information on the number of shares of PepsiCo Common Stock beneficially owned by each director and
named executive of ficer, by all directors and executive of ficers as a group and on each beneficial owner of
130
Table of Contents
more than 5% of PepsiCo Common Stock is contained under the caption “Ownership of PepsiCo Common
Stock” in our 2020  Proxy Statement and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Dir ector  Independence.
Information with respect to certain relationships and related transactions and director independence is
contained under the captions “Corporate Governance at PepsiCo – Related Person Transactions” and
“Corporate Govern ance at PepsiCo – Director Independence” in our 2020  Proxy Statement and is
incorporated herein by reference.
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services.
Information on our Audit Committee’ s pre-approval policy and procedures for audit and other services and
information on our principal accountant fees and services is contained in our 2020  Proxy Statement under the
caption “Ratification of Appointment of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm – Audit and Other
Fees” and is incorporated herein by reference.
131
Table of Contents
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules.
(a)1. Financial Statements
The follow ing conso lidated financial statements of PepsiCo, Inc. and its affiliates are included herein
by reference to the pages indicated on the index appearing in “Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations”:
Consolidated Statem ent of Income – Fiscal years ended December 28, 2019, December 29, 2018 and
December 30, 2017
Consolidated Statement of Comprehe nsive Income – Fiscal years ended December 28, 2019,
December 29, 2018 and December 30, 2017
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows – Fiscal years ended December 28, 2019, December 29, 2018
and December 30, 2017
Consolidated Balance Sheet – December 28, 2019 and December 29, 2018
Consolidated Statement of Equity – Fiscal years ended December 28, 2019, December 29, 2018 and
December 30, 2017
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements, and
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
(a)2. Financial Statement Schedules
These schedules are omitted because they are not required or because the information is set forth in
the financial statements or the notes thereto.
(a)3. Exhibits
See Index to Exhibits.
132
Table of Contents
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary .
None.
INDEX TO EXHIBITS
ITEM 15(a)(3)
The follow ing is a list of the exhibits filed as part of this Form 10-K. The documents incorporated by
reference can be viewed on the SEC’ s website at http://www .sec.gov .
EXHIBIT
3.1 Amended and Restated Articles of Incor poration of PepsiCo, Inc., effective as of May 1, 2019, which
are incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 3, 2019.
3.2 By-laws of PepsiCo, Inc., as amended and restated, effective as of January 11, 2016, which are
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission on January 1 1, 2016.
4.1 PepsiCo, Inc. agrees to furnish to the Securities and Exchange Commission, upon request, a copy of
any instru ment, not otherwise filed herewith, defining the rights of holders of long-term debt of
PepsiCo, Inc. and its consolidated subsidiaries and for any of its unconsolidated subsidiaries for
which financial statements are required to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
4.2 Indenture dated May 21, 2007 between PepsiCo, Inc. and The Bank of New York Mellon (formerly
known as The Bank of New York), as trustee, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit
4.3 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-3ASR (Registration No. 333-154314) filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission on October 15, 2008.
4.3 Form of 5.50% Senior Note due 2040, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
January 13, 2010.
4.4 Form of 3.125% Senior Note due 2020, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 25, 2010.
4.5 Form of 4.875% Senior Note due 2040, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 25, 2010.
4.6 Form of 3.600% Senior Note due 2024, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
February 28, 2014.
4.7 Form of 1.750% Senior Note due 2021, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
April 28, 2014.
4.8 Form of 2.625% Senior Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
April 28, 2014.
4.9 Form of 4.250% Senior Note due 2044, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 22, 2014.
4.10 Form of 1.850% Senior Note due 2020, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
April 30, 2015.
4.11Form of 2.750% Senior Note due 2025, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
April 30, 2015.
133
Table of Contents
4.12 Form of 3.100% Senior Note due 2022, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
July 17, 2015.
4.13 Form of 3.500% Senior Note due 2025, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
July 17, 2015.
4.14 Form of 4.600% Senior Note due 2045, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
July 17, 2015.
4.15 Form of 2.150% Senior Note due 2020, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 14, 2015.
4.16 Form of 4.450% Senior Note due 2046, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 14, 2015.
4.17 Form of 2.850% Senior Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
February 24, 2016.
4.18 Form of 4.450% Senior Note due 2046, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
February 24, 2016.
4.19 Form of 0.875% Senior Note due 2028, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
July 18, 2016.
4.20 Form of Floating Rate Note due 2021, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 6, 2016.
4.21 Form of 1.700% Senior Note due 2021, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 6, 2016.
4.22 Form of 2.375% Senior Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 6, 2016.
4.23 Form of 3.450% Senior Note due 2046, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 6, 2016.
4.24 Form of Floating Rate Note due 2022, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
May 2, 2017.
4.25 Form of 2.250% Senior Note due 2022, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
May 2, 2017.
4.26 Form of 4.000% Senior Note due 2047, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
May 2, 2017.
4.27 Form of 2.150% Senior Note due 2024, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
May 4, 2017.
4.28 Form of 2.000% Senior Note due 2021, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 10, 2017.
134
Table of Contents
4.29 Form of 3.000% Senior Note due 2027, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 10, 2017.
4.30 Board of Directors Resolutions Author izing PepsiCo, Inc.’s Officers to Establish the Terms of the
5.50% Senior Notes due 2040, 3.125% Senior Notes due 2020 and 4.875% Senior Notes due 2040,
which are incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the 24 weeks ended June 12, 2010.
4.31 Board of Directors Resolutions Author izing PepsiCo, Inc.’s Officers to Establish the Terms of the
3.000% Senior Notes due 2021, the 2.750% Senior Notes due 2022, the 4.000% Senior Notes due
2042, the 3.600% Senior Notes due 2042 and the 2.500% Senior Notes due 2022, which are
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 6, 201 1.
4.32 Form of 3.000% Senior Note due 2021, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
August 25, 201 1.
4.33 Form of 2.750% Senior Note due 2022, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
March 2, 2012.
4.34 Form of 4.000% Senior Note due 2042, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
March 2, 2012.
4.35 Form of 3.600% Senior Note due 2042, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
August 13, 2012.
4.36 Form of 2.500% Senior Note due 2022, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 30, 2012.
4.37 Form of 2.750% Senior Note due 2023, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
February 28, 2013.
4.38 Form of 7.00% Senior Note due 2029, Series A, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit
4.3 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission on November 8, 2018.
4.39 Form of 5.50% Senior Note due 2035, Series A, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit
4.4 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission on November 8, 2018.
4.40 Form of 7.29% Senior Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-4 (Registration No. 333-22 8466) filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission on November 19, 2018.
4.41 Form of 7.44% Senior Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-4 (Registration No. 333-22 8466) filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission on November 19, 2018.
4.42 Form of 7.00% Senior Note due 2029, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-4 (Registration No. 333-22 8466) filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission on November 19, 2018.
4.43 Form of 5.50% Senior Note due 2035, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-4 (Registration No. 333-22 8466) filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission on November 19, 2018.
4.44 Form of 0.750% Senior Note due 2027, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
March 18, 2019.
135
Table of Contents
4.45 Form of 1.125% Senior Note due 2031, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
March 18, 2019.
4.46 Form of 2.625% Senior Note due 2029, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
July 29, 2019.
4.47 Form of 3.375% Senior Note due 2049, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
July 29, 2019.
4.48 Form of 2.875% Senior Note due 2049, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 9, 2019.
4.49 Form of 0.875% Senior Note due 2039, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 16, 2019.
4.50 Board of Directors Resolutions Author izing PepsiCo, Inc.’s Officers to Establish the Terms of the
2.750% Senior Note due 2023, the 3.600% Senior Notes due 2024, the 1.750% Senior Notes due
2021, the 2.625% Senior Notes due 2026, the 4.250% Senior Notes due 2044 , the 1.850% Senior
Notes due 2020, the 2.750% Senior Notes due 2025, the 3.100% Senior Notes due 2022, the 3.500%
Senior Notes due 2025, the 4.600% Senior Notes due 2045, the 2.150% Senior Notes due 2020, the
4.450% Senior Notes due 2046, the 2.850% Senior Notes due 2026, the 0.875% Senior Note due
2028, the Floating Rate Note due 2021, the 1.700% Senior Notes due 2021, the 2.375% Senior Notes
due 2026, the 3.450% Senior Notes due 2046 the Floating Rate Notes due 2022, the 2.250% Senior
Notes due 2022, the 4.000% Senior Notes due 2047, the 2.150% Senior Notes due 2024, the 2.000%
Senior Notes due 2021, the 3.000% Senior Notes due 2027, the 7.00% Senior Notes due 2029, Series
A, the 5.50% Senior Notes due 2035, Series A, the 7.29% Senior Notes due 2026, the 7.44% Senior
Notes due 2026, the 7.00% Senior Notes due 2029, the 5.50% Senior Notes due 2035, the 0.750%
Senior Notes due 2027, the 1.125% Senior Notes due 2031, the 2.625% Senior Notes due 2029, the
3.375% Senior Notes due 2049, the 2.875% Senior Notes due 2049 and the 0.875% Senior Notes due
2039, which are incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on February 28, 2013.
4.51 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated  as of October 24, 2018, among Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc., Bottling Group, LLC, and The Bank of New York Mellon, as trustee, to the
Indenture dated March 8, 1999 among The Pepsi Bottling Group, Inc., Bottling Group, LLC and The
Chase Manhattan Bank, as trustee, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
October 25, 2018.
4.52 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 26, 2010, among Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc., The Pepsi Bottl ing Group, Inc., Bottling Group, LLC and The Bank of New
York Mellon, as trustee, to the Indenture dated March 8, 1999 between The Pepsi Bottling Group,
Inc., Bottling Group, LLC and The Chase Manhattan Bank, as trustee, which is incorporated herein
by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission on March 1, 2010.
4.53 Indenture, dated as of March 8, 1999, by and among The Pepsi Bottling Group, Inc., as obligor ,
Bottling Group, LLC, as guarantor , and The Chase Manhattan Bank, as trustee, relating to
$1,000,000,000 7% Series B Senior Note due 2029, which is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 10.14 to The Pepsi Bottling Group, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-1 (Registration
No. 333-70291) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 24, 1999.
136
Table of Contents
4.54 Third Supplemental  Indenture, dated as of October 24, 2018, between Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc. and The Bank New York Mellon Trust Company , N.A., as trustee, to the
Indenture dated as of January 15, 1993 between Whitman Corporation and The First National Bank
of Chicag o, as trustee, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s
Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on October 25,
2018.
4.55 Second Supplement al Indenture, dated as of February 26, 2010, among Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc., PepsiAmericas, Inc. and The Bank New York Mellon Trust Company , N.A.,
as trustee, to the Indenture dated as of January 15, 1993 between Whitman Corporation and The First
National Bank of Chicago, as trustee, which is incorporated herein by referen ce to Exhibit 4.2 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
March 1, 2010.
4.56 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 20, 1999, between Whitman Corporation and The
First National Bank of Chicago, as trustee, to the Indenture dated as of January 15, 1993, between
Whitman Corporation and The First National Bank of Chicago, as trustee, each of which is
incorporated herein  by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 1 to
PepsiAmericas, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-8 (Registration No. 333-64292) filed with
the Securities and Exchange Commission on December 29, 2005.
4.57 Form of PepsiAmericas, Inc. 7.29% Note due 2026, which is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 4.7 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly  Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March
20, 2010.
4.58 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 24, 2018, between Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc. and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, to the Indenture
dated as of August 15, 2003 between PepsiAmericas, Inc. and Wells Fargo Bank Minnesota, National
Association, as trustee, which is incorp orated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s
Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on October 25,
2018.
4.59 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 26, 2010, among Pepsi-Cola Metropolitan
Bottling Company , Inc., PepsiAmericas, Inc. and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee,
to the Indenture dated as of August 15, 2003 between PepsiAmericas, Inc. and Wells Fargo Bank
Minnesota, National Association, as trustee, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3
to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission
on March 1, 2010.
4.60 Indenture dated as of August 15, 2003 between PepsiAmericas, Inc. and Wells Fargo Bank
Minnesota, National  Association, as trustee, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4 to
PepsiAmericas, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-108164) filed with
the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 22, 2003.
4.61 Form of PepsiAmericas, Inc. 5.50% Note due 2035, which is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 4.17 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March
20, 2010.
4.62 Description of Securities.
10.1 Form of PepsiCo, Inc. Director Indemnification Agreement, which is incorporated herein by
reference to Exhibit 10.20 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
December 25, 2004.*
10.2 Severance Plan for Executive Employ ees of PepsiCo, Inc. and Affiliates, which is incorporated
herein by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the fiscal
quarter ended September 6, 2008.*
10.3 PepsiCo, Inc. 2007 Long-T erm Incentiv e Plan, as amended and restated March 12, 2010, which is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 1 1, 2010.*
10.4 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit  10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission on February 1 1, 2009.*
137
Table of Contents
10.5 Form of Performance-Based Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated herein
by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission on February 1 1, 2009.*
10.6 Form of Pro Rata Long-Term Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporate d herein by reference
to Exhibit  10.3 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission on February 1 1, 2009.*
10.7 Form of Aircraft Time Sharing Agreement, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the fiscal quarter ended March 21, 2009.*
10.8 PBG 2004  Long Term Incentive Plan, which is incorporated herein by referen ce to Exhibit 99.1 to
PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-8 (Registration No. 333-16 5107) filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission on February 26, 2010.*
10.9 PBG Stock Incentive Plan, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 99.6 to PepsiCo,
Inc.’s Registration Statement on Form S-8 (Registration No. 333-165107) filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission on February 26, 2010.*
10.10 Amendments to PBG 2002 Long Term Incentive Plan, PBG Long Term Incentive Plan, The Pepsi
Bottling Group, Inc. 1999 Long Term Incentive Plan and PBG Stock Incentive Plan (effective
February 8, 2007), which are incorpor ated herein by reference to Exhibit 99.7 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s
Registration Statem ent on Form S-8 (Registration No. 333-165107) filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission on February 26, 2010.*
10.11Amendments to PBG 2004 Long Term Incentive Plan, PBG 2002 Long Term Incentive Plan, The
Pepsi Bottling Group, Inc. Long Term Incentive Plan, The Pepsi Bottling Group, Inc. 1999 Long
Term Incentive Plan, PBG Directors’  Stock Plan and PBG Stock Incentive Plan (effective February
19, 2010), which are incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 99.8 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Registration
Statement on Form S-8 (Registration No. 333-165107) filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission on February 26, 2010.*
10.12 Specified Employee  Amendments to Arrangements Subject to Section 409A  of the Internal Revenue
Code, adopted February 18, 2010 and March 29, 2010, which is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 10.13 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 20, 2010.*
10.13 Form of Performance-Based Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated herein
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission on April 16, 2010.*
10.14 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 24, 2012.*
10.15 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit  10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission on March 18, 2013.*
10.16 PepsiCo, Inc. 2007 Long-T erm Incentiv e Plan, as amended and restated March 13, 2014, which is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 14, 2014.*
10.17 PepsiCo, Inc. Execu tive Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective February 7,
2014, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit B to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Proxy Statement for
its 2014 Annual Meeting of Sharehold ers filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on
March 21, 2014.*
10.18 The Pepsi Co International Retirement Plan Defined Benefit Program, as amended and restated
effective as of January 1, 2019, which is incorporated by reference to Exhib it 10.20 to PepsiCo,
Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2018.*
10.19 The PepsiCo International Retirement Plan Defined Contribution Program, as amended and restated
effective as of January 1, 2019, which is incorporated by reference to Exhib it 10.21 to PepsiCo,
Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2018.*
138
Table of Contents
10.20 PepsiCo, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan (as amended and restated May 4, 2016), which is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit B to PepsiCo’ s Proxy Statement for its 2016 Annual
Meeting of Shareholders, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 18, 2016.*
10.21 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 19, 2016.*
10.22 PepsiCo Pension Equalization Plan (Plan Document for the Pre-409A  Progra m), as amended and
restated ef fective as of April 1, 2016 (with additional amendments through December 10, 2019).*
10.23 PepsiCo Pension Equalization Plan (Plan Document for the 409A  Program), amended and restated
effective as of January 1, 2019 (with additional amendments through December 10, 2019).*
10.24 PepsiCo Automatic Retirement Contribution Equalization Plan, as amended and restated effective as
of January 1, 2019,  which is incorpora ted by reference to Exhibit 10.26 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2018.*
10.25 PepsiCo Director Deferral Program (Plan Document for the 409A  Program), amended and restated
effective as of January 1, 2020.*
10.26 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit 10.49 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December
31, 2016.*
10.27 PepsiCo Executive Income Deferral Program (Plan Document for the 409A  Program), amended and
restated ef fective as of January 1, 2019.*
10.28 Amendment to Certain PepsiCo Award  Agreements, which is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 10.45 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30,
2017. *
10.29 Amendment to the PBG 2004 Long Term Incentive Plan and the PBG Stock Incentive Plan, effective
December 20, 2017, which is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.46 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2017.*
10.30 PepsiCo, Inc. Long Term Incentive Plan (as amended and restated December 20, 2017),which is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.47 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for
the fiscal year ended December 30, 2017.*
10.31 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 24, 2018.*
10.32 Form of Performance-Based Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated herein
by referen ce to Exhibit 10.2 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly
period ended March 24, 2018.*
10.33 PepsiCo, Inc. Executive Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restate d effective February
13, 2019, which is incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.36 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2018.*
10.34 Form of Annual Long-T erm Incentive Award Agreement, which is incorporated  herein by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 to PepsiCo, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended
March 23, 2019.*
10.35 PepsiCo Executive Income Deferral Program (Plan Document for the Pre-409A  Program), amended
and restated ef fective as of January 1, 2019.*
21 Subsidiaries of PepsiCo, Inc.
23 Consent of KPMG LLP .
24 Power of Attorney .
31 Certification of our Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Section 302
of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
139
Table of Contents
32 Certification of our Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Section 906
of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
101The follow ing materials from PepsiCo, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
December 28, 2019 formatted in iXBRL  (Inline eXtensible Business Reportin g Language): (i) the
Consolidated Statem ents of Income, (ii) the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income, (iii)
the Consolidated Statements of Cash  Flows, (iv) the Consolidated Balance Sheets, (v) the
Consolidated Statements of Equity and (vi) Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
104The cover page from the Company’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
December 28, 2019, formatted in Inline XBRL  and contained in Exhibit 101.
* Management contracts and compensatory plans or arrangements required to be filed as exhibits pursuant to Item 15(a)(3) of
this report.
140
Table of Contents
SIGNA TURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, PepsiCo has duly
caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Dated: February 13, 2020
 
   
 PepsiCo, Inc.
   
 By: /s/ Ramon L. Laguarta
  Ramon L. Laguarta
  Chairman of the Board of Directors and Chief
Executive Of ficer
141
Table of Contents
Pursuant to the requirements of the Secu rities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of PepsiCo and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
 
   
SIGNA TURE TITLE DATE
/s/    Ramon L. Laguarta Chairman of the Board of Directors February 13, 2020
Ramon L. Laguarta and Chief Executive Of ficer  
/s/    Hugh F . Johnston Vice Chairman, Executive Vice President February 13, 2020
Hugh F . Johnston and Chief Financial Of ficer  
/s/    Marie T. Gallagher Senior Vice President and Controller February 13, 2020
Marie T. Gallagher (Principal Accounting Of ficer)  
/s/    Shona L. Brown Director February 13, 2020
Shona L. Brown   
/s/    Cesar Conde Director February 13, 2020
Cesar Conde   
/s/    Ian M. Cook Director February 13, 2020
Ian M. Cook   
/s/    Dina Dublon Director February 13, 2020
Dina Dublon   
/s/    Richard W. Fisher Director February 13, 2020
Richard W. Fisher   
/s/    Michelle Gass Director February 13, 2020
Michelle Gass   
/s/    William R. Johnson Director February 13, 2020
William R. Johnson   
/s/    David C. Page Director February 13, 2020
David C. Page   
/s/    Robert C. Pohlad Director February 13, 2020
Robert C. Pohlad   
/s/    Daniel Vasella Director February 13, 2020
Daniel Vasella   
/s/    Darren Walker Director February 13, 2020
Darren Walker   
/s/    Alberto Weisser Director February 13, 2020
Alberto Weisser   
142
